THE SPY;
A TALE OF
THE NEUTRAL GROUND.
CHAPTER I.
there are, whose changing lineaments
Express each gulleless passion of the breast,
Where Love and Hope and tender-hearted Pity,
Shine forth, reflected, as from the mirror's surface
But cold experience can veil these hues
With looks, invented, shrewdly to encompass
The cunning purposes of base deceit.
Dus
.
The
officer to whose keeping Dunwoodie had
committed the pedlar, transferred his charge to
the custody of the regular sergeant of the guard.
The gift of Captain Wharton had not been lost on
the youthful lieutenant, and a certain dancing
motion
that had unaccountably taken possession of
objects before his eyes, gave him warning of the
necessity of recruiting nature by sleep. After
admonishing the non-commissioned guardian of
Harvey to omit no watchfulness in securing the
prisoner, the youth wrapped himself in his cloak,
and, stretched on a bench before a fire, sought,
and soon found, the repose he needed. A rude
shed extended the whole length of the rear of the
building, and from off one of its ends had been
partitioned a small apartment, that was intended
as a repository for many of the lesser implements
of husbandry. The lawless times had, however,
occasoned its being stript of every thing of any
value, and the searching eyes of Betty Flannagan
selected this spot, on her arrival, as the store house
for her moveables, and a withdrawing-room for
her person. The spare arms and baggage of the
corps had also been deposited here; and the
united
treasures were placed under the eye of the
sentinel who paraded the shed as guardian to the
rear of the head quarters. A second warrior,
who was stationed near the house to protect the
horses of the officers, could command a view of
the outside of the apartment, and as it was
without
window, or outlet of any kind excepting its
door, the considerate sergeant thought this the
most befitting place in which to deposite his charge,
until the moment of his execution. There were
several inducements that urged Sergeant Hollister
to this determination, among which was the
absence
of the washerwoman, who lay before the
kitchen fire, dreaming that the corps were
attacking
a party of the enemy, and mistaking the noise
which proceeded from her own nose for the
bugles
of the Virginians sounding the charge.
Another
was the peculiar opinions that the veteran
entertained of life and death, and by which he
was distinguished in the corps as a man of most
exemplary piety and holiness of life. The
sergeant
was more than fifty years of age, and for
half that period had borne arms as a profession.
The constant recurrence of sudden deaths before
his eyes had produced an effect on him differing
greatly from that, which was the usual moral
consequence
of such scenes, and he had become not
only the most steady, but the most trust-worthy
soldier in his troop.Captain Lawton had
rewarded
his fidelity by making him its orderly.
1*
Followed by Birch, the sergeant proceeded in
silence to the door of the intended prison, and
throwing it open with one hand, held a lantern
with the other to light the pedlar as he entered.
Seating himself on a cask that contained some of
Betty's favorite beverage, the sergeant motioned
to Birch to occupy another in the same manner.
The lantern was placed on the floor, and the
dragoon, after looking his prisoner steadily in the
face, observed
You look as if you would meet death like a
man, and I have brought you to a spot where you
can fix things to suit yourself, and be quiet and
undisturbed.
'Tis a fearful place to prepare for the last
change in, said Harvey, shuddering, and gazing
around his little prison with a vacant eye.
Why, for the matter of that, returned the
veteran
,
It can reckon but little in the great account
where a man parades his thoughts for the last
review
,
so that he finds them fit to pass the muster
of another world.I have a small book here
which I make it a point to read a little in,
whenever
we are about to engage, and I find it a great
strength'ner in time of need. While speaking
he took a bible from his pocket and offered it to
the acceptance of the pedlar. Birch received
the volume with habitual reverence, but there
was an abstracted air about him, and a wandering
of the eye, that induced his companion to think
that alarm was getting the mastery over the
pedlar's
feelingsaccordingly, he proceeded in what
he conceived to be the offices of consolation.
If there's any thing that lies heavy on your
mind, now is the best time to get rid of itif you
have done wrong to any one, I promise you, on
the word of an honest dragoon, to lend you a
helping hand to see them righted.
There are few who have not done so, said
the pedlar, turning his vacant gaze once more on
his companion.
True'tis natural to sinbut it sometimes
happens that a man does, what at other times he
may be sorry for.One would not wish to die
with any very heavy sin on his conscience, after
all.
Harvey had by this time thoroughly examined
the place in which he was to pass the night, and
saw no means of escape. But hope is ever the last
feeling to desert the human breast, and the pedlar
gave the dragoon more of his attention, fixing on
his sun-burnt features such searching looks, that
Sergeant Hollister lowered his eyes before the
wild expression which he met in the gaze of his
prisoner.
I have been taught to lay the burden of my
sins at the feet of my saviour, replied the
pedlar
.
Why, yesall that is well enough, returned
the other; but justice should be done while
there is opportunity.There have been stirring
times in this county since the war began, and
many have been deprived of their rightful goods.
I often times find it hard to reconcile my lawful
plunder to a tender conscience.
These hands, said the pedlar, stretching
forth his meagre bony fingers, and speaking with
an unusual pride, have spent years in toil, but
not a moment in pilfering.
It is well that it is so, said the
honest-hearted
soldier; and no doubt, you now feel it a
great consolationthere are three great sins that
if a man can keep his conscience clear ofwhy,
by the mercy of God, he may hope to pass muster
with the saints in Heaventhey are stealing,
murdering, and desertion.
Thank God! said Birch with fervor, I
have never yet taken the life of a fellow
creature
.
As to killing a man in lawful battle, why that
is no more than doing one's duty, interrupted
the sergeant, who was a close imitator of Captain
Lawton in the field. If the cause is wrong, the
sin of such a deed you know falls on the nation,
and a man receives his punishment here with the
rest of the peoplebut murdering in cold blood
stands next to desertion, as a crime, in the eye of
God.
I never was a soldier, therefore never could
desert, said the pedlar, resting his face on his
hand in a melancholy attitude.
Why, desertion consists of more than quitting
your colours, though that is certainly the worst
kind, continued the dragoon, speaking slowly,
and with some emphasisA man may desert his
country in the hour of her utmost need.
Birch buried his face in both his hands, and his
whole frame shook with violent agitation; the
sergeant regarded him closely, but good feelings
soon got the better of his antipathies, and he
continued more mildly
But still that is a sin which I think may be
forgiven if sincerely repented of; and it matters
but little when or how a man dies, so that he dies
like a christian and a man.I recommend you to
say your prayers, and then get some rest, in order
that you may do both. There is no hope of your
being pardoned, as Colonel Singleton has sent
down the most positive orders to take your life
whenever we met you. Nononothing can
save you.
You say the truth, cried Birch. It is now
too lateI have destroyed my only safeguard.
But
He
will do my memory justice at least.
What safeguard? asked the sergeant, with
awakened curiosity.
'Tis nothing, replied the pedlar, recovering
his natural manner, and lowering his face to
avoid the earnest looks of his companion.
And who is he?
No one, added Harvey, evidently anxious to
say no more.
Nothing and no one, can avail but little now,
said the sergeant, rising to go; lay yourself on
the blanket of Mrs. Flannagan, and get a little
sleepI will call you betimes in the morning,
and from the bottom of my soul, I wish I could be
of some service to you, for I dislike greatly to see
a man hung up like a dog.
Then
you
might save me from this
ignominious
death, said Birch, springing on his feet, and
catching the dragoon by the armAnd, oh!
what will I not give you in reward.
In what manner? asked the sergeant,
looking
at him in surprise.
See, said the pedlar, producing several
guineas
from his person; these are but as nothing
to what I will give you, if you will assist me to
escape.
Was you the man whose picture is on the
gold, I would not listen to such a crime, said
the trooper, throwing the money on the floor with
cool contempt. Gogopoor wretch, and
make your peace with God; for it is he only that
can be of service to you now.
The sergeant took up the lantern, and, with
some indignation in his manner, left the pedlar to
his sorrowful meditations on his approaching fate.
Birch sunk in momentary despair on the pallet of
Betty, while his guardian proceeded to give the
necessary instructions to the sentinels for his safe
keeping.
Suffer no one to speak to your prisoner, and
your life will depend on his not escaping,
Hollister
concluded his injunctions with, to the man
in the shed.
But, said the trooper, my orders are, to let
the washerwoman pass in and out, as she pleases.
Well let her then, but be careful that this
wily pedlar does not get out in the folds of her
petticoats. He then continued his walk, giving
similar orders to all of the sentinels near the
spot.
For some time after the departure of the
sergeant
,
silence prevailed within the solitary prison
of the pedlar, until the dragoon at his door heard
his loud breathings, which soon rose into the
regular
cadence of one in a deep sleep; and the
man continued walking his post, musing on the
indifference
to life which could allow nature its
customary rest, even on the threshold of the
grave. Harvey Birch had, however, been too
long a name held in detestation by every man in
the corps, to suffer any feelings of commiseration
to mingle with these reflections of the sentinel,
and notwithstanding the consideration and
kindness
manifested by the sergeant, there was not
probably another man of his rank in the whole
party who would have discovered equal
benevolence
to the prisoner, or who would not have
imitated
the veteran in rejecting the bribe, although
probably from a less worthy motive. There was
something of disappointed vengeance in the
feelings
of the man who watched the door of the
room, on finding his prisoner enjoying a sleep that
he himself was deprived of, and at his exhibiting
such obvious indifference to the utmost penalty
that military rigor could inflict on all his treason
to the cause of liberty and America. More than
once he felt prompted to disturb this
unwonted
repose of the pedlar by taunts and revilings,
but the discipline he was under, and a secret
sense of shame at its brutality, held him in
subjection
.
His meditations were, however, soon
interrupted
by the appearance of the washerwoman, who
came staggering through the door that
communicated
with the kitchen, muttering execrations
against the servants of the officers who, by their
waggery, had disturbed her slumbers before the
fire. The sentinel understood enough of her
maledictions
to comprehend the case, but all his efforts
to enter into conversation with the enraged
woman
were useless, and he suffered her to enter
her room without explaining that it contained
another inmate. The noise of her huge frame
falling on the bed, was succeeded by a silence that
was soon interrupted by the renewed breathing
of the pedlar, and within a few minutes Harvey
continued to breathe aloud as if no interruption
had occurred. The relief arriving at this
moment
,
the fellow who felt excessively nettled at
the contempt of the pedlar, after communicating
his orders, exclaimed to the other as he returned to
the guard-room
You may keep yourself warm by dancing,
John; the pedlar-spy has tuned his fiddle you
hear, and it will not be long before Betty will
strike up in her turn.
The joke was followed by a general laugh from
the party, who marched on in the performance of
their duty. At this instant the door of the prison
was opened, and Betty re-appeared, staggering
back again towards her former quarters.
Stop, said the sentinel, catching her by her
clothes; are you sure the Spy is not in your
pocket?
Can't you hear the rascal snoring in my room,
you dirty blackguard, sputtered Betty, her whole
frame shaking with the violence of her rage,
and is it so you would sarve a dacent famale
that a man must be put to sleep in the room with
her, you rapscallion.
Pooh! what do you mind a man who's to
be hung in the morning for; you see he sleeps
already; to-morrow he'll take a longer nap.
Hands off, you villain, cried the
washerwoman
,
relinquishing a small bottle that the
fellow
had succeeded in wresting from her. But
I'll go to Captain Jack, and know if it's his orders
to put a hang-gallows spy in my room, ay even in
my widow'd bed, you thief.
Silence, you old Jezebel, said the fellow
with a laugh, taking the bottle from his mouth
to breathe, or you will wake the gentleman
would you disturb a man in his last sleep?
I'll awake Captain Jack, you riprobate
villain
,
and bring him here to see me rightedhe
will punish you all for imposing on a dacent
widow'd body, you marauder.
With these words, which only extorted a laugh
from the sentinel, Betty staggered round the end
of the building, and made the best of her way
towards
the quarters of her favourite, Captain John
Lawton, for redress. Neither the officer nor the
woman, however, appeared during the night, both
being differently employed, and nothing further
occurred to disturb the repose of the pedlar, who,
to the astonishment of the sentinel, continued
apparently
,
by his breathing, to manifest how little
the gallows could affect his slumbers.
CHAPTER II.
A Daniel come to judgment! yea, a Daniel!
O wise young judge, how do I honor thee!
Merchant of Venice
.
The
Skinners followed Captain Lawton with
alacrity towards the quarters occupied by the
troop of that gentleman. The captain of
dragoons
had on all occasions manifested so much
zeal for the cause in which he was engagedwas
so regardless of personal danger when opposed to
the enemy, and his stature and stern countenance
contributed so much to render him terrific at such
moments, that they had, in some measure,
procured
him a reputation distinct from the corps in
which he served.His intrepidity was mistaken
for ferocity, and his hasty zeal for the natural love
of cruelty. On the other hand, a few acts of
clemency
,
or more properly speaking, of
discriminating
justice, had with one portion of the
community
acquired for Dunwoodie the character of
undue forbearance.It is seldom that either
popular condemnation or applause falls where it
is merited.
While in the presence of the Major, the leader
of the gang had felt himself under that restraint
which vice must ever experience in the company
of acknowledged virtue, but having left the house,
he at once conceived that he was under the
protection
of a congenial spirit. There was a gravity in
the manner of Lawton, that deceived most of those
who did not know him intimately, and it was a
common saying in his troop, that when the
captain
laughed he was sure to punish. Drawing
VOL. II. 2
near his conductor, therefore, the leader
commenced
,
with inward satisfaction, the following
dialogue
'Tis always well for a man to know his friends
from his enemies.
To this prefatory observation, the captain made
no other than an assenting sound, that could not
be called a word.
I suppose Major Dunwoodie has the good
opinion
of Washington? continued the Skinner in
a low, confidential tone, that rather expressed a
doubt than asked a question.
There are some who think so, returned the
captain ambiguously.
Many of the friends of Congress in this
county
,
the man proceeded, wish the horse was led
by some other officerfor my part if I could only
be covered by a troop now and then, I could do
many an important piece of service to the cause,
that this capture of the pedlar would be nothing
to.
Indeed! said the captain, drawing familiarly
nigh him and lowering his voice, such as what?
For the matter of thatit could be made as
profitable to the officer, as it would be to us who
did it, said the Skinner, with a look of the most
significant meaning.
But how? asked Lawton, a little
impatiently
,
and quickening his step to get out of the
hearing
of the rest of the party.
Why near hand to the Royal lines, even
under
the very guns of the heights, might be good
picking if we had a force to guard us from De
Lancey's men, and to cover our retreat from
being cut off by the way of King's-Bridge.
I thought the refugees took all that game to
themselves, said the captain.
They do a little at it, but are obliged to be
sparing among their own people, returned the
fellow in perfect confidence. I have been down
twice under an agreement with them: the first
time they acted with honourbut the second they
came upon us and drove us off, and took the
plunder to themselves.
That was a very dishonourable act indeed,
said Lawton; I wonder that you associate with
such rascals.
It is necessary to have an understanding with
some of them, or we might be taken, returned
the Skinner. But a man without honour, is
worse than a brutedo you think Major
Dunwoodie
is a man to be trusted?
You mean on honourable principles, said
Lawton.
Certainyou know Arnold was thought well
of, until the Royal Major was taken.
Why I do not believe Dunwoodie would sell
his command as Arnold wished to, said the
captain
;
neither do I think him exactly trust-worthy
in a delicate business like yours.
That's just my notion, rejoined the Skinner,
with a self-approving manner that showed how
much he was satisfied with his own estimate of
character.
By this time they had arrived at a better sort of
farm house, the very extensive out-buildings of
which were in tolerable repair for the times.
The barns were occupied by the men of the
troop in their clothes, while their horses were
arranged under the long sheds which protected
the yard from the cold north wind, and were
quietly
eating, with their saddles on their backs, and
bridles thrown on their necks, ready to be bitted
at the shortest warning. Lawton excused
himself
for a moment to the Skinner and entered his
quarters. He soon returned holding in his hand
one of the common lanterns used by the men
when working on their steeds, and led the way
towards the large orchard that surrounded the
buildings on three sides. The gang followed the
leader in silence, who suspected the object to be the
facility of communicating further on this
interesting
topic without the danger of being overheard.
Approaching the captain, he renewed the
discourse
with a view of establishing further
confidence
,
and giving his companion a more
favourable
opinion of his intellects.
Do you think the colonies will finally get the
better of the King? he inquired with a little of
the importance of a politician.
Get the better! echoed the captain, with
impetuositythen checking himself, he
continued
,
no doubt they willif the French will
give us arms and money; we can drive the Royal
troops out in six months.
Well so I hope we will soon, said the
Skinner
hastily, being conscious of his having
meditated
joining the refugees for some time, and then
we shall have a free government, and we, who
fight for it, will get our reward.
Oh! cried Lawton, your claims will be
indisputable
,
while all these vile tories, who live at
home peaceably to take care of their farms, will
be held in the contempt they merit. You have
no farm I suppose?
Not yetbut it will go hard if I do not find
one before the peace is made.
Right; study your own interests and you study
the interests of your countrypress the point of
your own services, and rail at the tories, and I'll
bet my spurs against a rusty nail, that you get to
be a county-clerk at least.
Don't you think Paulding's party were fools
in not letting the Royal Adjutant-General
escape
?
said the man, thrown off his guard by the
freedom of the captain's manner.
Fools! cried Lawton, with a bitter laugh;
Ay fools indeedKing George would have paid
them better, for he is richer. He would have
made them gentlemen for their lives. But, thank
God, there is a pervading spirit in the people that
seems miraculous. Men who have nothing, act
as if the wealth of the Indies depended on their
fidelityall are not villains like yourself, or we
should have been slaves to England years ago.
How! exclaimed the Skinner, starting back
and dropping his musket to the level of the other's
breast, am I betrayed thenand are you my
enemy!
Miscreant! shouted Lawton, his sabre
ringing
in its steel scabbard as he struck the musket
of the fellow from his hands, offer but again to
point your gun at me, and I'll cleave you to the
middle.
And you will not pay us then, Captain
Lawton
?
asked the Skinner, trembling, and noticing
a party of mounted dragoons silently encircling
the whole party.
O! pay you--yesyou shall have the full
measure of your rewardthere is the money that
Colonel Singleton sent down for the captors of the
Spy, throwing a bag of guineas with disdain at
the other's feet. But ground your arms, you
rascals, and see that the money is truly told.
The intimidated band did as they were ordered,
and while they were hastily employed in this
pleasing avocation, a few of Lawton's men
privately
knocked the flints from their muskets.
Well, cried the captain, is it righthave
you the promised reward?
There is just the money, said the leader,
2*
and we will now go to our homes with your
permission
.
Hold! returned Lawton, with his usual
gravity
;
so much to redeem our promisenow for
justice; we pay you for taking a Spy, but we
punish you for burning, robbing, and murdering
seize them, my lads, and give them each the Law
of Moses--forty save one.
This command was given to no unwilling
listeners
,
and in the twinkling of an eye the Skinners
were stripped and fastened, by the halters of the
party, to as many of the apple-trees as was
necessary
to furnish one to each of the gang; swords
were quickly drawn, and fifty branches cut from
the trees like magic: from these were selected a
few of the most supple of the twigs, and a willing
dragoon was soon found to wield each of these
new weapons. Captain Lawton gave the word,
humanely cautioning his men not to exceed the
discipline prescribed by the Mosaic Law, and
directly the uproar of Babel commenced in the
orchard. The cries of the leader were easily to
be distinguished above those of his men, and the
circumstance might be accounted for, by Captain
Lawton's reminding his corrector that he had to
deal with an officer, and he should remember and
pay him unusual honour. The flagellation was
executed with great neatness and despatch, and
was distinguished by no irregularity excepting that
none of the disciplinarians began to count until
they had tried their whips by a dozen or more
blows, by the way, as they said themselves, of
finding out the proper places to strike. As soon
as this summary operation was satisfactorily
completed
,
Lawton directed his men to leave the
Skinners to replace their own clothes, and to
nount their horses, as they were a party who had
been detailed for the purpose of patroling lower
down in the county.
You see, my friend, said the captain to the
leader of the Skinners, after he had prepared himself
to depart, I can cover you to some purpose when
necessary. If we meet often, you will be covered
with scars, which, if not very honourable, will be
at least merited.
The fellow made no reply, but was busy with
his musket, and hastening his comrades to march;
when, every thing being ready, they proceeded
sullenly towards some rocks, at no great distance,
which were overhung by a deep wood. The
moon was just rising, and the group of dragoons
could easily be distinguished where they had been
left. Suddenly turning, the whole gang levelled
their pieces and drew the triggers. The action
was noticed and the snapping of the locks was
heard by the soldiers, who returned their futile
attempt with a laugh of derisionthe captain
crying aloud
Ah! rascals, I know you--and have taken
away your flints.
You should have taken away the one in my
pocket too, shouted the leader, firing his gun in
the next instant. The bullet grazed the ear of
Lawton, who laughed as he shook his head, and
said, a miss was as good as a mile. One
of the dragoons had noticed the preparations of
the Skinner, who had been left alone by the rest
of his gang, as soon as they had made their
abortive
attempt at revenge, and was in the act of
plunging his spurs in his horse as the fellow fired.
The distance to the rocks was but small, yet the
speed of the horse compelled the leader to
abandon
both money and musket, to effect his escape.
The soldier returned with his prizes and offered
them to the acceptance of his captain, but
Lawton
rejected them coolly, telling the man to retain
them himself, until the Skinner appeared in
person
to claim his property. It would have been a
business of no small difficulty for any tribunal
then existing in the new states, to have enforced
a decree of restitution of the money, for it was
shortly after most equitably distributed by the
hands of Sergeant Hollister, among a troop of
horse. The patrole departed, and the captain
slowly returned to his quarters, with an intent of
retiring to rest. A figure moving rapidly among
the trees in the direction of the wood, whither the
Skinners had retired, caught his eye, and, wheeling
on his heel, the cautious partisan approached it,
and to his astonishment saw the washerwoman at
that hour of the night, and in such a place.
What, Betty!walking in your sleep, or
dreaming while awake, cried the astonished
trooper, are you not afraid of meeting with the
ghost of ancient Jenny in this her favourite
pasture
?
Ah, sure, Captain Jack, returned the suttler
in her native accent, and reeling in a manner that
made it difficult for her to raise her head, its
not Jenny, or her ghost, that I'm seekingbut some
yarbs for the wounded. And its the vartue of the
rising moon, as it jist touches them, that I want.
They grow under yon rocks, and thither I must
hasten or the charm will lose its power.
Fool, you are fitter for your pallet than
wandering
among those rocksa fall from one of them
would break your bonesbesides, the Skinners
have fled to those heights, and should they see
you, would revenge on you a flogging they have
but just now received from me. Better return
old woman, and finish your napwe march in the
morning, I hear.
Betty disregarded his advice, and continued her
devious route to the hill side. For an instant, as
Lawton mentioned the Skinners, she had paused,
but immediately resumed her course, and was
soon out of sight among the trees.
On entering his quarters, the sentinel at the
door inquired if he had met Mrs. Flannaganand
told his captain she had passed there, filling the
air with threats against her tormentors at the
Hotel, and inquiring for the captain in search
of redress. Lawton heard the man in
astonishment
appeared
struck with a new idea--walked
several yards towards the orchard, and returned
again; for several minutes he paced rapidly to
and fro before the door of the house, and then
hastily entered it, threw himself on a bed in his
clothes, and was soon in a profound sleep.
In the mean time the gang of marauders had
successfully gained the summit of the rocks, and
scattering in every direction buried themselves in
the depths of the wood. Finding, however, they
were unpursued, a thing which was impracticable
for horse, the leader ventured to call his band
together
with a whistle, and in a short time
succeeded
in collecting his discomfited party at a point
where they had but little to apprehend from this
new enemy.
Well, said one of the fellows, while a fire
was lighting to protect them against the air, which
was becoming severely cold, there is an end to
our business in West-Chester. The Virginia
horse will soon make the county too hot to hold
us.
I'll have his blood, muttered the leader,
if I die for it the next instant.
Oh, you are very valiant here in the wood,
cried the other with a savage laugh; why did
you, who boast so much of your aim, miss your
man just now, at thirty yards?
'Twas the horseman that disturbed me, or I
would have ended this Captain Lawton on the
spotbesides, the cold had set me a shivering,
and I had no longer a steady hand.
Say it was fear, and you will tell no lie, said
his comrade, with a sneer. For my part, I think
I shall never be cold againmy back burns as if
a thousand gridirons were laid on it, and that not
very gently.
And you would tamely submit to such usage,
and kiss the rod that beat you?
As for kissing the rod, it would be no easy
matter I'm thinking, returned the other. Yes,
mine was broke into such small pieces on my own
shoulders, that it would be difficult to find one big
enough to kiss; but I would rather submit to
losing half my skin, than to losing the whole of it,
with my ears in the bargain. And such will be
our fates if we tempt this mad Virginian again.
God willing, I would at any time give him enough
of my hide to make a pair of Jack books, to get
out of his hands with the remainder. If you had
known when you were well off, you would have
stuck to Major Dunwoodie, who don't know half
so much of our evil-doings.
Silence, you talking fool, shouted the
enraged
leader; your prating nonsense is sufficient
to drive a man madis it not enough to be robbed
and beaten, but we must be tormented with your
follyhelp to get out the provisions, if any is left
in the wallet, and try and stop your mouth with
food.
This injunction was obeyed, and the whole
party
,
amidst sundry groans and contortions, excited
by the disordered state of their backs, made their
arrangements for a scanty meal.A large fire of
dry wood was burning in the cleft of a rock, and at
length they began to recover in some measure
from the confusion of their flight, and collect their
scattered senses. Their hunger appeased, and
many of their garments thrown aside for the
better
opportunity of dressing their wounds, the gang
began to plot measures of revenge.An hour was
spent in this manner, and various expedients were
proposed, but as they all depended a good deal on
personal prowess for their success, and were
attended
by great danger, they were of course
rejected. There was no possibility of
approaching
the troops by surprise, their vigilance being
ever on the watch; and the hope of meeting
Captain Lawton away from his men was equally
forlorn, for the trooper was constantly engaged in
his duty, and his movements were so rapid, that
any opportunity of meeting with him at all
must depend greatly on accident. Besides, it was
by no means certain, that such an interview would
result happily for themselves. The cunning of
the trooper was notorious, and rough and broken
as was West-Chester, the fearless partisan was
known to take desperate leaps, and stone walls
were but slight impediments before the charges of
the Southern horse. Gradually, the conversation
took another direction, until the gang determined
on a plan which should both revenge-themselves,
and at the same time offer some additional
stimulus
to their exertions. The whole business was
accurately discussed, the time fixed, and the
manner
adoptedin short, nothing was wanting to the
previous arrangement for this deed of villainy,
when they were aroused by a voice calling
aloud
This way Captain Jackhere are the rascals
ating by a firethis way, and murder the thieves
where they sitquick, lave your horses and shoot
your pistols.
This terrific summons was enough to disturb
the philosophy of the gang entirely, and springing
on their feet, they rushed deeper into the wood,
and having already agreed upon a place of
rendezvous
previously to their intended expedition,
they dispersed towards the four quarters of the
heavenscertain sounds and different voices were
heard calling to each other, but as the marauders
were well trained to speed of foot, they were soon
lost in the distance.
It was not long before Betty Flannagan emerged
from the darkness, and very coolly took possession
of what the Skinners had left in their flightthese
were food, and divers articles of dress. The
washerwoman deliberately seated herself, and
made a meal with great apparent satisfaction; for
an hour she sat with her head upon her hand in
deep musing, then gathered together such articles
of the clothes as seemed to suit her fancy, and
retired into the wood by herself; leaving the fire
to throw its glimmering light on the adjacent
rocks, until its last brand died away, and the place
was abandoned to solitude and darkness.
CHAPTER III.
Thou rising sun, whose glandsome ray,
Invites my fair to rural play,
Dispel the mist, and clear the skies,
And bring my Orra to my eyes.
No longer then perplex thy breast,
When thoughts torment, the first are best;
Tis mad to go, 'tis death to stay,
Away, to Orra, haste away.
Lapland Love Song
.
While
his comrades where sleeping, in perfect
forgetfulness of their hardships and dangers, the
slumbers of Dunwoodie were broken and unquiet.
After spending a night of restlessness, he arose
unrefreshed from the rude bed where he had
thrown himself in his clothes, and without awaking
any of the group around him, wandered into the
open air in search of relief. The soft rays of the
moon were just passing away in the more distinct
light of the morning; the wind had fallen, and the
rising mists gave the promise of another of those
autumnal days, which, in this unstable climate,
succeed a tempest with the rapid transition of
magic. The hour had not arrived when he
intended
moving from his present position; and
willing to allow his warriors all the refreshment
that circumstances would permit, he strolled
towards
the scene of the Skinners' punishment,
musing
upon the embarrassments of his situation,
and uncertain how he should reconcile his sense
of manly delicacy to his love.Added to this
dilemma
,
was the dangerous situation of Henry
Wharton. Although Dunwoodie himself placed
the most implicit reliance on the captain's purity
VOL. II. 3
of intention, he was by no means assured that a
board of officers would be equally credulous, and
independent of all feelings of private regard, he
felt certain that with the execution of Henry
would be destroyed all hopes of an union with his
sister. He had despatched an officer the
preceding
evening to Col. Singleton, who was in
command
in the advanced posts, reporting the capture
of the British Captain, and, after giving his own
opinion of his innocence, requesting orders as to
the manner in which he was to dispose of his
prisoner
.
These orders might now be expected
every hour, and his uneasiness increased, in
proportion
as the moment approached when his friend
might be removed from his protection. In this
disturbed state of mind the Major wandered
through the orchard, and was stopped in his walk
by arriving at the base of those rocks which had
protected the Skinners in their flight, before he
was conscious whither his steps had carried him.
He was about to turn, and retrace his path to
his quarters, when he was startled with a voice
bidding him to
Stand or die.
Dunwoodie turned in amazement, and beheld
the figure of a man placed at a little distance
above him on a shelving rock, with a musket in
his hands that was levelled at himself. The light
was not yet sufficiently powerful to reach the
recesses
of that gloomy spot, and a second look was
necessary before he discovered, to his
astonishment
,
that it was the pedlar who stood before him.
Comprehending in an instant the danger of his
situation, and disdaining to implore mercy or to
retreat, had the latter been possible, the youth
cried firmly
If I am to be murdered, fire; for I will never
become your prisoner.
No, Major Dunwoodie, said Birch, lowering
his musket, it is neither my intention to capture
nor to slay.
What then would you have, mysterious
being
,
said Dunwoodie, hardly able to persuade
himself that the form he saw was not a creature of
the imagination.
Your good opinion, answered the pedlar with
emotion; I would wish all good men to judge
me with lenity.
To you it must be indifferent what may be the
judgement of men on your actions, said the
Major
,
gazing around him in continued surprise;
for you seem to be beyond the reach of their
sentence.
God spares the lives of his servants to his own
time, said the pedlar solemnly:  'Tis but a
few hours and I was your prisoner, and threatened
with the gallows; now you are mine; but, Major
Dunwoodie, you are free. There are those
abroad who would treat you less kindly. Of what
service would that sword be to you against my
weapon and a steady hand? Take the advice of
one who has never harmed you, and who never
will. Do not trust yourself in the skirts of any
wood, unless in company and mounted.
And have you comrades who have assisted you
to escape, said Dunwoodie, and who are less
generous than yourself?
Nonocried Harvey, clasping his hands
wildly, and speaking with bitter melancholy, I
am alone trulynone know me but my God and
Him
.
And who? asked the Major, with an
interest
he could not control.
None, continued the pedlar, recovering his
composure. But such is not your case, Major
Dunwoodie; you are young and happy; there are
those that are dear to you, and such are not far
awaydanger is near them you love most
danger
within and without;double your
watchfulness
strengthen
your patrolesand be silent
with your opinion of me, should I tell you more
you would suspect an ambush. But remember
and guard those you love best.
The pedlar discharged the musket in the air,
and threw it at the feet of his astonished auditor;
and when the surprise and smoke suffered
Dunwoodie
to look again on the rock where he had
stood, the spot was vacant.
The youth was aroused from the stupor which
had been created by this strange scene, by the
trampling of horses and the sound of the bugles.
A patrole was drawn to the spot by the report of
the musket, and the alarm had been given to the
corps. Without entering into any explanation
with his men, the Major returned quickly to his
quarters, where he found the whole squadron
under
arms, in battle array, impatiently awaiting the
appearance of their leader. The officer, whose
duty it was to superintend such matters, had
directed
a party to lower the sign of the Hotel
Flannagan, and the post was already arranged for
the execution of the Spy. On hearing from the
major that the musket was discharged by himself,
and was probably another dropped by the Skinners,
(for by this time Dunwoodie had learnt the
punishment
inflicted by Lawton, but chose to
conceal
his interview with Birch,) his officers
suggested
the propriety of executing their prisoner
before they marched. Unable to believe all he
had seen was not a dream, Dunwoodie, followed
by many of his officers, and preceded by Sergeant
Hollister, went to the place which was supposed
to contain this mysterious pedlar.
Well, sir, said the major, sternly, to the
sentinel
who guarded the door, I suppose you have
your prisoner in safety.
He is yet asleep, replied the man, and
makes such a noise I could hardly hear the bugles
sound the alarm.
Open the door and bring him forth, said
Dunwoodie to the sergeant.
The order was obeyed, so far as circumstances
would allow; but, to the utter amazement of the
honest veteran, he found the room in no little
disorderthe coat of the pedlar was where his
body ought to have been, and part of the
wardrobe
of Betty was scattered in disorder on the
floor. The washerwoman herself occupied the
pallet in a profound mental oblivion, in all her
clothes excepting the little black bonnet, which
she so constantly wore, that it was commonly
thought she made it perform the double duty of
both day and night cap. The noise of their
entrance
,
and the exclamations of the party, awoke
the woman, and rising, she exclaimed hastily
Is it the breakfast that's wanting? Well, faith,
you look as if you would ate myselfbut patience
a little, darlings, and you'll see sich a fry as never
was.
Fry! echoed the sergeant, forgetful of his
religious
philosophy and the presence of his
officers
,
we'll have you roasted, you jadeyou've
helped that damn'd pedlar to escape.
Jade, back again in your teeth, and damn'd
pedlar too, Mister Sargeant, cried Betty, who
was easily roused; what have I to do with
pedlar's
or escapes. I might have been a pedlar's
lady and worn my silks, if I'd had Sawny M`Twill,
instead of tagging at the heels of a parcel of
dragooning
rapscallions, who don't know how to trate
a lone body with dacency.
The fellow has left my bible, said the
veteran
,
3*
taking the book from the floor; in place of
spending his time in reading it to prepare for his
end, like a good Christian, he has been busy in
labouring to escape.
And who would stay and be hung like a dog,
cried Betty, beginning to comprehend the case;
'Tis'nt every one that's born to meet with sich
an indlike yourself, Mister Hollister.
Silence! said Dunwoodie, this must be
inquired into closely, gentlemen; there is no
outlet
but the door, and there he could not pass,
unless
the sentinel connived at his escape or was
asleep on his postcall up all the guard?
As these men were not paraded, curiosity had
already drawn them to the place, and they all
denied that any person had passed out, excepting
one, and he acknowledged that Betty had gone
by him, but pleaded his orders in justification.
You lie, you thiefyou lie! shouted Betty,
who had impatiently listened to his exculpation;
would you slanderize a lone woman, by saying
she walks a camp at midnight?Here have I been
sleeping the long night as sweetly as the sucking
babe.
Here, sir, said the sergeant, turning
respectfully
to Dunwoodie, is something written in my
bible that was not in it before; for having no
family
to record, I would never suffer any scribbling
in the sacred book.
One of the officers read aloudThese
certify
,
that if suffered to get free, it is by God's help
alone, to whose divine aid I humbly recommend
myself. I'm forced to take the woman's clothes,
but in her pocket is a recompense. Witness my
handHarvey Birch.
What! roared Betty, in consternation, has
the thief robbed a lone woman of her allhang
himcatch him and hang him, major, if there's
law or justice in the land.
Examine your pocket, said one of the
youngsters
,
who was enjoying the scene, careless of the
cause or its consequences.
Ah! faith, cried the washerwoman,
producing
a guinea; but he is a jewel of a pedlar
long life and a brisk trade to him say Ihe is
welcome to the dudsand if he is ever hung, many
a bigger rogue will go free.
Dunwoodie turned to leave the apartment, and
saw Captain Lawton standing with folded arms,
contemplating the scene in profound silence.
His manner, so different from his usual
impetuosity
and zeal, struck his commander as singular
their eyes met, and they walked together for a
few minutes in close conversation, when
Dunwoodie
returned and dismissed the guard to their
place of rendezvous. Sergeant Hollister,
however
,
continued alone with Betty, who having
found none of her vestments disturbed but such as
the guinea more than paid for, was in high
good-humour
for the interview. The washerwoman had
for a long time looked on the veteran with the
eyes of affection, and had secretly determined
within herself to remove the dangers from a lone
woman, by making the sergeant the successor of
her late husband. For some time the trooper had
seemed to flatter her preference, and Betty
conceiving
that her violence had mortified the
feelings
of her lover, was determined to make him
all the amends in her power. Besides, rough
and uncouth as she was, the washerwoman had
still enough of her sex to know that the moments
of reconciliation were the moments of her power.
She, therefore, poured out a glass of her morning
beverage, and handed it to her companion as she
observed
A few warm words between friends are a
trifle
,
you must be knowing, sargeant. It was
Michael
Flannagan that I ever calumnated the most
when I was loving him the best.
Michael was a good soldier and a brave man,
said the warrior, finishing the glass; our troop
was covering the flank of his regiment when he
fell, and I rode over his body myself more than
once during the daypoor fellow, he lay on his
back, and looked as composed as if he had died a
natural death after a year's consumption.
Oh! Michael was a great consumer, and be
sartain, said the disconsolate widow; two like
us make dreadful inroads in the stock, sargeant.
But you're a sober, discrate man, Mister
Hollister
,
and would be a help-mate indeed.
Why, Mrs. Flannagan, said the veteran with
great solemnity, I've tarried to speak on a
subject
that lies heavy at my heart, and will now
open my mind, if you've leisure to listen.
Is it listen? cried the impatient woman;
and I'd listen to you, sargeant, if the officers
never
ate another mouthfulbut take another drop,
dearand it will incourage you to spake freely.
I am already bold enough in so good a cause,
returned the veteran, rejecting her bounty; but,
Betty, do you think it was really the Pedlar-Spy
that I placed in this room the last night?
And who should it be else, darling?
The evil-one.
What, the divil?
Ay, even Belzebub, disguised as the pedlar,
and those fellows we thought to be Skinners were
his imps, said the sergeant, with a most
portentous
gravity in his countenance.
Well sure, sargeant, dear, said Betty, you
are but little out this time, any wayfor if the
divil's imps go at large in the county
West-Chester
,
sure it is the Skinners themselves.
No, but Mrs. Flannagan, interrupted her
companion
,
I mean in their incarnate spiritsthe
evil one knew that there was no one we would
arrest sooner than the pedlar, Birch, and took on
his appearance to gain admission to your room.
And what should the divil be wanting of me,
cried Betty, tartly, and isn't there divils enough
in the corps already, without one's coming from
the bottomless pit to frighten a lone body.
'Twas, 'twas in mercy to you, Betty, that he
came. You see he vanish'd through the door in
your form, which is a symbol of your fate, unless
you mend your life. Oh! I noticed how he
trembled
when I gave him the good book. Would any
christian, think you, my dear Betty, write in a bible
in this way; unless it might be the matter of births
and deaths, and such like chronicles?
The washerwoman was pleased with the
softness
of her lover's manner, but dreadfully
scandalized
at his insinuation: she, however,
preserved
her temper, and, with the quickness of her own
country's people, rejoined
And would the divil have paid for the clothes,
think ye. Aye! and overpaid.
Doubtless, the money is base, said the
sergeant
,
a little staggered at such an evidence of
honesty
in one he thought so meanly of. He
tempted
me with his glittering coin, but the Lord gave
me strength to resist.
The goold looks well, said the washerwoman,
But I'll change it, any way, with Captain Jack,
the dayhe is nivir a bit afeard of any divil of
them all.
Betty, Betty, said her companion, do not
speak so disreverently of the evil spirit, he is ever
at hand, and will owe you a grudge for your
language
.
Pooh! if he has any bowels at all, he won't
mind a fillip or two from a poor lone woman,
returned
the washerwoman. I'm sure no other
christian would.
But the dark one has no bowels, except to
devour the children of men, said the sergeant,
looking around him in horror, and it's best to
make friends every where; for there is no telling
what may happen 'till it comes. But, Betty, no
man could have got out of this place, and passed
all the sentinels, without being knowntake
awful
warning from the visit, therefore.
Here the dialogue was interrupted by a
summons
to the suttler to prepare her mornings
repast
,
and they were obliged to separate, the
woman
secretly hoping that the interest the sergeant
manifested for her was more earthly than he
imagined
,
and the man, bent on saving a soul from the
fangs of the dark spirit, that was prowling through
their camp, in quest of victims.
During the breakfast, several expresses arrived,
one of which brought intelligence of the actual
force and destination of the enemy's expedition
that was out on the Hudson, and another, orders
to send Captain Wharton to the first post above,
under the escort of a body of dragoons. These
last instructions, or rather commands, for they
admitted
of no departure from their letter, completed
the sum of Dunwoodie's uneasiness. The despair
and misery of Frances, were constantly before his
eyes, and fifty times he was tempted to throw
himself
on his horse, and gallop to the Locusts, but an
uncontrollable feeling of delicacy prevented him.
In obedience to the commands of his superior, an
officer, with a small party, was sent to the cottage
to conduct Henry Wharton to the place directed,
and the gentleman who was entrusted with the
execution of the order, was charged with a letter
from Dunwoodie to his friend, containing the most
cheering assurances of his safety, as well as the
strongest pledges of his own unceasing exertions
in his favour. Lawton was left in charge of the
few wounded, with part of his own troop, and as soon
as the men were refreshed, the encampment broke
up, and the main body marched towards the
Hudson
.
Dunwoodie repeated, again and again, his
injunctions to Captain Lawtondwelt upon every
word that had fallen from the pedlar, and
canvassed
in every possible manner that his ingenuity
could devise, the probable meaning of his
mysterious
warnings, until no excuse remained for
delaying
his own departure a moment longer.
Suddenly
recollecting, however, that no directions had
been given for the disposal of Colonel Wellmere,
instead of following the rear of his column, the
major yielded to his passions, and turned down the
road which led to the Locusts, attended by hls
own man. The horse of Dunwoodie was fleet as
the wind, and scarcely a minute seem'd to have
passed before he gained a sight, from an eminence,
of the loney vale, and as he was plunging into the
bottom lands that formed its surface, he caught a
glimpse of Henry Wharton, and his escort, defiling
at a distance through a pass which led to the posts
above. This sight added to the speed of the
anxious
youth, who now turned the angle of the hill
that opened to the valley, and came suddenly on
the object of his search. Frances had followed
the party which guarded her brother at a distance,
and as they vanished from her sight she felt as if
deserted by all that she most prized in this world.
The unaccountable absence of Dunwoodie, with
the shock of parting from Henry under such
circumstances
,
had entirely subdued her fortitude,
and she had sunk on a stone by the road-side and
wept as if her heart would break. Dunwoodie
sprung from his charger, bidding his man to lead
him up the road, and in a moment was by the
side of the weeping girl.
Francesmy own Frances! he exclaimed,
why this distresslet not the situation of your
brother create any alarm. As soon as the duty
I am now on is completed, I will hasten to the
feet of Washington, and beg his release. The
Father of his Country will never deny such a boon
to one of his favourite pupils.
Major Dunwoodie, for your interest on
behalf
of my poor brother, I thank you, said the
maid hastily, drying her eyes, and rising with
dignity
.
But such language addressed to me,
surely
is improper.
How! improper! echoed her lover in
amazement
,
are you not mineby the consent of
your fatheryour auntyour brothernay, by
your own consent, my sweet Frances.
I wish not, Major Dunwoodie, to interfere
with the prior claims that any other lady may
have to your affections, said Frances, motioning
to return.
None other, I swear, by Heaven, none other
but yourself has any claim on me, cried
Dunwoodie
with fervour; you alone are mistress of
my inmost soul.
You have practised so much, and so
successfully
,
Major Dunwoodie, that it is no wonder you
excel in deceiving the credulity of my sex, said
the maiden bitterly, attempting a smile which the
tremulousness of her muscles smothered in its
birth.
Am I a villain, Miss Wharton, that you
receive
me with such languagewhen have I ever
deceived you, Franceswho has practised in this
manner on your purity of heart?
Why has not Major Dunwoodie honoured the
dwelling of his intended father with his presence
lately? Did he forget it contained one friend on a
bed of sickness, and another in deep distress? Has it
escaped his memory that it held his intended wife?
Or is he fearful of meeting more than one that
can lay a claim to that title? Oh, Peyton
Peyton
,
how have I been deceived in youwith the
foolish credulity of my youth, I thought you all
that was brave, noble, generous, and loyal.
Frances, I see how it is that you have
deceived
yourself, cried Dunwoodie, his face in a
glow of fire; you do me injustice, I swear by
all that is most dear to me, that you do me
injustice
.
Swear not, Major Dunwoodie, interrupted
the maiden, her fine countenance lighting up with
all the lustre of womanly pride; the time is gone
by for me to credit oaths.
Miss Wharton, would you have me a
coxcomb
,
said her lover, make me
contemptible
in my own eyes, to boast of what may raise
me in your estimation?
Flatter not yourself that the task is so easy,
sir, returned Frances, moving towards the
cottage
;
we converse together, in private, for the
last time;but my father would gladly welcome
my mother's kinsman.
No, Miss Wharton, I cannot enter his
dwelling
now: I should conduct in a manner
unworthy
of myself. You drive me from you, Frances,
in despair. I am going on desperate service, and
may not live to return. Should fortune prove
severe to me, at least do my memory justice;
remember that the last breathing of my soul, will
be for your happiness. So saying he had
already
VOL. II. 4
placed his foot in the stirrup, but his
mistress
turning on him a face that was pallid with
emotion, and an eye that pierced his soul with
its thrilling expression, arrested the action, and
he paused.
PeytonMajor Dunwoodie, she said, can
you ever forget the sacred cause in which you
are enlisted? Your duty both to your God and to
your country, forbid your doing any thing rashly.
The latter has need of your services; besides
but her voice became choked, and she was unable
to proceed.
Besides what? echoed the youth, springing
to her side, and offering to take her hand in his
own. Frances having, however, recovered
herself
,
coldly repulsed him, and continued her walk
homeward.
Miss Wharton, is this our parting! cried
Dunwoodie, in agony; am I a wretch, that you
treat me so cruelly? You have never loved me,
and wish to conceal your own fickleness by
accusations
against me that you will not explain.
Frances stopped short in her walk, and turned
on her lover a look of so much purity and feeling,
that, heart-stricken, Dunwoodie would have knelt
at her feet for pardon; but motioning him for
silence, she once more spoke
Hear me, Major Dunwoodie, for the last time;
it is a bitter knowledge when we first discover our
own inferiority; but it is a truth that I have lately
learnt. Against you I bring no chargesmake no
accusationsno: not willingly in my thoughts.
Were my claims to your heart just, I am not
worthy of you. It is not a feeble, timid girl like
me, that could make you happy. No, Peyton,
you are formed for great and glorious actions,
deeds of daring and renown, and should be united
to a soul like your own: one that can rise above
the weakness of her sex. I should be a weight to
drag you to the dust; but with a different spirit in
your companion, you might soar to the very
pinnacle
of earthly glory. To such an one, therefore,
I resign you freely, if not cheerfully; and pray,
oh! how fervently, that with such an one you may
be happy.
Lovely enthusiast, cried Dunwoodie, you
know not yourself nor me. It is a woman, mild,
gentle, and dependant as yourself that my very
nature lovesdeceive not yourself with visionary
ideas of generosity, which will only make me
miserable
.
Farewell, Major Dunwoodie, said the maid,
pausing for a moment to gasp for breath; forget
that you ever knew meremember the claims of
your bleeding country and be happy.
Happy! repeated the youthful soldier
bitterly
,
as he saw her light form gliding through the
gate of the lawn, and disappearing behind its
shrubbery
;
Oh! yes, I am now happy indeed.
Throwing himself into the saddle, he plunged his
spurs into his horse and soon overtook his
squadron
,
which was marching slowly over the hilly
roads of the county to gain the banks of the
Hudson
.
But painful as were the feelings of
Dunwoodie
at this unexpected termination to the
interview
with his mistress, they were but light
compared
to those which were experienced by the
maiden herself. Frances had, with the keen eye of
jealous love, easily detected the attachment of
Isabella
Singleton to Dunwoodie. Delicate and
retiring
herself as the fairest visions of romance had ever
portrayed her sex, it never could present itself to
the mind of Frances, that this love had been
unsought
.
Ardent in her own affections, and artless
in their exhibition, she had early caught the eye
of the youthful soldier; but it required all the
manly frankness of Dunwoodie to court her
favour
,
and the most pointed devotion to obtain
his conquest. This once donehis power was
durable, entire, and engrossing. But the unusual
occurrences of the few preceding days, the altered
mien of her lover during those events, his
unwonted
indifference to herself, and chiefly the
romantic
idolatry of Isabella, had aroused new
sensations
in her bosom. With a dread of her lover's
integrity had been awakened the never-failing
concomitant of the purest affectiona distrust of
her own merits. In the moment of enthusiasm,
the task of resigning her lover to another, who
might be more worthy of him, seemed easybut it
is in vain that the imagination attempts to deceive
the heart. Dunwoodie had no sooner
disappeared
,
than our heroine felt all the misery of her
situation; and if the youth found some relief in
the cares of his command from his anxiety of mind,
Frances was less fortunate in the performance of
a duty imposed on her by filial piety.The
removal
of his son had nearly destroyed the little
energy of Mr. Wharton, who required all the
tenderness
of his remaining children to convince him
that he was able to perform the ordinary functions
of life.
CHAPTER IV.
Flatter and praise, commend, extol their graces,
Though ne'er so black, say they have angels' faces;
That man who bath a tongue, I say, is no man,
If with that tongue he cannot win a woman.
Two Gentlemen of Verona
.
In
making the arrangement by which Captain
Lawton had been left, with Sergeant Hollister
and twelve men, as a guard over the wounded and
heavy baggage of the corps, Dunwoodie had
consuited
not only the information which had been
conveyed
in the letter of Col. Singleton, but the
supposed
bruises of his comrade's body. It was in
vain that Lawton had declared himself fit for any
duty that man could perform, or that he had plainly
intimated that his men would never follow Tom
Mason to a charge, with the alacrity and
confidence
with which they followed himself; his
commander
was firm, and the reluctant captain was
compelled to comply with as good a grace as he
could assume. Before parting, Dunwoodie
renewed
his caution to Lawton, to keep a watchful
eye on the inmates of the cottage, and especially
enjoined him, if any movements of a particularly
suspicious nature were noticed in the
neighbourhood
,
to break up from his present quarters, and
move down with his party, and to take possession
of the domains of Mr. Wharton. A vague
suspicion
of danger to the family had been awakened
in the breast of the major, by the language of the
pedlar, although he was unable to refer it to
any particular source, or understand why it was to
be apprehended.
4*
For some time after the departure of the
troops, the captain was walking to and fro,
before
the door of the Hotel, inwardly cursing
his fate that condemned him to an inglorious
idleness
,
at a moment when a meeting with the enemy
might be expected, and replying to the occasional
queries of Betty, who from the interior of the
building
,
ever and anon, demanded in a high tone of
voice, an explanation of various points in the
pedlar's
escape that as yet she could not comprehend.
At this instant he was joined by the surgeon, who
had hitherto been engaged among his patients in
a distant building, and was profoundly ignorant of
every thing that had occurred, even to the
departure
of the troops.
Where are all the sentinels, John, he
inquired
,
as he gazed around with a look of
curiosity
,
and why are you here alone?
Offall off, with Dunwoodie, to the river. Yon
and I are left here to take care of a few sick men,
and some women.
I am glad, however, said the surgeon, that
Major Dunwoodie had consideration enough, not
to move the wounded. Here, you Mrs. Elizabeth
Flannagan, hasten with some food, that I may
appease
my appetite. I have a dead body to dissect,
and am in a hurry.
And here you, Mister Doctor Archibald
Sitgreaves
,
echoed Betty, showing her blooming
countenance from a broken window of the kitchen,
you are ever a coming too late; here is nothing
to ate but the skin of Jenny and the body you are
mintioning.
Woman, said the surgeon, in anger, do you
take me for a cannibal, that you address your
filthy
discourse to me in this manner.I bid you
hasten with such food as may be proper to be
received
into the stomach fasting.
And I'm sure its for a pop-gun that I should be
taking you sooner than for a cannon-ball, said
Betty, winking at the captain, and I tell you that
its fasting you must be, unless you will let me cook
you a steak from the skin of Jenny. The boys
have eaten me up entirely.
Lawton now interfered to preserve the peace,
and assured the surgeon that he had already
despatched
the proper persons in quest of food for
the party. A little mollified with this explanation,
the operator soon forgot his hunger, and declared
his intention of proceeding to business at once.
And where is your subject? asked Lawton,
gravely.
The pedlar, said the other, gazing on the
sign-post; you see I made Hollister put a stage
so high that the neck would not be dislocated by
the fall, and I intend making as handsome a skeleton
of him, as there is in the States of North-America
the fellow has good points, and his bones are
well knit. Oh! Jack, I will make a perfect
beauty
of him. I have long been wanting something
of the sort to send as a present to my old aunt in
Virginia, who was so kind to me when a boy.
The devil! cried Lawton; would you send
the old woman a dead man's bones.
Why not? said the surgeon; what nobler
object is there in nature than the figure of a man
and a skeleton may be called his elementary parts.
But what has been done with the body?
Off too.
Off! echoed the panic stricken operator;
and who has dared to take it away without my
leave.
Sure jist the divil, said Betty; and who'll
be after taking yourself away some of these times
too, without asking your lave.
Silence, you witch, said Lawton, with
difficulty
suppressing a laugh; is this the manner
in which to address an officer.
Who called me the filthy Elizabeth
Flannagan
,
cried the washerwoman, snapping her
fingers
contemptuously. I can remimber a frind for
a year, and don't forgit an inimy for a month.
But the friendship or enmity of Mrs. Flannagan
were alike indifferent to the surgeon, who could
think of nothing but his loss; and Lawton was
obliged to explain to his friend the apparent
manner
in which it happened.
And a lucky escape it was for you, my jewel of
a doctor, cried Betty, as the captain concluded.
Sergeant Hollister, who saw him face to face, as
it might be, says it's Beelzeboob, and no pedlar,
unless
it may be in a small matter of lies and thefts,
and sich wickednesses. Now a pretty figure you
would have been in cutting up Beelzeboob, if the
major had hung him. I don't think it's very asy
he would have been under your knife.
Thus doubly disappointed in both his meal and
his business, Sitgreaves suddenly declared his
intention
of visiting the Locusts, and inquiring
into the state of Captain Singleton. Lawton was
ready for the excursion, and mounting they were
soon on the road, though the surgeon was obliged
to submit to a few more jokes from the
washerwoman
,
before he could get out of hearing. For
some time the two rode in silence, when Lawton
perceiving that his companion's temper was
somewhat
ruffled by his disappointments and Betty's
attack, made an effort to restore the tranquillity of
his feelings, by saying
That was a charming song, Archibald, that
you commenced, last evening, when we were
interrupted
by the party that brought the pedlar. The
allusion to Galen was extremely neat.
I knew you would like it, Jack, when your
eyes were opened to its beauties, returned the
operator, suffering his muscles to relax into a smile;
but when the brain has become confused by the
fumes of wine ascending from the stomach,
intoxication
is liable to ensue, and the faculties by no
means continue qualified to discriminate, either in
matters of taste or of science.
And yet your ode partook largely of both,
observed
Lawton, suffering no part of him to smile
but his eyes.
Ode is by no means a proper term for the
composition, said Sitgreaves. I should rather
term it a classical ballad.
Very probably, said the trooper; hearing
only one verse, it was difficult to affix a name to
it.
The surgeon involuntarily hem'd, and began to
clear his throat, although by no means conscious
himself to what the preparation tended. But the
captain rolling his dark eye towards his
companion
,
and observing him to be sitting with great
uneasiness on his horse, continued
The air is still, and the road solitarywhy
not give me the remainderit might correct the
bad taste you accuse me of possessing, to hear it.
Oh! my dear John, if I thought it would
correct
the errors you have imbibed, from habit and
indulgence, nothing could give me more
pleasure
.
Try; we are fast approaching some rocks on
our leftthe echo from them, I should think, must
be delightful.
Thus encouraged, and somewhat impelled by
the opinion that he both sung and wrote with
exquisite
taste, the surgeon set about complying with
the request in sober earnest. After carefully
removing
his spectacles from his eyes, and wiping
the glasses, they were replaced with the utmost
accuracy and precision; his wig was adjusted to
his head with mathematical symmetry, and his voice
being cleared by various efforts until at length its
melody pleased the exquisite sensibility of his own
earthen, to the no small delight of the trooper,
he begun anew the ditty of the preceding evening.
But whether it was that his steed became
enlivened
by the notes of his master, or that he caught a
disposition to trot from Lawton's charger, the
surgeon
had not concluded his second verse, before
his tones vibrated in regular cadence to the rise
and fall of his own body on the saddle.
Notwithstanding
this somewhat inharmonious interruption,
Sitgreaves resolutely persevered, until he had got
through with the following words
Hast thou ever felt love's dart, dearest,
Or breathed his trembling sigh
Thought him afar, was ever nearest
Before that sparkling eye?
Then hast thou known what 'tis to feel
The pain that Galen could not heal.
Hast thou ever known shame's blush, dearest,
Or felt its thrilling smart
Suffuse thy cheek, like marble, clearest,
As Damon read thy heart?
Then, silly girl, thou'st blush'd to own
A pain that Harvey e'en has known.
But for each pain of thine, dearest,
Or smart of keen love's wound,
For all that, foolish maid, thou fearest,
An antidote is found.
And mighty Hymen's art can heal
Each wound that youthful lovers feel.
Hast thou ever
Hush! interrupted the trooper; what
rustling
noise is that, among the rocks?
The echo.
Hast thou ever
Listen, said Lawton, stopping his horse. He
had not done speaking when a stone fell at his
feet, and rolled harmlessly across the path.
A friendly shot, that, cried the trooper,
neither the weapon, nor its force, implies much
ill will towards us.
Blows from stones seldom produce more than
contusions, said the operator, bending his gaze
in every direction in vain, in quest of the hand
from which the missile had been hurled; it must
be meteoricthere is no living being in sight,
except
ourselves.
It would be easy to hide a regiment behind
those rocks, returned the trooper, dismounting,
and taking the stone in his hand,Oh! here is
the explanation, along with the mystery. So
saying, he tore a piece of paper that had been
ingeniously
fastened to the small fragment of rock
which had thus singularly fallen before him, and
opening it, the captain read the following words
written in no very legible hand.
A musket bullet will go farther than a stone,
and things more dangerous than yarbs for wounded
men, lie hid in the rocks of West-Chester. The
steed may be good, but can he mount a
precipice
?
Thou sayest the truth, strange man, said
Lawton: courage and activity would avail but
little against assassination, and these rugged
passes
.
Remounting his horse, he cried aloud
Thanks, unknown friendyour caution will be
remembered, and it shall never be forgotten that
all my enemies are not merciless.
A meagre hand was extended for an instant over
a rock, waving in the air, and afterwards nothing
further was seen or heard by the soldiers.
Quite an extraordinary interruption, said the
astonished operator, and a letter of a very
mysterious
meaning.
Oh! 'tis nothing but the wit of some bumpkin
who thinks to frighten two of the Virginians by an
artifice of this kind, said the trooper, placing the
billet in his pocket; but let me tell you, Mr.
Archibald Sitgreaves, you were wanting to dissect
just now, a damn'd honest fellow.
It was the pedlarone of the most notorious
spies in the enemy's service, returned the other;
and I must say, that I think it an honour to such
a man to be devoted to the use of science.
He may be a spyhe must be one, said
Lawton, musing; but he has a heart above
enmity
,
and a soul that would honour a gallant
soldier
.
The surgeon turned an inquiring eye on his
companion as he uttered this soliloquy, while the
penetrating looks of the trooper had already
discovered
another pile of rocks, which jutting
forward
,
nearly obstructed the highway that wound
directly around its base.
What the steed cannot mount, the foot of
man can overcome, exclaimed the wary partisan.
Throwing himself again from his saddle, and
leaping
a wall of stone, he began to ascend the hill at
a place which would soon have given him a birds'
eye view of the rocks in question, together with
all their crevices. This movement was no sooner
made than Lawton caught a glimpse of the figure
of a man stealing rapidly from his approach, and
disappearing on the opposite side of the
precipice
.
SpurSitgreavesSpur, shouted the
trooper
,
dashing over every impediment in pursuit,
and murder the villain as he flies.
The request was promptly complied with, and
a few moments brought the surgeon in full
view of a man armed with a musket, who was
crossing the road, and evidently seeking the
protection
of the thick wood on its opposite side.
Stop, my friendstop until Captain Lawton
comes up, if you please, cried the surgeon,
observing
him to flee with a rapidity that baffled his
horsemanship. But as if the invitation contained
new terrors, the footman redoubled his efforts, nor
paused even to breathe, until he had reached his
goal, when, turning his on heel, he discharged his
musket towards the operator, and was out of sight
in an instant. To gain the highway and throw
himself in his saddle detained Lawton but a
moment
,
and he rode to the side of his comrade just
as the figure had disappeared.
Which way has he fled? cried the trooper.
John, said the surgeon, am I not a
noncombatant
?
Whither has the rascal fled? cried Lawton
again, impatiently.
Where you cannot followinto that wood,
returned the surgeon. But I repeat, John, am I
not a non-combatant?
The disappointed trooper perceiving that his
enemy had escaped him, now turned his eyes,
which were flashing with anger under his dark
brows, upon his comrade, and gradually his
muscles
lost their rigid compression, his brow relaxed
and his eyes changed from their fierce expression,
to the covert laughter which so often distinguished
that organ in the trooper. The surgeon sat in
dignified composure on his horse; his thin body
erect, and head elevated with all the indignity of
conscious injustice towards himselfhis
spectacles
had been shaken down to the extreme end of
the ample member on which they rested, and his
eyes were glaring above them with the fullness
of indignation.
A slight convulsive effort composed the muscles
of the trooper's face, however, and he broke the
silence again, by saying
5
Why did you suffer the rascal to escapehad you
but brought him within the reach of my sabre, I
would have given you a substitute for the pedlar.
'Twas impossible to prevent it, said the
surgeon
,
pointing to the bars, before which he had
stopped his horse; he threw himself on the other
side of this fence, and left me where you seenor
would the man in the least attend to my
remonstrances
,
or intimation that you wished to hold
discourse
with him.
No! exclaimed Lawton, in an affected
surprise
;
he was truly a discourteous rascal; but
why did you not leap the fence, and compel him
to a haltyou see but three of the bars are up, and
Betty Flannagan could clear them, on her cow.
The surgeon, for the first time, withdrew his eyes
from the place where the fugitive had
disappeared
,
and turned his countenance towards his
comrade
.
His head, however, was not permitted to
lower itself in the least, as he replied
I humbly conceive, Captain Lawton, that
neither
Mrs. Elizabeth Flannagan, nor her cow, are
examples to be emulated by Doctor Archibald
Sitgreavesit would be but a sorry compliment
to science to say that a Doctor of Medicine had
fractured both his legs, by injudiciously striking
them against a pair of bar-posts. While
speaking
,
the surgeon raised the limbs in question to
a nearly horizontal position, that really
appeared
to bid defiance to any thing like a passage for
himself through the defile; but the trooper,
disregarding
this ocular proof of the impossibility of
the movement, cried hastily
Here was nothing to stop you man; I could
leap a platoon through, boot and thigh, without
pricking with a single spur. Pshaw, I have often
charged upon the bayonets of infantry over
greater
difficulties than this.
You will please to remember, Captain John
Lawton, said the surgeon, with a most imposing
air of offended dignity, that I am not the riding
master to the regimentnor a drill sergeantnor
a crazy cornetno, sirand I speak it with a due
respect for the commission of the continental
Congress
nor
an inconsiderate captain who regards
his own life as little as that of his enemies. I am
only, sir, a poor, humble man of letters, a mere
Doctor of Medicine, an unworthy graduate of
Edinburgh, and a surgeon of dragoons, nothing
more I do assure you, Captain John Lawton.
So saying, he turned his horse's head towards the
cottage, and re-commenced his ride.
Ay! you speak the truth, muttered the
dragoon
;
had I but the meanest rider of my troop
with me, I should have taken the scoundrel, and
given at least one victim to the offended laws of
my country. But, Archibald, no man can ride
well who straddles in this manner like the
Colossus
of Rhodes. You should depend less on your
stirrup, and keep your seat by the power of the
knee.
With proper deference to your experience,
Captain Lawton, returned the surgeon, I
conceive
myself to be no incompetent judge of
muscular
action, whether in the knee or any other
part of the human frame. And although but
humbly
educated, I am not now to learn, that the
wider the base, the more firm is the
superstructure
.
Yes, but damn it, cried Lawton,
impatiently
,
would you fill a highway in this manner with
one pair of legs, when half a dozen might pass
together in comfortstretching them abroad like
the scythes to the ancient chariot wheels.
The allusion to the practice of the ancients
somewhat softened the indignation of the surgeon,
and he replied with rather less hauteur
You should speak with reverence of the
usages of those who have gone before us, and
who, however ignorant they were in matters of
science, and particularly that of surgery, yet
furnished
many brilliant exceptions to the
superstitions
of the day. Now, sir, I have no doubt that
Galen has operated on wounds occasioned by
these very scythes that you mention, although we
can find no evidence of the fact in cotemporary
writers. Ah! they must have given dreadful
injuries
,
and I doubt not, caused great uneasiness to
the medical gentlemen of that day.
There could not have been much science
displayed
,
I think, returned the trooper,
collecting
himself into his usual manner; and
occasionally a body must have been left in two
pieces, to puzzle the ingenuity of those gentry to
unite. Yet doubtless they did it.
What! cried the operator in amazement,
unite two parts of the human body that have
been severed by an edged instrument, to any of
the purposes of animal life?
That have been rent asunder by a scythe, and
united to do military duty, said Lawton.
'Tis impossiblequite impossible, cried the
surgeon; it is in vain, Captain Lawton, that
human ingenuity endeavours to baffle the efforts
of nature. Think, my dear sir, in this case you
separate all the arteriesinjure all of the
intestines
sever
all of the nerves and sinews, and,
what is of more consequence, you
Enough, said Lawton, waving his hand;
you have said enough, Dr. Sitgreaves, and I am
convinced. Nothing shall ever tempt me
willingly
to submit to be divided in this irretrievable
mannera manner, I say, Dr. Sitgreaves, that
puts at defiance all the arts of surgery.
Truemost true, my dear John, cried the
surgeon with warmth, and forgetting his
displeasure
;
it removes all the pleasure of a wound,
when you find it beyond the reach of science to
heal.
I should think so, said Lawton, rather drily.
What do you think is the greatest pleasure in
life? asked the operator suddenly, and with all
his confidence in his companion restored.
That may be difficult to answer.
Not at all, cried the surgeon; it is in
witnessing
,
or rather feeling, the ravages of disease
repaired by the lights of science co-operating with
nature. I once broke my little finger
intentionally
,
in order that I might reduce the fracture
and watch the cure; it was only on a small scale,
you know, dear John; still I think the thrilling
sensation
,
excited by the knitting of the bone, aided
by the contemplation of the art of man thus
acting
in unison with nature, exceeded any other
enjoyment
that I have ever experienced. Oh! had
it been one of the more important members, such
as the leg or arm, how much greater must the
pleasure have been.
Or the neck, said the trooper; but their
discourse
was interrupted by their arrival at the
cottage
of Mr. Wharton. No one appearing to usher
them into an apartment, the captain proceeded to
the door of the parlour, where he knew visitors
were commonly shown. On opening it, he paused
for a moment, in admiration, at the scene within.
The person of Col. Wellmere first met his eye,
bending forward towards the figure of the
blushing
Sarah, with an earnestness of manner, that
prevented the noise of Lawton's entrance being
heard by either of the parties. Certain
significant
5*
signs, which were embraced at a glance by
the prying gaze of the trooper, at once made him
a master of their secret, and he was about to
retire
as silently as he had advanced, when his
companion
,
pushing himself through the passage,
abruptly entered the apartment. Advancing
instantly
to the chair of Wellmere, the surgeon
instinctively
laid hold of his arm and exclaimed
Bless mea quick and irregular pulse
flushed cheek and fiery eyestrong febrile
symptoms
,
and such as must be attended to. While
speaking, the doctor, who was much addicted to
practising in a summary way, had already
produced
his lancet, and made certain other
indications
of his intentions to proceed at once to
business
.
But Col. Wellmere, recovering from the
confusion of the surprise, arose from his seat,
rather haughtily, and said
Sir, it is the warmth of the room, that lends
me the colour, and I am already too much
indebted
to your skill to give you any farther
trouble
Miss
Wharton knows that I am quite well,
and I do assure you that I never felt better or
happier in my life.
There was a peculiar emphasis in the latter
part of this speech, that, however it might gratify
the feelings of Sarah, brought the colour to her
cheeks with a redoubled brilliancy, and Sitgreaves,
as his eye followed the direction of those of his
patient, did not fail to observe it.
Your arm, if you please, madam, said the
surgeon promptly, advancing with a bow; anxiety
and watching have done their work on your
delicate
frame, and there are symptoms about you
that must not be neglected.
Excuse me, sir, said Sarah, recovering
herself
with womanly pride, the heat is oppressive,
and I will retire and acquaint Miss Peyton with
your presence.
There was but little difficulty in practising on
the abstracted simplicity of the surgeon; but
it was necessary for Sarah to raise her eyes to
return
the salutation of Lawton, as he bowed his
head to nearly a level with the hand that held
open the door for her passage. One look was
sufficient; she was able to control her steps
sufficiently
to retire with dignity, but no sooner was
she relieved from the presence of all observers,
than she fell into a chair and abandoned herself
to a mingled feeling of shame and pleasure.
A little nettled at the contumacious deportment
of the British colonel, Sitgreaves, after once more
tendering services that were again rejected,
withdrew
to the chamber of young Singleton whither
Lawton had already preceded him.
CHAPTER V.
Oh! Henry, when thou delgn'st to sue,
Can I thy sult withstand?
When thou, lov'd youth, bast won my heart,
Can I refuse my hand?
Hermit of Warkworth.
The
graduate of Edinburgh found his patient
rapidly improving in health, and entirely free
from fever. His sister, with a cheek that was, if
possible, paler than on her arrival, watched around
his couch with vigilant care, and the ladies of the
cottage had not, in the midst of their sorrows and
varied emotions, forgotten to discharge the duties
of hospitality. Frances felt herself impelled
towards
their disconsolate guest, with an interest
for which she could not account, and with a force
that she could not control. The maid had
unconsciously
connected the fates of Dunwoodie and
Isabella in her imagination, and felt, with all the
romantic ardour of a generous mind, that she
was serving her former lover most, by exhibiting
kindness to her he loved best. Isabella received
her attentions with a kind of vacant gratitude, but
neither of them indulged in any allusion to the
latent source of their uneasiness. The observation
of Miss Peyton seldom penetrated beyond things
that were visible, and to her the situation of Henry
Wharton seemed to furnish an awful excuse for
the fading cheeks and tearful eyes of her niece.
If Sarah manifested less of care than her sister,
still the unpractised spinster was not at a loss to
comprehend the reason. Love is a species of
holy feeling with the virtuous of the female sex,
and seems to hallow all that comes within its
influence
.
Although Miss Peyton mourned with
sincerity over the danger which threatened her
nephew, still she indulged her eldest niece, with
motherly kindness, in the enjoyment that chance
had given her early attachment. War she well
knew was a dreadful enemy to love, and the
moments
that were thus granted to his votaries were
not to be thrown away.
Several days now passed without any interruption
to the usual vocations of the inhabitants of the
cottage
,
or the party at the four corners. The
former
were supporting their fortitude with the
certainty
of Henry's innocence, and a strong reliance
on Dunwoodie's exertions in his behalf, and the
latter
waiting with coolness the intelligence that was
hourly expected of a conflict, and their orders to
depart. Captain Lawton, however, waited for
both these events in vain. Letters from his
major
announced that the enemy, finding the party
which was to co-operate with them, had been
defeated and was withdrawn, had retired also
behind the works of Fort Washington, where they
continued inactive, but threatening momentarily
to strike a blow in revenge for their disgrace.
The trooper was enjoined to vigilance, and the
letter concluded with a compliment to his honour,
zeal, and undoubted bravery.
Extremely flattering, Major Dunwoodie,
muttered the dragoon as he threw down this
epistle
,
and stalked across the floor of his room to
quiet his impatience. A proper guard have
you selected for this servicelet me seeI have
to watch over the interests of a crazy, irresolute
old man, who does not know whether he belongs to
us or to the enemy. Four women; three of whom
are well enough in themselves, but who are not
immensely flattered by my society, and the fourth
who, good as she is, is on the wrong side of forty
some two or three blacksa talkative
house-keeper
that does nothing but chatter about gold
and despisables, and signs and omensand poor
George SingletonAh! well a comrade in
suffering
has a claim on a man, next to his honour in the
field, and an engagement with his mistressso
I'll make the best of it.
As he concluded this soliloquy, the trooper took
a seat and began to whistle to convince himself
how little he cared about the matter, when, by
throwing his booted leg carelessly round, he upset
the canteen that held his present stock of brandy.
The accident was soon repaired, but in replacing
the wooden vessel, he observed a billet lying on
the bench, on which the liquor had been placed.
It was soon opened and he readthe moon will
not rise till after midnighta fit time for deeds
of darkness. There was no mistaking the hand;
it was clearly the same that had given him the
timely warning against assassination, and the
trooper continued, for a long time, musing on the
nature of these two notices, and the motives that
could induce the mysterious pedlar to favour an
implacable enemy in the manner that he latterly
had done. That he was a spy of the enemy
Lawton
knew, for the fact of his conveying
intelligence
to the English commander-in-chief of a
party of Americans that were exposed to the
enemy
,
was proved most clearly against him on the
trial for his life. The consequences of his
treason
had been avoided, it is true, by a lucky order
from Washington, which withdrew the regiment
a short time before the British appeared to cut it
off, but still the crime was the same; perhaps,
thought the partisan, he wishes to make a friend
of me, against the event of another capture; but,
at all events, he spared my life on one occasion,
and saved it on another. I will endeavour to be
as generous as himself, and pray that my duty
may never interfere with my feelings. Whether
the danger, intimated in the present note,
threatened
the cottage or his own party, the captain was
uncertain, but he inclined to the latter opinion,
and determined to beware how he rode abroad
in the dark. To a man in a peaceable country,
and in times of quiet and order, the indifference
with which the partisan regarded the impending
danger, would be inconceivable. His
contemplations
on the subject were more for devising
means to entrap his enemies, than to escape their
machinations. But the arrival of the surgeon,
who had been to pay his daily visit to the Locusts,
interrupted his meditations. Sitgreaves brought
an invitation from the mistress of the mansion, to
Captain Lawton, desiring that the cottage might
be honoured with his presence at an early hour
on that evening.
What! cried the trooper, then they have
received a letter also.
I think nothing more probable, said the
operator
;
there is a chaplain here from the Royal
Army, who has come out to exchange the British
wounded, and who has an order from Col.
Singleton
for their delivery. But a more mad project
than to remove them now was never adopted.
A priest, say youis he a hard drinkera
real camp-idlera fellow to breed a famine in a
regiment?or does he seem a man who is in
earnest in his trade?
A very respectable and orderly gentleman,
not at all given to intemperance, judging from the
outward symptoms, returned the surgeon, and
a man who really says grace in a very regular and
appropriate manner.
And does he stay the night?
Certainly, he waits for his cartel; but hasten,
John, we have but little time to waste. I will
just step up and bleed two or three of the
Englishmen
who are to move in the morning, in order to
prevent inflammation, and be with you
immediately
.
The gala suit of Captain Lawton was easily
adjusted
to his huge frame, and his companion being
ready, they once more took their route towards
the cottage. Roanoke had been as much
benefited
by a few days rest as his master, and
Lawton
ardently wished, as he curbed his gallant
steed, on passing the well-remembered rocks,
that his treacherous enemy stood before him
mounted and armed as himself. But no enemy,
nor any disturbance whatever interfered with
their progress, and they reached the Locusts just
as the sun was throwing his setting rays on the
valley, and tinging the tops of the leafless trees
with the colour of gold. It never required more
than a single look, to acquaint the trooper with
the particulars of every scene that was not
uncommonly
veiled, and the first survey that he
took on entering the house, told him more than
the observations of a day had put into the
possession
of Dr. Sitgreaves. Miss Peyton accosted
him with a smiling welcome that exceeded
the bounds of ordinary courtesy, and evidently
flowed more from feelings that were connected
with the heart than from manner. Frances glided
about, tearful, and agitated, while Mr. Wharton
stood ready to receive them, decked in a suit of
velvet, that would have been conspicuous in the
gayest drawing-rooms on the continent. Col.
Wellmere was in the uniform of an officer
of the household troops of his prince, and
Isabella
Singleton sat in the parlour, clad in the
habiliments of joy, but with a countenance that
belied her appearance, while her brother by her
side, looked with a cheek of flitting colour, and
an eye of intense interest, like any thing but an
invalid. As it was the third day that he had left
his room, Dr. Sitgreaves, who began to stare about
him in stupid wonder, forgot to reprove his
patient
for his imprudence. Into this scene,
Captain
Lawton moved with all the composure and
gravity of a man whose nerves were not easily
discomposed by novelties. His compliments were
received as graciously as they were offered, and
after exchanging a few words with the different
individuals in the room, he approached to where
the surgeon had withdrawn in a kind of confused
astonishment to rally his senses to the occasion.
John, whispered the surgeon, with
awakened
curiosity, what do you think?
That your wig and my black head would look
the better for a little of Betty Flannagan's best
flour; but it is too late now, and we must fight
the battle armed as you seewhy, Archibald, you
and I look like militiamen flanked by those holiday
Frenchmen who have come among us.
Observe, said Sitgreaves, in increasing
wonder
,
here comes the army chaplain in his full
robes as a Doctor Divinitatiswhat can it mean?
An exchange, said the trooper; the
wounded
of Cupid are to meet and settle their accounts
with the god, in the way of plighting their faith to
suffer from his archery no more.
Oh! ejaculated the operator, laying his
finger on the side of his nose, and for the first
time comprehending the case.
Yesoh! muttered Lawton, in imitation
when turning suddenly to his comrade, he said
fiercely, but in an under tone, Is it not a crying
shame, that a sunshine-hero, and an enemy, should
VOL. II. 6
thus be suffered to steal away one of the fairest
plants that grows in our soila flower fit to be
placed in the bosom of any man.
You speak the truth, John; and if he be not
more accomodating as a husband, than as a patient,
I fear me that the lady will lead a troubled life.
Let her, said the trooper indignantly; she
has chosen from her country's enemies, and may
she meet with a foreigner's virtues in her choice.
Their further conversation was interrupted by
Miss Peyton, who, advancing, acquainted them that
they had been invited to grace the nuptials of her
eldest niece and Col. Wellmere. The gentlemen
bowed in silence at this explanation of what they
already understood, and the good spinster, with
an inherent love of propriety, went on to add,
that the acquaintance was of an old date, and the
attachment by no means a sudden thing. To this
Lawton merely bowed, but the surgeon, who loved
to hold converse with the virgin, replied
That the human mind was differently
constituted
in different individuals. In some,
impressions
are vivid and transitory; in others, more
deep and lasting:indeed, there are some
philosophers
who pretend to trace a connexion between
the physical and mental powers of the animal;
but for my part, madam, I believe that the one is
much influenced by habit and association, and the
other subject to the laws of science.
Miss Peyton, in her turn, bowed her silent
assent
to this remark, and retired with dignity, to
usher the intended bride into the presence of the
company. The hour had arrived when American
custom has decreed, that the vows of wedlock
must be exchanged; and Sarah, blushing with a
variety of emotions, followed her aunt to the
withdrawing
room. Wellmere sprang to receive the
hand that she extended towards him with an
averted
face, and, for the first time, the English
Colonel
appeared conscious of the important part that
he was to act in the approaching ceremonies.
Hitherto his air had been abstracted, and his
manner
uneasy; but every thing excepting the
certainty
of his bliss, seemed to vanish at the blaze of
loveliness that burst on his sight with the presence
of his mistress. All arose from their seats, and
the reverend gentleman had already opened
the volume in his hand, when the absence of
Frances
was noticed: Miss Peyton again withdrew in
search of her niece, whom she found in her own
apartment, and in tears.
Come, my love, the ceremony waits but for
us, said the aunt, affectionately entwining her
arm in that of her niece; endeavour to compose
yourself, that proper honour may be done to the
choice of your sister.
Is hecan he be worthy of her? cried
Frances
,
in a burst of emotion, and throwing herself
into the arms of the spinster.
Can he be otherwise? returned Miss Peyton;
is he not a gentleman?a gallant soldier,
though an unfortunate one? and certainly, my
love, one who appears every way qualified to
make any woman happy.
Frances had given vent to her feelings, and, with
an effort, she collected sufficient resolution to
venture
again to join the expecting party below. But
to relieve the embarrassment of this delay, the
clergyman had put sundry questions to the
bridegroom
;
one of which was by no means answered
to his satisfaction. Wellmere was compelled to
acknowledge that he was unprovided with a ring,
and to perform the marriage ceremony without
one, the divine pronounced to be impossible. His
appeal to Mr. Wharton for the propriety of this
decision, was answered affirmatively, as it would
have been negatively, had the question been put
in a manner to lead to such a result. The owner
of the Locusts had lost the little energy he
possessed, by the blow recently received through
his son, and his assent to the objection of the
clergyman, was as easily obtained, as his consent
to the premature proposals of Wellmere. In
this stage of the dilemma, Miss Peyton and
Frances
appeared. The surgeon of dragoons
approached
the former, and as he hand ed her to a chair,
observed
It appears, Madam, that untoward
circumstances
have prevented Colonel Wellmere from
providing
all of the decorations that custom,
antiquity
,
and the canons of the church, have prescribed
as indispensable to enter into the honourable state
of wedlock.
Miss Peyton glanced her quiet eye at the
uneasy
bridegroom, and perceiving him to be
adorned
with what she thought sufficient splendour,
allowing
for the time and the suddenness of the
occasion
,
she turned her look on the speaker with a
surprise that demanded an explanation.
The surgeon understood her wishes, and
proceeded
at once to gratify them.
There is, he observed, an opinion
prevalent
,
that the heart lies on the left side of the
body, and that the connexion between the
members
of that side and what may be called the seat
of life, is more intimate than that which exists
with their opposites. But this is an error that
grows out of an ignorance of the scientific
arrangement
of the human frame. In obedience to
this opinion, the fourth finger of the left hand is
thought to contain a virtue that belongs to no
other of its class, and is encircled, during the
solemnization
of wedlock, with a cincture or ring, as
if to chain that affection to the marriage state,
which is best secured by the graces of the female
character. While speaking, the operator laid his
hand impressively on his heart, and bowed nearly
to the floor as be concluded.
I know not, sir, that I rightly understand your
meaning, said Miss Peyton, with dignity, but
suffering
a slight vermilion to appear on a cheek that
had long lost that peculiar charm of youth.
A ring, Madama ring is wanting for the
ceremony.
The instant that the surgeon spoke explicitly,
the awkwardness of their situation was
comprehended
.
She glanced her eyes at her neices, and
in the younger she read a secret exultation that
somewhat displeased her; but the countenance of
Sarah was suffused with a shame that the
considerate
aunt well understood. Not for the world
would she violate any of the observances of
female
etiquette. It suggested itself to all the
females
of the Wharton family, at the same
moment
,
that the wedding ring of their late mother
and sister was reposing peacefully amid the rest
of her jewellery, in a secret receptacle that had
been provided at an early day, to secure the
valuables
against the predatory inroads of the
marauders
who roamed through the county. Into this
hidden vault, the plate and whatever was most
prized made a nightly retreat, and there the ring
in question had long lain, forgotten until at this
moment. But it was the business of the
bridegroom
,
from time immemorial, to furnish this
indispensable to wedlock, and on no account
would Miss Peyton do any thing that transcended
the usual courtesies of her sex on this solemn
occasion
;
certainly not until sufficient expiation for
the offence had been made by a due portion of
trouble and disquiet. The spinster, therefore,
retained
the secret from a regard to decorum, Sarah
6*
from feeling, and Frances from both, united to
dissatisfaction
at the connexion. It was reserved for
Dr. Sitgreaves to break the embarrassment of the
party by again speaking:
If, Madam, a plain ring that once belonged to
a sister of my own The operator paused a
moment, and hem'd once or twice; if, Madam,
a ring of that description might be admitted to this
honour, I have one that could be easily produced
from my quarters at the corners, and I doubt
not it would fit the finger for which it is desired.
There is a strong resemblance betweenhem
between my late sister and Miss Wharton in
stature
and anatomical figure, and the proportions are
apt to be observed throughout the whole animal
economy.
A glance of Miss Peyton's eye recalled Colonel
Wellmere to a sense of his duty, and springing
from his chair, he assured the surgeon, that in no
way could he impose heavier obligations on him,
than by sending for that very ring. The operator
bowed a little haughtily, and withdrew to fulfil
his promise, by despatching a messenger on the
errand. The spinster suffered him to retire;
but unwillingness to admit a stranger into the
privacy
of their domestic arrangements, induced her
to follow and tender the services of Csar instead
of Sitgreaves' man, who had been offered by
Isabella
for this dutyher brother, probably from
bodily
weakness, continuing silent throughout the
whole evening. Katy Haynes was accordingly
directed to summon the black to the vacant
parlour
,
and thither the spinster and surgeon
repaired
,
to give their several instructions.
The consent to this sudden union of Sarah and
Wellmere, and especially at a time when the life
of a member of the family was in such imminent
jeopardy, was given from a conviction, that the
unsettled state of the country, would probably
prevent another opportunity for the lovers
meeting
,
and a secret dread on the part of Mr.
Wharton
,
that the death of his son, might, by hastening
his own, leave his remaining children without a
protector. But notwithstanding that Miss Peyton
had complied with her brother's wish to profit by
the accidental visit of a divine, she had not
thought it necessary to blazon the intended
nuptials
of her niece to the neighbourhood, had even
time been allowed: she thought, therefore, that
she was now communicating a profound secret to
Csar and her housekeeper.
Csar, she commenced with a smile, you
are now to learn, that your young mistress, Miss
Sarah, is to be united to Colonel Wellmere this
evening.
No, noI tink I see em afore, said Csar,
laughing and chuckling with inward delight, as he
shook his head with conscious satisfaction at his
own prescience; old black man tell when a
young lady talk all alone wid a gem'man in a
parlour
.
Really, Csar, I find I have never given you
credit for half the observation that you deserve,
said the spinster gravely; but as you already
know on what emergency your services are
required
,
listen to the directions of this gentleman, and
take care to observe them strictly.
The black turned in quiet submission to the
surgeon
,
who commenced as follows:
Csar, your mistress has already acquainted
you with the important event about to be
solemnized
within this habitation; but a ring is wanting,
and by riding to the mess-house at the Four
Corners
,
and delivering this billet to either sergeant
Hollister or Mrs. Elizabeth Flanagan, it will
speedily be placed in your possession. On its
receipt
return hither, and fail not to use diligence
in both going and returning, for my patients will
shortly require my presence in the hospital, and
Captain Singleton already suffers from the want
of rest.
By this time the surgeon had forgotten every
thing but what appertained to his own duties, and
rather unceremoniously left the apartment.
Curiosity
,
or perhaps an opposite feeling,
delicacy
,
induced Miss Peyton to glance her eye on the
open billet that Sitgreaves had delivered to the
black, where she read as follows:it was
addressed
to his assistant.
If the fever has left Kinder, give him
nourishment
.
Take three ounces more of blood from
Watson. Have a search made that the woman
Flanagan has left none of her jugs of alcohol in
the hospital;renew the dressings of Johnson,
and dismiss Smith to duty. Send the ring, which
is pendent from the chain of the watch that I left
with you to time the doses, by the bearer.
Archibald Sitgreaves, M. D.
Surgeon of Dragoons.
Miss Peyton yielded this singular epistle to the
charge of the black, in silent wonder, and
withdrew
,
leaving Katy and Csar to arrange the
departure
of the latter.
Csar, said Katy, with imposing solemnity,
put the ring when you get it, in your left
pocket, that is nearest your heart; and by no
means indivour to try it on your finger, for it is
unlucky.
Try him on a finger? interrupted the negro,
stretching forth his bony knuckles; tink a Miss
Sally's ring go on old Csar finger?
'Tis not consequential whether it goes on or
not, said the housekeeper; but it is an evil
omen to place a marriage ring on the finger of
another
after wedlock, and of course it may be
dangerous
before.
I tell you Katy, cried Csar, a little
indignantly
,
I go fetch a ring, and neber tink to put
him on a finger.
Gogo then, Csar, said Katy, suddenly
recollecting divers important items in the supper
that required her attention; and hurry back
again, and stop not for living soul.
With this injunction Csar departed, and was
soon firmly fixed in the saddle. From his youth,
the black, like all of his race, had been a hard
rider
;
but charged with a message of such
importance
,
he moved at first with becoming dignity, and
bending under the weight of sixty winters, his
African
blood had lost some of its native heat. The
night was dark, and the wind whistled through
the vale with the chilling dreariness of the blasts
of November. By the time Csar reached the
grave-yard, that had so lately received the body
of the elder Birch, all the horrors of his situation
began to burst on the mind of the old man, and
he threw around him many a fearful glance, in
momentary expectation of seeing something
superhuman
.
There was barely light sufficient to
discern a being of earthly mould emerging into
the highway, and apparently from the graves of
the dead. It is in vain that philosophy and
reason
contend with our fears and early impressions,
but Csar had neither to offer him their frail
support
.
He was, however, well mounted on a
coach-horse
of Mr. Wharton's, and clinging to the back
of the animal with instinctive skill, he
abandoned
the rein to the pleasure of the beast.
Hillocks
,
woods, rocks, fences and houses flew by
him with the rapidity of lightning, and the black
had just began to think where and on what
business
it was, that he was riding in this headlong
manner, when he reached the place where the
two roads met, and the Hotel Flanagan
stood in all its dilapidated simplicity. The sight
of a cheerful fire through its windows, first gave
Csar a pledge that he had reached the
habitation
of man, and with it came all his dread of the
bloody Virginians;his duty must, however, be
done, and dismounting, he fastened the foaming
animal to a fence, and approached the window
with cautious steps, to listen and reconnoitre.
Before a blazing fire sat sergeant Hollister and
Betty Flanagan, enjoying themselves over a
liberal
donation from the stores of the washerwoman.
I tell yee sargeant, dear, said Betty,
removing
the mug from her mouth, 'tis no
reasonable
to think it was any thing more than the
pidlar
himself; sure now, where was the smell of
sulphur
,
and the wings, and the tail, and the cloven
foot?besides sargeant, its no dacent to tell a
lone famale that she had Beelzeboob for a
bed-fellow
.
It matters but little Mrs. Flanagan, provided
you escape his talons and fangs hereafter,
returned
the veteran, following his remark by a heavy
potation.
Csar heard enough to convince him, that
danger to himself from this pair was but little to
be apprehended. His teeth already began to
chatter from cold and terror, and the sight of the
comfort within, stimulated him greatly to
adventure
to enter. He made his approaches with
proper
caution, and knocked with extreme humility
at the door. The appearance of Hollister with a
drawn sword, roughly demanding who was
without
,
contributed in no degree to the restoration of
his faculties; but fear itself lent him power to
explain
his errand.
Advance, said the sergeant with military
promptness, and throwing a look of close scrutiny
on the black, as he brought him to the light;
advance
,
and deliver your despatches:but stop,
have you the countersign?
I don't tink a know what he be, said the
black, shaking in his shoes.
Who ordered you on this duty did you say?
A tall massa, with a spectacle, returned
Csar
;
he came a doctering a Capt. Singleton.
'Twas Doctor Sitgreaves; he never knows the
countersign himselfnow, blackey, had it been
Captain Lawton, he would not have sent you here
close to a sentinel without the countersign; for
you might get a pistol bullet through your head,
and that would be cruel to you, for although you
be black, I am none of them who thinks niggurs
haven't no souls.
Sure a nagur has as much sowl as a white,
said Betty; come hither, ould man, and warm
that shivering carcass of yeers by the blaze of this
fire. I'm sure a Guinea nagur loves heat as much
as a souldier loves his drop.
Csar obeyed in silence, and a mulatto boy,
who was sleeping on a bench in the room, was
bidden to convey the note of the surgeon to the
building where the wounded were quartered.
Here, said the washerwoman, tendering to
Csar a taste of the article that most delighted
herself, try a drop, smooty, 'twill warm the
black sowl within your body, and be giving you
spirits as you are going homeward.
I tell you, Elizabeth, said the sergeant, that
the souls of niggurs are the same as our own, and
how often have I heard the good Mr. Whitfield
say, that there was no distinction of colour in
heaven
.
Therefore it is reasonable to believe, that
the soul of this here black, is as white as my own,
or even Major Dunwoodie's.
Be sure he be, cried Csar, a little tartly,
who had received a wonderful stimulus by tasting
the drop of Mrs. Flanagan.
Its a good sowl that the major is, any way,
returned the washerwoman, and a kind sowl
aye, and a brave sowl too; and you'll say all that
yeerself, sargeant, I'm thinking.
For the matter of that, returned the
veteran
,
there is one above even Washington, to
judge of souls; but this I will say, that Major
Dunwoodie is a gentleman who never says, go,
boysbut always says, come, boys; and if a poor
fellow is in want of a spur or a martingale, and
the leather-wack is gone, there is never wanting
the real silver to make up the loss, and that from
his own pocket too.
Why, then, are you here idle, when all that
he holds most dear are in danger, cried a voice
with startling abruptness; mount, mount, and
follow your captainarm and mount, and that
instantly, or you will be too late.
This unexpected interruption, produced an
instantaneous
confusion amongst the tiplers. Csar
fled instinctively into the fire-place, where he
maintained his position in defiance of a heat that
would have roasted a white man. Sergeant
Hollister
turned promptly on his heel, and seizing his
sabre, the steel was glittering in the fire-light, in
the twinkling of an eye; but perceiving the
intruder to be the pedlar, who stood near the
open door that led to the stoop in the rear, he
began to fall back towards the position of the
black, with a kind of military intuition which
taught him to concentrate his forces. Betty alone
stood her ground by the side of the temporary
table
.
Replenishing the mug with a large
addition
of the article known to the soldiery by the
name of choke dog, she held it towards the
pedlar. The eyes of the washerwoman had for
some time been swimming with love and liquor,
and turning them good naturedly on Birch, she
cried
Faith, but yee'r welcome, Mister Pidlar, or
Mister Birch, or Mister Beelzeboob, or what's
yee'r name. Yee'r an honest divil, any way, and
I'm hoping that you found the pittlicoats
convanient
come
forward, dear, and fale the fire;
Sergeant
Hollister won't be hurting you for the fear
of an ill turn you may be doing him hereafter
will yee, Sargeant, dear.
Depart, ungodly man, cried the veteran,
edging still nearer to Csar, but lifting his legs
alternately as they scorched with the heat,
depart
in peace. There is none here for thy
service
,
and you seek the woman in vain. There is
a tender mercy that will save her from thy talons.
The sergeant ceased to utter aloud, but the
motion of his lips continued, and a few scattering
words of prayer were alone to be heard.
The brain of the washerwoman was in such a
state of confusion, that she did not clearly
comprehend
the meaning of her lover, but a new idea
struck her imagination, and she broke forth
If it's me the man seeks, where's the matter,
prayam I not a widow'd body and my own
property
?
And you talk of tinderness, Sargeant,
but it's little I see of it, any waywho knows but
Mr. Beelzeboob here is free to spake his mind
I'm sure it is willing to hear that I am.
Woman, said the pedlar, be silent; and
you, foolish man, mountarm and mount, and
flee to the rescue of your officer, if you are
worthy
of the cause in which you serve, and would
VOL. II. 7
not disgrace the coat that you wear. The
feelings
of the pedlar communicated to his manner
the power of eloquence, and he vanished from the
sight of the bewildered trio, with a rapidity that
left them uncertain whither he had fled.
Oh hearing the voice of an old friend, Csar
emerged from his quarters, with a skin that was
glistening with moisture, and fearlessly advanced
to where Betty stood in a maze of intellectual
confusion.
I wish a Harvey stop, said the black; if he
ride down a road, I should like to go along;I
don't tink Johnny Birch hurt his own son.
Poor ignorant wretch! exclaimed the
veteran
,
recovering his voice with a long drawn
breath; think you that figure was of flesh and
blood?
Harvey an't a berry fleshy, replied the black,
but he berry clebber man.
Pooh! sargeant dear, exclaimed the
washerwoman
,
talk rason for once, and mind what
the knowing one tells yee; call out the boys, and
ride a bit after Captain Jack,rimimber darling,
that he told you the day, to be in readiness to
mount at a moment's warning.
Ay, but not at a summons from the foul fiend.
Let but Captain Lawton, or Lieutenant Mason, or
Cornet Skipwith say the word, cried the veteran,
and who is quicker in the saddle than I am?
Well sargeant, how often is it that yee've
boasted to myself, that the corps was'nt a bit
afeard to face the divil.
No more be we, in battle array, and by
day-light
;
but it's fool hardy and irreverent to tempt
Satan, and on such a night as this; listen how the
wind whistles through the trees, and hark! there
is the howlings of evil spirits abroad.
I see him, said Csar, opening his eyes to a
width that might have embraced more than an
ideal form.
Where? interrupted the sergeant, again
instinctively
laying his hand on the hilt of his sabre.
Nono, said the black, I see a Johnny
Birch come out of he graveJohnny walk afore
he bury'd.
Ah! then he must have led an evil life
indeed
,
said Hollister; the blessed in spirit lie
quiet until the general muster at the last day, but
wickedness disturbs the soul in this life as well as
in that which is to come.
And what is to come of Captain Jack? cried
Betty angrily; is it yee'r orders that yee won't
mind, nor a warning given? I'll jist git my cart
and ride down and tell him that you are afeard of
a dead man and Beelzeboob; and it is'nt succour
he may be expicting from you?I wonder who'll
be the orderly of the troop the morrow then?his
name won't be Hollister, any way.
Nay, Betty, nay, said the sergeant, laying
his hand on her shoulder, if there must be riding
to-night, let it be by him whose duty it is to call
out the men and set an example.The Lord have
mercy, and send us enemies of flesh and blood.
Another glass confirmed the veteran in a
resolution
that was only excited by a dread of his
Captain's displeasure, and he proceeded to
summon
the dozen men who had been left under his
command. The boy arriving with the ring,
Csar placed it carefully in the pocket of his
waistcoat next his heart, and mounting, shut his
eyes, seized his charger by the mane, and
continued
in a state of comparative insensibility,
until
the animal stopped at the door of the warm
stable, whence he had started.
The movements of the dragoons being timed
to the order of a march, were much slower, and
were made with a watchfulness that was intended
to guard against surprise from the evil one
himself
.
CHAPTER VI.
Be not your tongue thy own shame's orator;
Look sweet, speak fair, become disloyalty;
Apparel vice like virtue's harbinger.
Comedy of Errors
.
The
situation of the party in Mr. Wharton's
dwelling, was sufficiently awkward during the
short hour of Csar's absence; for such was the
astonishing rapidity displayed by his courser, that
the four miles of road was gone over, and the
events we have recorded, had occurred, somewhat
within that period of time. Of course the
gentlemen
strove to make the irksome moments fly
as swiftly as possible; but premeditated
happiness
is certainly of the least joyous kind. The
bride and bridegroom, from a variety of reasons,
are privileged to be dull, and but few of their
friends seemed disposed, on the present occasion,
to dishonour their example. The English
Colonel
exhibited a proper portion of uneasiness at
this unexpected interruption to his felicity, and
sat with a varying countenance by the side of
Sarah
,
who seemed to be profiting by the delay, to
gather fortitude for the solemn ceremony. In
the midst of this embarrassing silence, Dr.
Sitgreaves
addressed himself to Miss Peyton, by
whose side he had contrived to procure a chair.
Marriage, Madam, is pronounced to be
honourable
in the sight of God and man; and it may
be said to be reduced in the present age to the
laws of nature and reason. The ancients, in
sanctioning
7*
polygamy, lost sight of the provisions of
nature, and condemned thousands to misery; but
with the increase of science, have grown the wise
ordinances of society, which ordain that man
should be the husband of but one woman.
Wellmere glanced a fierce expression of
disgust
at the surgeon, that indicated his sense of the
tediousness of the other's remarks; while the
spinster, with a slight trembling at touching on
forbidden subjects, replied with an extremely
dignified inclination of her body
I had thought, sir, that we were indebted to
the christian religion for our morals on this
subject
.
True, Madam, replied the operator, it is
somewhere provided in the prescriptions of the
apostles, that the sexes should henceforth be on
an equality in this respect. But in what degree
could polygamy affect holiness of life? Certainly
it was a scientific arrangement of Paul, who was
much of a scholar, and probably had frequent
conferences
with Luke, whom we all know to have
been bred to the practice of medicine, on this
important subject.
To this profound discussion, the spinster made
no other reply, than another bend of her body,
that would have struck an observant man dumb;
but Captain Lawton, placing the point of his
sheathed sabre on the floor, folded his hands
across the hilt, and leaning his chin thereon, threw
singular glances with his searching eyes,
alternately
from the surgeon to the bridegroom.
Yet this practice still prevails, said the
trooper; and in those very countries where it
was first abolished by the christian code. Pray,
Colonel Wellmere, in what manner is bigamy
punished in England?
Thus addressed, the bridegroom raised his eyes
to the countenance of the other, but they quickly
sunk again under the prying look they
encountered
;
and an effort banished the tremor from his
lip, and restored some of the colour to his cheek,
as he replied
Death!as such an offence merits.
Death and dissection, continued the
operator
;
it is seldom that the law loses sight of
eventual
utility in a malefactor. Bigamy in a man is
certainly a most heinous offence.
More so, think you, than celibacy? asked
Lawton, a little archly.
Even so, returned the surgeon with
undisturbed
simplicity; he who remains in a single
state, may devote his life to science and the
extension
of knowledge, if not of his species; but
the wretch who profits by the constitutional
tendency
of the female sex to credulity and
tenderness
,
incurs all the wickedness of a positive sin,
heightened by the baseness of deception in its
execution
.
Really, sir, the ladies are infinitely obliged
to you, for attributing folly to them as part of their
nature.
Captain Lawton, in man the animal is more
nobly formed than in woman. The nerves are
endowed with less sensibilitythe whole frame is
less pliable and yielding; is it, therefore,
surprising
,
that a tendency to rely on the faith of her
partner, is more natural to woman than to the
other sex?
Wellmere, unable at this moment to listen
with any degree of patience to the dialogue, sprung
from his seat, and paced the floor in disorder.
Pitying his situation, the reverend gentleman, who,
in his robes, was patiently awaiting the return of
Csar, changed the discourse, and a few minutes
brought the black himself. The billet was handed
to Dr. Sitgreaves; for Miss Peyton had expressly
enjoined Csar, not to implicate her in any
manner
in the errand on which he was despatched.
The note contained a summary statement of the
several subjects of the surgeon's directions, and
referred him to the black for the ring; it was
instantly
demanded, and promptly delivered. A
transient look of melancholy clouded the brow
of the operator as he stood a moment, and gazed
silently on the bauble; nor did he remember the
place or the occasion, while he soliloquized as
follows
:
Poor Anna! gay as innocence and youth could
make you, was thy heart when this cincture was
formed to grace thy nuptials; but ere the hour
had come, God had taken you to himself. Years
have passed, my sister, but never have I forgotten
the companion of my infancy; he advanced to
Sarah, and, unconscious of observation, placing
the ring on her finger, continued, she for whom
it was intended, has long been in her grave, and
the youth who bestowed the gift, soon followed
her sainted spirit; take it, Madam, and God grant
that it may be an instrument in making you as
happy as you deserve to be.
Sarah felt an unaccountable chill at her heart,
as this burst of feeling escaped from the surgeon;
but Wellmere offering his hand, she was led
before
the divine, and the ceremony began. The
first words of this imposing office, produced a
dead stillness in the apartment; and the minister
of God proceeded to the solemn exhortation, and
witnessed the plighted troth of the parties, when
the investiture of the ring was to follow. It had
been left, from inadvertency, and the agitation of
the moment, where Sitgreaves had placed it;a
slight interruption was occasioned by the
circumstance
,
and the clergyman was about to proceed,
when a figure glided into the midst of the party,
that at once put a stop to the ceremony.It was
the pedlar:his sunken and cowering eye no
longer
avoided the look of others, but glared
wildly
around him, and his whole frame was agitated
by an exertion that had shaken his iron nerves.
But all these emotions passed away like shadows
from a fleeting cloud, and assuming a look of deep
humility and habitual respect, he turned to the
bridegroom, and bowing low, said
Can Colonel Wellmere waste the precious
moments here, when his wife has crossed the
ocean to meet him? The nights are long, and
the moon bright;a few hours riding would take
him to the city.
Aghast at the suddenness of this extraordinary
address, Wellmere for a moment lost the command
of his faculties. To Sarah, the countenance of
Birch, wild and agitated as it was, produced no
terror; but the instant she recovered from the
surprise of his interruption, she turned her
anxious
gaze on the features of the man to whom she
had just pledged herself for life. They afforded the
most terrible confirmation of all that the pedlar
affirmed
;
the room whirled around with her, and she
fell lifeless into the arms of her aunt. There is
an instinctive delicacy in woman, that for a time
seems to conquer all other emotions however
powerful, and through its impulse, the insensible
bride was immediately conveyed from sight by her
friends, and the parlour was deserted to the
wondering
group of men.
The confusion of the fall of Sarah, enabled
the pedlar to retreat with a rapidity that would
have baffled pursuit, had any been attempted, and
Wellmere stood with all eyes fixed on him in
ominous silence.
'Tis false'tis false as hell! he cried,
striking
his hand to his forehead. I have ever denied
her claim; nor will the laws of my country
compel
me to acknowledge it.
But will not conscience, and the laws of
God? asked Lawton.
Before Wellmere could reply, Singleton, who
had hitherto been supported by his servant,
moved
into the center of the circle, and with cheeks
glowing with animation, and eyes that flashed fire,
exclaimed
Thus is it ever with your nation, proud
Englishman
;
your boasted honour, where is it?
obligatory
only among yourselves,but have a care,
striking the hilt of his sabre, each daughter of
America has a claim upon the protection of her
sons, and there are none so helpless, but a
countryman
can be found to avenge her injuries, or
redress
her wrongs.
'Tis well, sir, said Wellmere, haughtily, and
retreating towards the dooryour situation
protects
you now: but a time may come
He had reached the entry, when a slight tap on
his shoulder caused him to turn his head;it was
Captain Lawtonwho, with a smile of peculiar
meaning, beckoned to him to follow. The state
of Wellmere's mind was such, that he would
gladly
have gone any where to avoid the gaze of
horror
and detestation that glared from every eye he
met. They reached the stables before the trooper
spoke, when he cried aloud
Bring out Roanoke.
His man appeared with the steed caparisoned
as when ready for its master; and Lawton. coolly
throwing the bridle on the neck of the animal,
took his pistols from the holsters, and continued,
You said truly, Colonel Wellmere, when you
pronounced George Singleton unfit for combat
but here are weapons that have seen good
service before to-dayay! and in honourable
hands sir. These were the pistols of my father,
Colonel Wellmere; he used them with credit in
the wars with France, and gave them to me to
fight the battles of my country with. In what
better
way can I serve her than in exterminating a
wretch who would have blasted one of her fairest
flowers?
This injurious treatment shall meet with its
reward, cried the Englishman, seizing the
offered
weapon eagerly, and the blood lie on the
head of him who sought it.
Amen! said Lawton; but hold, a moment,
sir. You are now free, and the passports of
Washington are in your pocket;I give you the
re;if I fall, there is a steed that will outstrip
pursuit; and I would advise you to retreat without
much delay, for even Archibald Sitgreaves would
fight in such a causenor will the guard above be
very apt to give quarters.
Are you ready? asked Wellmere, guashing
his teeth with rage.
Stand forward, Tom, with the lights;fire!
Wellmere fired, and the bullion flew from the
epaulette of the trooper in fifty pieces.
Now then the turn is mine, said Lawton
deliberately
,
and levelling his pistol.
And mine! shouted a voice, as the weapon
was struck from his hand; can you find nothing
to do but to shoot at a man, as if he was a turkey
at a Christmas match? By all the devils in hell,
'tis the mad Virginianfall on my boys, and take
him; this is a prize not hoped for.
Unarmed and surprized as he was, Lawton's
presence of mind did not desert him: he felt he
was in the hands of those from whom he was to
expect no mercy; and as four of the skinners fell
upon him at once, he used his gigantic strength to
the utmost. Three of the band grasped him by
the neck and arms, with an intent to clog his
efforts
,
and pinion him with ropes. The first of these
he threw from him with a violence that sent him
against the building, where he lay for a moment
stunned with the blow. But the fourth seized
his legs, and unable to contend with such odds, the
trooper came to the earth, bringing with him both
of his assailants. The struggle on the ground was
short but terrific;curses, and the most dreadful
imprecations were uttered by the skinners, who
in vain called on three more of their band that
were gazing on the combat in nerveless horror, to
assist in securing their prize. A difficulty of
breathing, from one of the combatants, was heard,
accompanied by the stifled moanings of a strangled
man; and directly one of the group arose on his
feet, shaking himself from the wild grasp of the
others. Both Wellmere and the servant of
Lawton
had fled; the former to the stables, and the
latter to give the alarmand all was darkness.
The figure that stood erect, sprung into the
saddle
of the unheeded chargersparks of fire
from the armed feet of the horse, gave light
enough to discover the trooper dashing like the
wind towards the highway.
By hell he's off! cried the leader, hoarse
from rage and exhaustion; fire!bring him
downfire, I say, or you'll be too late.
The order was obeyed, and one moment of
awful
suspense followed, in the vain hope of hearing
the huge frame of Lawton tumbling from his steed.
He'd never fall, if you had killed him,
muttered
one; I've known them Virg nians sit their
horses with two and three balls through them; ay,
even after they were dead.
A freshening of the blast, wafted the tread of a
horse down the valley, which, by its speed, gave
assurance of a rider governing its motion.
Them trained horses always stop when the
rider falls, observed one of the gang.
Then, cried the leader, striking his musket
on the ground in a rage, the fellow is safe!
to your business at once. A short half hour will
bring down that canting sergeant and the guard
upon us. 'Tis lucky if the guns don't turn them
out. Quick, to your posts, and fire the house in
the chamberssmoking ruins are good to cover
evil deeds.
What is to be done with this lump of earth?
cried another, pushing the body that yet lay
insensible
,
where the grasp of Lawton had deprived it
of animation, a little rubbing would bring him
too.
Let him lie, said the leader fiercely; had
he been half a man, that dragooning rascal would
have been in my power;enter the house, I say,
and fire the chamberswe can't go amiss here;
there is plate and money enough to make you all
gentlemenyes, and revenge too.
The idea of silver in any way was not to be
resisted; and, leaving their companion, who
began
to show faint signs of life, they rushed
tumultuously
towards the dwelling. Wellmere availed
himself of the opportunity, and stealing from the
stable with his own charger, was able to gain the
highway unnoticed. For an instant he hesitated,
whether to ride towards the point where he knew
a guard was stationed, and endeavour to rescue
the family, or, profiting by his liberty, and the
exchange
that had been effected by the divine, to
seek the royal army. Shame, and the
consciousness
of guilt, determined him to take the latter
course, and he rode towards New-York, stung
with the reflection of his own baseness, and
harrassed
Vol. II. 8
with the apprehension of meeting with an
enraged woman, that he had married during his
late visit to England, but whose claims, so soon as
his passion was sated, he had resolved never
willingly to admit. In the tumult and agitation of
the moment, the retreat of Lawton and Wellmere
was but little noticed, the condition of Mr.
Wharton, and the exhaustion that succeeded
the excitement of George Singleton, demanding
the care and consolation of both the surgeon
and the divine. The report of the fire-arms first
roused the family to the sense of a new danger,
and but a minute elapsed before the leader and
one more of the gang entered the room.
Surrender, you servants of King George,
shouted the leader, presenting his musket to
the breast of Sitgreaves, or I will let a little of
your tory blood from your veins.
Gentlygently, my friend, said the surgeon;
you are doubtless more expert in inflicting
wounds than in healing them; the weapon that
you hold so indiscreetly, is extremely dangerous
to animal life.
Yield, then, or take its contents, exclaimed
the other.
Why and wherefore should I yield?I am a
practitioner of medicine, and a non-combatant.
The articles of capitulation must be arranged with
Captain John Lawton, though yielding I believe
is not a subject on which you will find him
particularly
complying.
The fellow had by this time taken such a
survey
of the group, as convinced him that little
danger was to be apprehended from resistance,
and eager to seize his share of the plunder, he
dropped his musket, and was soon busy in
arranging
divers articles of plate in bags, with the
assistance
of one of his men, so that it would
be in the most convenient situation to accompany
them in their retreat. The cottage now
presented
a most singular spectacle;the ladies were
gathered around Sarah, who yet continued
insensible
in one of the rooms that had escaped the
notice of the marauders. Mr. Wharton sat in a
state of perfect imbecility, listening to, but not
profiting by, the words of comfort that fell from
the lips of the clergyman, who soon became too
much terrified with the scene to offer them.
Singleton
was lying on a sofa, shaking with debility,
and inattentive to surrounding objects; while the
surgeon was administering restoratives, and
looking
at the dressings, with a coolness that mocked the
tumult. Csar, and the attendants of Captain
Singleton, had retreated to the wood in the rear
of the cottage, and Katy Haynes was flying about
the building, busily employed in forming a bundle
of valuables, from which, with the most
scrupulous
honesty, she rejected every article that was
not really and truly her own.
But to return to the party at the Four Corners.
When the veteran had got his men mounted and
under arms, a restless desire to participate in the
glory and dangers of the expedition came over
the washerwoman. Whether she was impelled to
the undertaking by a dread of remaining alone,
or a wish to hasten in person to the relief of
her favourite, we will not venture to assert;
but, as Hollister was unwillingly, giving the
orders to wheel and march, the voice of Betty
was heard exclaiming
Stop a bit, sargeant dear, till two of the boys
git out the cart, and I'll jist ride wid yee'tis like
there'll be wounded, and it will be mighty
convanient
to bring them home in.
Although inwardly much pleased with any cause
of delay to a service that he so little relished,
Hollister affected some displeasure at the
detention
,
and replied---
Nothing but a cannon ball can take one of my
lads from his charger, and it's not very likely that
we shall have as fair fighting as cannon and
musketry
,
in a business of the evil one's inventing;
so Elizabeth, you may go if you willbut the cart
will not be wanting.
Now sargeant, dear, you lie any way, said
Betty, who was somewhat unduly governed by her
potations; and wasn't Captain Singleton shot off
his horse but tin days gone by?ay, and Captain
Jack himself too; and didn't he lie on the ground
face uppermost and back downwards, looking grim?
and didn't the boys tink him dead, and turn and
lave the rig'lars the day?
You lie back again, cried the sergeant
fiercely, and so does any one, who says that we
didn't gain the day.
For a bit or soonly I mane for a bit or so,
said the washerwoman; but Major Dunwoodie
turn'd you, and so you lick'd the rig'lars. But the
Captain it was that fell, and I'm thinking that
there's no better rider going; so, sargeant, it's the
cart that will be convanient. Here, two of you,
jist hitch the mare to the tills, and it's no whiskey
that you'll be wanting the morrow; and put the
piece of Jinny's hide under the padthe baste is
never the better for the rough ways of the county
Westchester. The consent of the sergeant
being
obtained, the equipage of Mrs. Flanagan was
soon in readiness to receive its burthen.
As it is quite uncertain whether we shall be
attacked in front or rear, said Hollister, five of
you shall march in advance, and the remainder
shall cover our retreat towards the barrack, should
we be pressed. 'Tis an awful moment to a man
of little learning, Elizabeth, to command in such
a service; for my part, I wish devoutly that one
of the officers was here; but my trust is in the
Lord.
Pooh! man, away wid yee, said the
washerwoman
,
who had got herself comfortably seated,
the divil a bit of an inimy is there nearmarch
on hurry-skurry, and lit the mare trot, or it's but
little that Captain Jack will thank yee for the
help.
Although unlearned in matters of
communicating
with spirits, or laying the dead, Mrs.
Flanagan
,
said the veteran, I have not served
through the old war, and five years in this, not to
know how to guard the baggage.Doesn't
Washington
always cover the baggage? I am not to be
told my duty by a camp follower. Fall in as you
are ordered, and dress.
Well, march, any way, cried the impatient
washerwoman; the black is there already, and it's
tardy the Captain will think yee.
Are you sure that it was a real black man that
brought the order? said the sergeant, dropping
in between the platoons, where he could converse
with Betty, and was equally at hand to lead either
way.
Nay, said the washerwoman, and I'm sure
of nothing, dear. But why don't the boys prick
their horses, and jog a trot; the mare is mighty
uneasy, and it's no warm in this cursed valley,
riding as much like a funeral party as old rags is
to continental.
Fairly and softly, aye, and prudently, Mrs.
Flanagan, said the veteran; it's not rashness
that makes the good officer. If it is a spirit that
we have to encounter, it's more than likely that
he'll make his attack by surprise;horse are not
very powerful in the dark, and I have a character
to lose, good woman.
8*
Caractur! echoed Betty, and is'nt it
caractur
and life too, that Capt. Jack has to lose?
Halt! cried the sergeant; what is that
lurking near the foot of the rock, on the left?
Sure it's nothing, said the uneasy
washerwoman
,
unless it be the matter of Captain
Jack's sowl that's come to haunt yee, for not
being
brisker on the march.
Betty, 'tis foolishness to talk in such a way.
Advance one of you and reconnoitre the spot
draw swords!rear rank close to the front!
Pshaw! shouted Betty, is it a big fool or a
big coward that yee are?jist wheel from the
road, boys, and I'll shove the mare down upon it in
the twinkling of an eyeand it's no ghost that I
fear.
By this time, one of the men had returned, and
declared there was nothing to prevent their
advancing
,
and the party continued their march, but
with great deliberation and caution.
Courage and prudence are the jewels of a
soldier, Mrs. Flanagan, said the sergeant; and
without one the other may be said to be good for
nothing.
Prudence without courage, cried the other,
is it
that,
you mane?and it's so that I'm
thinking
myself, sargeant. This baste pulls tight on
the reins, any way.
Be patient, good womanhark! what is that?
said Hollister, pricking up his ears at the report
of Wellmere's pistol; I'll swear 'tis a pistol, and
one from our regiment.Hark! rear rank close
to the front!Mrs. Flanagan I must leave you.
So saying, having recovered all his faculties, by
hearing a martial sound that he understood, he
placed himself at the head of his men with an air
of military pride, that the darkness prevented the
washerwoman from beholding. A volley of
musketry
now rattled in the night wind, and the
sergeant
exclaimed
March!quick time!
The next instant the trampling of a horse was
heard coming up the road, at a rate that
announced
a matter of life or death, and Hollister again
halted his party, and rode a short distance in
front himself to meet the rider.
Stand!who goes there? shouted Hollister,
in the full tones of manly resolution.
Ha! Hollister, is it you? cried Lawton,
ever ready and at your post; but where is the
guard?
At hand, sir, and ready to follow you through
thick and thin, said the veteran, relieved at once
from his responsibility, and now eager to be led
against his enemy.
'Tis well, said the trooper, riding up to his
men; and speaking a few words of encouragement,
he led them down the valley at a rate but little
less rapid than his approach. The miserable horse
of the sulter was soon distanced, and Betty thus
thrown out in the chance, turned to the side of the
road, and observed
Thereit's no difficult to tell that Captain
Jack is wid'em, any way; and it's the funeral
that's soon over now; and away they go like so
many nagur boys to a husking-frolick;well, I'll
jist hitch the mare to this bit of a fence, and walk
down and see the sport, afootit's no rasonable to
expose the baste to be hurted.
Led on by Lawton, the men followed, destitute
alike of fear and reflection. Whether it was a
party of the refugees, or a detachment from the
royal army, that they were to assail, they were
profoundly ignorant, but they knew that the
officer
in advance was distinguished for courage and
personal prowess, and these are virtues that are
sure to captivate the thoughtless soldiery. On
arriving
near the gate of the Locusts, the trooper
halted his party, and made his arrangements for
the assault. Dismounting, he ordered eight of his
men to follow his example, and turning to
Hollister
,
said
Stand you here, and guard the horses; but if
any thing attempts to pass, stop it or cut it down
and The flames at this moment burst through
the dormant windows and cedar roof of the
cottage
,
and a bright light glared on the darkness of
the night. On, shouted the trooper, on---give
quarters when you have done justice.
There was a startling fierceness in the voice of
the trooper that reached to the heart, even amid
the horrors of the cottage. The leader of the
skinners dropped his plunder, and for a moment
stood in nerveless dread; then rushing to a
window
,
he threw up the sashat this instant
Lawton entered, sabre in hand, into the
apartment
.
Die, miscreant! cried the trooper, cleaving
the other marauder to the jaw, but the leader
sprang into the lawn, and escaped his vengeance.
The shrieks of the appalled females restored
Lawton to his presence of mind, and the earnest
entreaty of the divine, induced him to attend to
the safety of the family. One more of the gang
fell in with the dragoons, and met with a similar
fate, but the remainder had taken the alarm in
season to escape. Occupied with Sarah, neither
Miss Singleton nor the ladies of the house,
discovered
the entrance of the skinners, until the flames
were raging around them with a fury that
threatened
the building with instant destruction. The
shrieks of Katy and of the terrified consort of
Csar
,
together with the noise and uproar in the
adjacent
apartment, first roused Miss Peyton and
Isabella
to a sense of their danger.
Merciful providence! exclaimed the alarmed
spinster; there is a dreadful confusion in the
house, and there will be bloodshed in consequence
of this affair.
There are none to fight, returned Isabella,
with a face paler than the other; Dr. Sitgreaves
is very peaceable in his disposition, and surely
Capt. Lawton would not forget himself so far.
The southern temper is quick and fiery,
continued
Miss Peyton; and your brother, feeble
and weak as he is, has looked the whole afternoon,
flushed and angry.
Good Heaven! cried Isabella, with difficulty
supporting herself on the couch of Sarah; he is
gentle as the lamb by nature, but the lion is not
his equal when roused.
We must interfere, said the spinster; our
presence will quell the tumult, and possibly save
the life of a fellow creature.
Miss Peyton was excited to do that which
she conceived was a duty worthy of her sex and
nature, and advanced with all the dignity of
injured
female feeling to the door, followed by
Isabella
,
whose energy had returned, and whose eye,
by its sparkling brilliancy, announced a soul equal
to its task. The apartment, to which Sarah had
been conveyed, was in one of the wings of the
building, and communicated with the principal
hall of the cottage by a long and usually dark
passage
.
This was now light, and across its
termination
several figures were noticed, rushing with an
impetuosity that prevented an examination of their
employment.
Let us advance, said the spinster, with a
firmness
that her face belied: They surely must
respect
our sex.
They shall, cried Isabella, taking the lead in
the enterprise, and Frances was left alone with her
sister. A few minutes were passed in silence by
the maid, as she stood earnestly gazing on the pale
countenance of Sarah, watching her reviving looks
with an anxiety that prevented her observing the
absence of her friends, when a loud crash in the
upper apartments was succeeded by a bright light
that glared through the open door, and made
objects
as distinct to the eye as if they were placed
under a noon day sun. Sarah raised herself on
her bed, and staring wildly around, pressed both
her hands on her forehead, as if endeavouring to
recollect events, and then smiling vacantly on her
sister, said
This, then, is heavenand you are one of its
bright spirits. Oh! how glorious is its radiance!
I had thought the happiness I have lately
experienced
was too much for earth. But we shall
meet againyesyeswe will meet again.
Sarah! Sarah! cried Frances, in terror; my
sistermy only sisterOh! do not smile so
horridly
:
know me or you will break my heart.
Hush, said Sarah, raising her hand for silence;
you may disturb his restsurely he will follow me
to the grave. Think you there can be two wives
in the grave? Nononooneoneone
only
one.
Frances dropped her head into the lap of her
sister
,
and wept in agony.
Do you shed tears, sweet angel, continued
Sarah, soothingly: then heaven is not exempt
from grief. But where is Henry? He was
executed
,
and he must be here too; but perhaps they
will come together. Oh, how joyful will be the
meeting!
Frances sprang on her feet, and paced the
apartment
in a bitterness of sorrow that she could not
controul. The eye of Sarah followed her in childish
admiration of her beauty and her attire, which had
been adapted to the occasion, and then pressing
her hand across her forehead, once more said
You look like my sister; but all good and
lovely spirits are alike. Tell me, were you ever
married? Did you ever let another, and a
stranger
,
steal your affections from your father, and
brother, and sister, as I have done? If not, poor
wretch I pity you, although you may be in heaven.
Sarahpeace, peaceI implore you to be
silent
,
shrieked Frances, again rushing to her bed,
or you will kill me at your feet.
Another dreadful crash was heard, that shook
the building to its centre. It was the falling of
the roof, and the flames threw their light abroad
so as to make objects visible around the cottage
through the windows of the room. Frances flew
to one of them, and saw the confused group that
was collected on the lawn. Among them were
her aunt and Isabella, pointing to the fiery edifice
with distraction, and apparently urging the
dragoons
who were near them to enter it. It was the
first time the maid comprehended their danger,
and uttering a wild shriek, she flew through the
passage instinctively, without consideration or
object
.
A dense and suffocating column of smoke
opposed
her progress. She paused to breathe, when
a man caught her in his arms, and bore her in a
state of insensibility through the falling embers and
darkness, to the open air. The instant that
Frances
recovered her recollection, she perceived
that it was to Lawton she owed her life, and
throwing herself on her knees before him, she
cried
Sarah, Sarah, Sarah! Save my sister, and may
the blessing of God await you.
Her strength failed her, and she sunk on the
grass in insensibility. The trooper pointed to her
figure, and motioned to Katy for assistance, and
then advanced once more near to the cottage.
The fire had already communicated to the
woodwork
of the piazzas and windows, and the whole
exterior of the cottage, was covered with smoke.
The only entrance was through these dangers, and
even the hardy and impetuous Lawton paused to
consider. It was for a moment only, and he dashed
into the heat and darkness, where missing the
entrance
,
he wandered for a minute, and precipitated
himself back again into the lawn. Drawing a
single
breath of pure air, he renewed the effort, and
was again unsuccessful; but on a third trial, he
met a man staggering under the load of a human
body. It was neither the place, nor was there time,
to question or to make distinctions, and the
trooper
caught both together in his arms, and with
gigantic
strength, bore them through the smoke. To
his astonishment, he perceived that it was the
surgeon
and the body of one of the Skinners that he
had saved.
Archibald! he exclaimed, why, in the name
of justice did you bring this dead miscreant to light
again? His deeds are rank to heaven!
The operator was too much bewildered to
reply
instantly, but wiping the moisture from his
forehead, and clearing his lungs from the vapour
that he had inhaled, he said, piteously
Ah! it is all over. Had I been in time to have
stopped the effusion from the jugular, he might
have been saved; but the heat was conducive to
hermorrhage; yes, life is extinct indeed. Well, are
there any more wounded?
His question was put to the air, for Frances
was removed to the opposite side of the building,
where her friends were collected, and Lawton
once more had disappeared in the smoke.
By this time the flames had dispersed much of
the suffocating vapor, so that the trooper was able
to find the door, and in its very entrance he was
met by a man supporting the insensible Sarah in
his arms. There was but barely time to reach
the lawn again before the fire broke through all
the windows, and wrapped the whole building in a
single sheet of flame.
God be praised, ejaculated the preserver of
Sarah: It would have been an awful death to
have died.
The trooper turned from gazing at the edifice,
to the speaker, and, to his astonishment, instead of
one of his own men, beheld the pedlar.
Ha! the spy, he exclaimed. By heavens!
you cross me like a spectre.
Capt. Lawton, said Birch, leaning in
momentary
exhaustion against the fence to which they
had retired from the heat, I am again in your
power, for I can neither flee nor resist.
The cause of America is dear to me as life,
said the trooper; but she cannot require me
to forget both gratitude and honour. Fly,
unhappy
man, while yet you are unseen by my men, or
I cannot save you.
May God prosper you, and make you
victorious
over your enemies, cried Birch, grasping the
hand of the dragoon with an iron strength that his
meagre figure did not indicate.
Hold! said Lawton, but a wordare you
what you seem?can youare you
A royal spy, interrupted Birch, averting his
face, and endeavouring to release his hand.
Then go, miserable wretch, said the trooper,
Vol. II. 9
relinquishing his grasp; either avarice or
delusion
has lead a noble heart astray.
The bright light from the flames reached to a
great distance around what was left of the
building
,
but the words were hardly passed the lips of
Lawton, before the gaunt form of the pedlar had
glided over the visible space and plunged into
the darkness beyond, which was rendered more
gloomy by the contrast.
The eye of Lawton rested for a moment on the
spot where he had last seen this inexplicable man,
and then turning to the yet insensible Sarah, he
lifted her in his arms, and bore her like a sleeping
infant to the care of her friends.
CHAPTER VII.
And now her charms are fading fast,
Her spirits now no more are gay!
Alas! that beauty cannot last!
That flowers so sweet so soon decay!
How sad appears
The vale of years,
How chang'd from youth's too flattering scene!
Where are her fond admirers gone?
Alas! and shall there then be none
On whom her soul may lean?
Cynthia's grave
.
The
torrent and the blast can mar the loveliest
scenes in nature;war, with his ruthless hand
may rival the elements in their work of
destruction
but
it is passion alone that can lay waste the
human heart. The whirlwind and the floor have
duration in their existence, and have bounds to
their fury; the earth recovers from the
devastation
of the conflict with a fertility that seems
enriched
by the blood of its victims.But there are
feelings that no human agency can limit, and
mental
wounds that surpass the art of man to heal.
For some years Sarah Wharton had indulged in
contemplations on the person and character of
Wellmere, that were natural to her sex and
situation
;
and now, when these transient recollections
were become permanent from security, and she
looked forward to the moment that she was to
take the most momentous step of her life, with that
engrossing passion which marks a woman's love,
the discovery of his real character was a blow too
heavy for her faculties to bear. It has already
been seen, that her first indications of returning life,
were unaccompanied by a consciousness of what
had so recently occurred, nor did her friends, on
receiving her from the arms of the trooper,
recover
more than the lovely image of her whom they
had once known.
The walls of the cottage were all that was
left of the building, and these, blackened by
smoke and stripped of their piazzas and
ornaments
,
served only as dreary memorials of the
peaceful contentment and security that had so
lately
reigned within. The roof, together with the rest
of the wood-work, had tumbled into the cellars,
and a pale and flitting light ascending from their
embers, shone faintly through the windows on
objects
in the lawn. The early flight of the
Skinners
left the dragoons at liberty to exert
themselves
in saving much of the furniture from the
flames, and this lay scattered in heaps, giving the
finishing touch of desolation to the scene.
Whenever
a stronger ray of light than common shot
upwards
,
the composed figures of sergeant Hollister
and his associates, sitting on their horses in rigid
discipline, were to be seen in the back ground of
the picture, together with the beast of Mrs.
Flanagan
,
that having slipt its bridle, was quietly
grazing
by the highway. Betty herself had advanced
to where the sergeant was posted, and with an
incredible
degree of composure, witnessed the whole
of the events as they occurred. More than once
she suggested to her companion the probability,
as the fighting seemed to be over, that the proper
time for plunder was arrived, but the veteran
promptly acquainted her with his orders, and
remained
both inflexible and immoveable; until the
washerwoman noticing Lawton to come round the
wing of the building with Sarah, ventured by
herself
amongst the warriors. The trooper, after
placing Sarah on a sofa that had been hurled from
the building by two of his men, refired with
delicacy
,
that the ladies might succeed him in his care,
and in order to reflect on what further was
necessary
to be done. Miss Peyton and her niece flew,
with a rapture that was blessed with a momentary
forgetfulness of all but her preservation, to receive
Sarah from the trooper, but the vacant eye and
flushed cheek, restored them instantly to their
recollection
.
Sarah, my child, my beloved niece. said the
spinster, folding her in her arins, you are saved,
and may the blessing of God await him who has
been the instrument.
See, said Sarah, gently pushing her aunt
aside, and pointing to the glimmering ruins, the
windows are illuminated in honour of my arrival.
They always receive a bride thushe told me so;
listen, and you will hear the bells.
Here is no bride, no rejoicing, nothing but
woe, cried Frances, in a manner but little less
frantic than that of her sister; Oh! may heaven
restore you my sister to usto yourself.
Peace, foolish young woman, said Sarah,
with a smile of affected pity, all cannot be
happy
at the same moment; perhaps you have no
brother, or no husband to console you; you look
beautiful, and will yet find one, but, she
continued
,
dropping her voice to a whisper, see
that he has no other wife'tis dreadful to think
what might happen should he be twice married.
The shock has destroyed her mind, said
Miss Peyton, shaking with apprehension, and
clasping her hands in agony, my child, my
beauteous
Sarah is a maniac.
No, no, no, cried Frances, it is fever
she is light-headed----she must recovershe shall
recover.
9*
The aunt caught joyfully at the hope conveyed
in this suggestion, and despatched Katy to request
the immediate aid and advice of Dr. Sitgreaves.
The operator was found enquiring among the men
for professional employment, and inquisitively
examining
every bruise and scratch that he could
induce the sturdy warriors to acknowledge they
had received. A summons of the sort conveyed
by Katy was instantly obeyed, and not a minute
elapsed before he was by the side of Miss Peyton.
This is a melancholy termination to so joyful
a commencement of the night. Madam, he
observed
,
with a soothing manner; but war must bring
its attendant miseries, though doubtless it often
supports the cause of liberty, and improves the
knowledge of surgical science.
Miss Peyton could make no reply, but pointed
to her niece in agony.
'Tis fever, answered Frances, see how
glassy is her eye, and look at her cheek, how
flushed.
The surgeon stood for a moment deeply
studying
the outward symptoms of his patient, and then
silently took her hand into his own. It was
seldom
that the hard and abstracted features of the
operator discovered any violent emotion; all his
passions seemed schooled to the most classical
dignity
,
and his countenance did not often betray
what his heart so frequently felt. In the present
instance, however, the eager gaze of the aunt and
sister soon detected the emotions of Sitgreaves.
After laying his fingers for a minute on the
beautiful
arm, which, bared to the elbow, and
glittering
with jewels, Sarah suffered him to retain, he
dropped it with a heavy sigh, and dashing his hand
over his eyes, turned sorrowfully to Miss Peyton
as he said---
Here is no fever to excite'tis a case, my
dear madam, for time and care only; these, with
the blessing of God, may effect a cure.
And where is the wretch who has caused this
ruin, exclaimed Singleton, rejecting the support
of his man, and making an effort to rise from the
chair where the care of his sister had placed him.
It is in vain that we overcome our enemies, if
conquered
they can still inflict such wounds as this.
Dos't think foolish boy, said Lawton with a
bitter smile, that hearts can feel in a colony?
What is America but a satellite of Englandto
move as she moves, follow where she wists, and
shine that the mother country may become more
splendid by her radiance. Surely you forget that
it is honour enough for a colonist to receive ruin
from the hand of a child of Britain.
I forget not that I wear a sword, said
Singleton
,
falling back exhausted; but was there no
willing arm ready to avenge that lovely sufferer
to appease the wrongs of this hoary father.
Neither arms nor hearts are wanting, sir, in
such a cause, said the trooper fiercely; but
chance oftentimes helps the wicked. By heavens,
I'd give Roanoke himself for a clear field with the
miscreant.
Nay! captain dear, no be parting with the
horse, any way, said Betty, with a significant
look; it is no trifle that can be had by jist
asking
,
and the baste is sure of foot and jumps like a
squirrel.
Woman! cried Lawton, fifty horses, ay, the
best that were ever reared on the banks of the
Potomac, would be but a paltry price for one blow
at such a villain.
Come. said the surgeon, the night air can
do no service to George or these ladies, and it is
incumbent on us to remove them where they
can find surgical attendance and refreshment.
Here is nothing but smoking ruins and the miasma
of the swamps.
To this rational proposition, no objection could
be raised, and the necessary orders were issued
by Lawton to remove the whole party to the Four
Corners.
America furnished but few and very
indifferent
carriage makers at the period of which we
write, and every vehicle that in the least
aspired
to the dignity of patrician notice, was the
manufacture of a London mechanic. When Mr.
Wharton left the city, he was one of the very few
that maintained the state of a carriage in his
establishment
,
and at the time that Miss Peyton and
his daughters joined him in his retirement, they
had been conveyed to the cottage in the heavy
chariot that had once so imposingly rolled through
the windings of Queen Street, or emerged with
sombre dignity into the more spacious drive of
Broadway. This vehicle stood undisturbed where
it had been placed on its arrival, and the ages of
the horses had alone protected the favourites of
Csar from sequestration, by the contending
forces
in their neighbourhood. With a heavy heart
the black, assisted by a few of the dragoons,
proceeded
to prepare it for the reception of the
ladies
.
It was a cumbrous vehicle, whose faded
linings and tarnished hammercloths, together with
its pannels of changing colour, denoted the want
of that art which had once given it lustre and
beauty. The lion couchant of the Wharton
arms, was reposing on the reviving splendour of a
blazonry that told the armorial bearings of a prince
of the church, and the mitre that already began
to shine through its American mask, was a symbol
of the rank of its original owner. The chaise
which conveyed Miss Singleton was also safe, for
the stables and out-buildings had entirely escaped
the flames; it certainly had been no part of the
plan of the marauders to leave so well appointed
a stud behind them, but the suddenness of the
attack
by Lawton, not only disconcerted their
arrangement on this point, but on many others
also. A guard was left on the ground under the
command of Hollister, who having discovered that
his enemy was of mortal mould, took his position
with admirable coolness and no little skill, to
guard against surprise. He drew off his small
party to such a distance from the ruins, that it was
effectually concealed in the darkness, while at the
same time the light continued sufficiently
powerful
to discover any one, who might approach the
lawn with an intent to plunder.
Satisfied with this judicious arrangement, Capt.
Lawton made his dispositions for the march: Miss
Peyton and her two nieces with Isabella, were
placed
in the chariot, while the cart of Mrs. Flanagan
being amply supplied with blankets and a bed, was
honoured with the persons of Capt. Singleton and
his man. Dr. Sitgreaves took charge of the chaise
and Mr. Wharton, and what became of the rest of
the family during that eventful night is unknown;
for Csar, alone, of the domestics, was to be found,
if we except the house keeper. Having disposed of
the whole party in this manner, Lawton gave the
word to march. He remained himself for a few
minutes alone on the lawn, secreting various pieces
of plate and other valuables, that he ws fearful
might tempt the cupidity of his own men; when
perceiving nothing more that he conceived likely
to overcome their honesty, he threw himself into
the saddle, with the soldierly intention of bringing
up the rear.
Stop, stop. cried a female voice, will you
leave me alone to be murdered; the spoon is
melted I believe, and I'll have compensation if
there's law or justice in the land.
Lawton turned an enquiring eye in the direction
of the sound, and perceived a female emerging
from the ruins, loaded with an enormous bundle,
that vied in size with the renowned pack of the
pedlar.
Who have we here? said the trooper,
rising
like a phnix from the flames; oh! by the
soul of Hippocrates, but it is the identical
she-doctor
of famous needle reputation. Well, good
woman, what means this outcry?
Outcry! echoed Katy, panting for breath;
is it not disparagement enough to lose a silver
spoon, but I must be left alone in this dreary place
to be robbed, and perhaps murdered? Harvey
would not serve me so; when I lived with Harvey
I was always treated with respect at least, if he
was a little close with his secrets, and wasteful
with his money.
Then you once formed part of the household,
Madam, of Mr. Harvey Birch?
You may say I was the whole of his
household
,
returned the other; there was nobody but
I and he, and the old gentleman; you did'nt know
the old gentleman, did you?
That happiness was denied me, said Lawton,
but how long did you live in the family of this
Birch?
I disremember the precise time, said Katy,
but it must have been hard on upon nine years,
but what better am I for it all?
Sure enough, I can see but little benefit that
you have derived from the association truly. But
is there not something odd in Mr. Birch?
Odd indeed, replied Katy, lowering her voice
and looking around her; he was a wonderful
disregardful man, and minded a guinea no more
than I do a karnal of corn. But help me to some
way of joining Miss Jeanette, and I will tell you
prodigies of what Harvey has done first and last.
You will! exclaimed the trooper, musing,
here, give me leave to feel your arm above the
elbow---there---it is no small matter of bone that
you have, I see. So saying he gave the spinster
a sudden whirl that at once destroyed her
philosophy
of mind, and effectually confused all her
faculties
,
until she found herself safely if not
comfortably
seated on the crupper of Lawton's steed.
Now, Madam, you have the consolation of
knowing that you are as well mounted as heart
can wish. The nag is sure of foot, and will leap
like a panther.
Let me get down, cried Katy, struggling to
release herself from his iron grasp, and yet afraid
of falling; this is no way to put a woman on a
horse, besides I can't ride without a pillion.
Softly, good madam, said Lawton; for
although
Roanoke never falls before, he sometimes
rises behind. He is far from being accustomed to
a pair of heels beating upon his flanks like a
drummajor
on a field daya single touch of the spur
will serve him for a fortnight, and it's by no
means wise to be kicking in this manner, for he is
a horse that but little likes to be outdone.
Let me down, I say, screamed Katy, I
shall fall and be killed. Besides, I have nothing to
hold on with, my arms are full, don't you see.
True, returned the trooper, observing that
he had brought bundle and all from the ground,
I perceive that you belong to the baggage guard;
but my sword-belt will encircle your little waist
as well as my own.
Katy was too much pleased with this
compliment
to make any resistance while he buckled
her close to his own Herculean frame, and driving
a spur into his charger they flew from the lawn with
a rapidity that defied further denial. After trotting
on for some time, at a rate that discomposed the
spinster vastly, they overtook the cart of the
washerwoman
driving slowly over the stones, with a proper
consideration for the wounds of Capt. Singleton.
The occurrences of that eventful night had
produced
an excitement in the young soldier, that
was followed by the ordinary lassitude of re-action,
and he lay carefully enveloped in blankets, and
supported by his man, but little able to converse,
though deeply brooding over the past. The
dialogue
between Lawton and his companion,
ceased with the commencement of their motions,
but a foot pace being more favourable to speech,
the trooper began anew
Then you have been an inmate in the same
house with Harvey Birch?
For more as nine years, said Katy, drawing
her breath, and rejoicing greatly that their speed
was abated.
The deep tones of the trooper's voice, were
soon convey'd by the night air to the ears of the
washerwoman, and turning her head, where she
sat directing the movements of her mare, she
heard both question and answer.
Belike then, good woman, yee'r knowing
whether or no he's a-kin to Beelzeboob, said
Betty; it's Sargeant Hollister who's saying the
same, and no fool is the sargent, any way.
It's a scandalous disparagement, cried Katy,
most vehemently, there's no kinder soul than
Harvey that carries a pack; and for a gownd or a
tidy apron, he will never take a King's farthing
from a friend. Belzebub indeed! For what would
he read the bible if he had bealings with the evil
spirit?
He's an honest divil, any way, as I was
saying
before, returned Betty; the guinea was
pure. But then the sargeant thinks him amiss,
and it's no want of larning that Mister Hollister
has.
He's a fool, said Katy tartly. Harvey moutht
be a man of substance, but he's so disregardful.
How often have I told him, that if he did nothing
but peddle, and would put his gains to use, and
get married, so that things at home could be kept
snug and tidy, and leave off his dealings with the
rig'lars and all sich incumberments, that he would
soon be an excellent liver. Sergeant Hollister
would be glad to hold a candle to him, I guess,
indeed.
Pooh! said Betty, in her philosophical way;
yee'r no thinking that Mister Hollister is an
officer
,
and stands next the cornet in the troop.
But this pedlar gave warning of the brush, the
night, and it's no sure, that Captain Jack would
have got the day, but for the rinforcement.
How say you, Betty, cried the trooper,
bending forward on his saddle, had you notice
of our danger from this said Birch?
The very same, darling; and it's hurry I was
till the boys was in motionnot but I knew yee'r
enough for the cow-boys, any time. But wi'd
the divil on your side, I was sure of the day. I'm
only wondering there's so little plunder in a
business
of Beelzeboob's contriving.
I'm obliged to you for the rescue, said
Lawton
,
and equally indebted to the motive.
Is it the plunder? But little did I think of it,
till I saw the moveables on the ground, some burnt
and some broke, and other some as good as new.
It would be convanient to have one feather bed
in the corps, any way.
VOL. II. 10
By heavens, 'twas timely succour. Had not
Roanoke been swifter than their bullets, I must
have fallen. The animal is worth his weight in
gold.
It's continental you mane, darling. Goold
weighs heavy, and is no plenty in the States. If
the nagur had'nt been staying and frighting the
sargeant with his copper-coloured looks, and a
matter of blarney 'bout ghosts, we should have
been in time to have killed all the dogs, and taken
the rest prisoners.
It is very well as it is, Betty, said Lawton;
a day will yet come, I trust, when these
miscreants
will be rewardedif not in judgments
upon their persons, at least in the opinions of their
fellow citizens. The time must arrive when
America will learn to distinguish between a patriot
and a robber.
Speak low, said Katy; there's some who
think much of themselves that have doings with
the skinners.
It's more they are thinking of themselves then,
than other people thinks of them, cried Betty;
a thief's a thief, any way, whether he stales for
King George or for Congress.
I knew that evil would soon happen, said
Katy; the sun set to-night behind a black cloud,
and the house-dog whined, although I gave him
his supper with my own hands; besides, it's not a
week sin I dreamed that dream about the
thousand
lighted candles, and the cakes being burnt
in the oven. Miss Peyton said it was all because
I had the tallow melted to dip the next day, and
a new baking set; but I know'd better nor that
from the beginning.
Well, said Betty, it's but little I drame,
any wayjist keep an asy conscience and a plenty
of the stuff in yee, and yee'l sleep like an infant.
The last drame I had was when the boys put the
thistle-tops in the blankets, and then I was
thinking
that Captain Jack's man was currying me
down, for the matter of Roanoke: but it's no trifle
I mind either in skin or stomach.
I'm sure, said Katy, with a stiff erection that
drew Lawton back in his saddle, no man should
ever dare to lay hands on any bed of mineit's
indecent and despisable conduct.
Pooh! pooh! cried Betty; if you tag after
a troop of horse, a small bit of a joke must be
borne: what would become of the states and
liberty if the boys had never a clane shirt or a
drop to comfort them? Ask Captain Jack there, if
they'd fight, Mrs. Beelzeboob, and they no clane
linen to keep the victory in.
I'm a single woman, and my name is Haynes,
said Katy, and I'd thank you to use no
disparaging
terms when speaking to me; it's what I isn't
use to, and Harvey is no more of Beelzebub nor
yourself.
You must tolerate a little license in the
tongue of Mrs. Flanagan, madam, said the
trooper; the drop she speaks of is often of an
extraordinary size, and then she has acquired the
freedom of a soldier's manner.
Pooh! captain, darling, cried Betty, why
do you bother the womantalk like yeerself,
dear, and it's no fool of a tongue that yee've got
in yee'r own head. But it's here away that the
sargeant made a halt, thinking there might be
more divils than one stirring, the night. The
clouds are as black as Arnold's heart, and deuce
the star is there a twinkling among them. Well,
the mare is used to a march after night-fall, and is
smelling out the road like a pointer slut.
It wants but little to the rising moon,
observed
the trooper. He called a dragoon who was
riding in advance, to him, gave a few orders and
cautions relative to the comfort and safety of
Singleton
,
and speaking a consoling word to his friend
himself, gave Roanoke the spur, and dashed by
the cart at a rate that again put to flight all the
philosophy of Katharine Haynes.
Good luck to yee for a free rider and a bold,
shouted the washerwoman as he passed, if yee'r
meeting Mister Beelzeboob, jist back the baste
up to him and show him his consort that yee've
got on the crupper. I'm thinking it's no long he'd
tarry to chat. Well, well, it's his life that we
saved
,
he was saying himselfthough the plunder
is nothing to signify.
The cries of Betty Flanagan were too familiar
to the ears of Captain Lawton to cause any
alteration
in the gait of his steed, or to elicit a reply.
Notwithstanding the unusual burden that Roanoke
sustained, he got over the ground with great
rapidity
,
and the distance between the cart of Mrs.
Flanagan and the chariot of Miss Peyton, was
passed in a manner that, however it answered the
intentions of the trooper, in no degree contributed
to the comfort of his companion. The meeting
occurred but a short distance from the quarters of
Lawton, and at the same instant the moon broke
from behind a mass of clouds that hovered over
the horizon, and threw a light upon objects that
seemed paler than usual after the glaring
brightness
of the conflagration. There is, however, a
sweetness in moonlight that no competition of art
can equal, and Lawton checked his horse, and
mused in silence for the remainder of the ride.
Compared with the simple elegance and
substantial
comfort of the Locusts, the Hotel
Flanagan
presented but a dreary spectacle. In the
place of carpeted floors and curtained windows,
were the yawning cracks of a rudely constructed
dwelling, and boards and paper were
ingeniously
applied to supply the place of the green glass
in more than half the lights. The care of
Lawton
had anticipated every improvement that their
situation would allow, and blazing fires were made
before the party arrived, to cheer as much as
possible
the desolation within. The dragoons who
had been charged with this duty, conveyed a few
necessary articles of furniture, and Miss Peyton
and her companions on alighting, found something
like habitable apartments prepared for their
reception
.
The mind of Sarah had continued to
wander during the ride, and, with the pliability of
insanity, she accommodated every circumstance to
the feelings that were uppermost in her own
bosom
.
It was necessary to support her to the room
intended for the ladies; but the instant she was
placed on the seat where her sister sat, she passed
an arm affectionately around the waist of Frances,
and pointing slowly with the other, said in an
under
tone---
See, this is the palace of his father; here is
the light of a thousand torches---but no
bridegroom
.
Oh! never---never wed without a ring---
a prepared ring; and be wary lest another has a
right to it. Poor little girl, how you tremble! but
you are safe---there never can be two bridegrooms
for more than one bride.---Oh!---no---no---no---
do not tremble, do not weep, you are safe.
It is impossible to minister to a mind that has
sustained such a blow, said the trooper, who was
compassionately regarding the ruin, to Isabella
Singleton; time and God's mercy can alone
avail her; but something more may be done
towards
the bodily comfort of you all. You are a
solider's daughter and used to scenes like this;
help me to exclude some of the cold air from these
windows.
10*
Miss Singleton promptly acceded to his request,
and while Lawton was endeavouring from without
to remedy the defect of broken panes, Isabella
was arranging a substitute for a curtain within.
I hear the cart, said the trooper, in reply to
one of her interrogatories. Betty is
tender-hearted
in the main; believe me, poor George
will not only be safe but comfortable.
God bless her for her care, and bless you all,
said Isabella fervently. Dr. Sitgreaves has gone
down the road to meet him, I knowbut what is
that glittering in the moon-beams?
Directly opposite to the window where they
stood, were the out-buildings of the farm, and the
quick eye of Lawton caught at a glance the object
to which she alluded.
'Tis the glare of fire-arms, said the trooper,
springing from the window towards his charger,
who yet remained caparisoned at the door. His
movement was quick as thought, but a flash of fire
was followed by the whistling of a bullet, before
he had proceeded a step. A loud shriek burst from
the dwelling, and the Captain sprang into his
saddle
the
whole was the business of but a moment.
Mountmount, and follow, shouted the
trooper, and before his astonished men could
understand
the cause of alarm, Roanoke had carried
him in safety over the fence which intervened
between
him and his foe. The chase was for life and
death, but the distance to the rocks was again too
short, and the disappointed trooper saw his
intended
victim vanish in their clefts where he could
not follow.
By the life of Washington, muttered
Lawton
,
as he sheathed his sabre, I would have made
two halves of him had he not been so nimble on
the footbut a time will come. So saying he
returned to his quarters with the indifference of a
man who knew his life was at any moment to be
offered a sacrifice to his country. An
extraordinary
tumult in the house induced him to quicken
his speed, and on arriving at the door, the
panic-stricken
Katy informed him that, the bullet aimed
at his own life had taken effect in the bosom of
Miss Singleton.
CHAPTER VIII.
Hush'd were his Gertrude's lips! but still their bland
And beautiful expression seem'd to melt
With love that could not die! and still his hand
She presses to the heart no more that felt.
Gertrude of Wyoming
.
The brief arrangement of the dragoons had
prepared
two apartments for the reception of the
ladies
,
the one being intended as a sleeping room
and situated within the other. Into the latter,
Isabella was immediately conveyed at her own
request, and placed on a rude bed by the side of
the unconscious Sarah. When Miss Peyton and
Frances flew to her assistance, they found her
with a smile on her pallid lips, and a composure
in her countenance, that induced them to think
her uninjured.
God be praised, exclaimed the trembling
spinster; the report of fire-arms, and your fall,
had led me into an error. Surely, surely, there
was enough of horror before, but this has been
spared us.
Isabella pressed her hands upon her bosom, still
smiling, but with a ghastliness that curdled the
blood of Frances, and said
Is George far distant? let him knowhasten
him, that I may see my brother once again.
It is as I apprehended! shrieked Miss
Peyton
;
but you smilesurely you are unhurt.
Quite wellquite happy, murmured
Isabella
;
here is a remedy for every pain.
Sarah arose from the reclining posture she had
taken, and gazed wildly at her companion. She
stretched forth her own hand, and raised that of
Isabella from her bosom, where she had continued
to hold it, and exhibited it stained with blood.
See, said Sarah, there is blood, but it will
wash away love! Marry, young woman, and then
no one can expel him from your heart, unless,
she added, whispering and bending over the other,
you find another there before youthen die and
go to heaventhere are no wives in heaven.
The lovely maniac hid her face under the
clothes, and continued silent during the
remainder
of the night. It was at this moment that
Lawton
entered. Inured as he was to danger in all its
forms, and accustomed to the horrors of a partisan
war, the trooper could not behold the ruin before
him unmoved. He bent over the fragile form of
Isabella, and the gloomy lowering of his eye
betrayed
the extraordinary workings of his soul.
Isabella, he at length ultered, I know you
to possess a courage beyond the strength of
woman
.
Speak, she said earnestly, if you have any
thing to say, speak fearlessly.
The trooper averted his face as he replied
none ever receive a ball there and survive.
I have no dread of death, Lawton, returned
IsabellaI thank you for not doubting me; I
felt it from the first.
These are not scenes for a form like yours,
added the trooper;  'tis enough that Britain calls
our youth to the field, but when such loveliness
becomes the victim of war, I sicken at my trade.
Hear me, capt. Lawton, said Isabella, raisin
herself with difficulty, but rejecting aid; from
early womanhood to the present hour have I been
an inmate of camps and garrisons. It was to
cheer the leisure of a father and brother, and
think you I would change those days of danger
and privation for all the luxurious ease of
England's
palace? The paleness of her cheek gave
place to a flush of ardor as she continuedNo!
I have the consolation of knowing in my dying
moments, that what woman could do in such a
cause, I have done.
Who could prove a recreant and witness such
a spirit! exclaimed the trooper; unconsciously
grasping the hilt of his sabre. Hundreds of
warriors have I witnessed in their blood, but
never
a firmer soul among them all.
Ah! 'tis the soul only, said Isabella; my
sex and strength have forbidden me the dearest of
privileges.But to you, Captain Lawton, nature
has been bountiful: yours are an arm and a heart
to make the proudest of Britain's soldiers quail;
and I know that they are an arm and a heart that
will prove true to the last.
So long as liberty calls, and Washington
points the way, returned the trooper, in the low
tone of determination, and smiling proudly.
I know itI know itand Georgeand
she paused, her lip quivered, and her eye sunk to
the floor.
And Dunwoodie! echoed the trooper;
would to God he was here to witness and
admire
.
Name him not, said Isabella, sinking back
upon the bed, and concealing her face in her
garments; leave me, Lawton, and prepare
poor George for this unexpected blow.
The trooper continued for a little while gazing
in melancholy interest at the convulsive
shudderings
of her frame, which the scanty covering
could not conceal, and withdrew to meet his
comrade. The interview between Singleton and
his sister was painful, and for a moment Isabella
yielded to a burst of tenderness; but, as if aware
that her hours were numbered, she was the first
to rouse herself to exertion. At her earnest
request
the room was left to herself, the captain,
and Frances. The repeated applications of the
surgeon to be permitted to use professional aid
were steadily rejected, and, at length, he was
obliged unwillingly to retire. The rapid approach
of death gave to the countenance of Isabella a
look of more than usual wildness, her large and
dark eyes being strongly contrasted to the ashy
paleness of her cheeks. Still Frances, as she
leaned over her in sorrow, thought that the
expression
was changed. Much of the loftiness
that formed so marked a characteristic of her
beauty, had been succeeded by an appearance of
humility, and it was not difficult to fancy, that
with the world itself there was vanishing her
worldly pride.
Raise me, she said, and let me look on a
face that I love, once more. Frances silently
complied, and Isabella turned her eyes in sisterly
affection upon GeorgeIt matters but little,
my brothera few hours must close the scene.
Live Isabella, my sister, my only sister,
cried the youth with a burst of sorrow that he
could not control; my father! my poor father
Ah! there is the sting of death, said
Isabella
shuddering; but he is a soldier and a
christian
Miss
Wharton I would speak of what
interests
you, while yet I have strength for the task.
Nay, said Frances tenderly, compose
yourselflet no desire to oblige me endanger a
life that is precious totoso many. The
words were nearly stifled by the emotions of the
maid, who had touched a chord that thrilled to
her inmost heart.
Poor sensitive girl, said Isabella, regarding
her with tender interest; but the world is still
before you, and why should I disturb the little
happiness it may yet afford!dream on lovely
innocent
!
and may God keep the evil day of
knowledge
far distant.
Oh, there is even now little left for me to
enjoy, said Frances, burying her face in the
clothes; I am heart-stricken in all that I most
loved.
No! interrupted Isabella; You have one
inducement to wish for life that pleads strongly in
a woman's breast. It is a delusion that nothing
but death can destroy Exhaustion compelled
her to pause, and her auditors continued in
breathless
suspense until, recovering her strength, she
laid her hand on that of Frances, and continued
more mildly Miss Wharton, if there breathes
a spirit congenial to Dunwoodie's, and worthy of
his love, it is your own.
A flush of fire passed over the face of the
listener
,
and she raised her eyes flashing with an
ungovernable look of delight to the countenance
of Isabella; but the ruin she beheld recalled her
better feelings, and again her head dropped upon
the covering of the bed. Isabella watched her
emotions with a smile that partook both of pity
and admiration.
Such have been the feelings that I have
escaped
,
she continued; yes, Miss Wharton,
Dunwoodie is wholly yours.
Be just to yourself, my sister, exclaimed
the youth; let no romantic generosity cause you
to forget your own character.
She heard him, and fixed a gaze of tender
interest
on his face, but slowly shook her head as
she replied
It is not romance, but truth that bids me
speak. Oh! how much have I lived within an
hour! Miss Wharton, I was born under the
burning
sun of Georgia, and my feelings seem to have
imbibed its warmthI have existed for passion
only.
Say not sosay not so, I implore you, cried
the agitated brother; think how devoted has been
your love to our aged fatherhow disinterested,
how tender your affection for me.
Yes, said Isabella, a smile of mild pleasure
beaming on her countenance; that is a
reflection
which may be taken to the very grave.
Neither Frances, nor her brother, interrupted
her meditations, which continued for several
minutes
;
when, suddenly recollecting herself, she
continued
I remain selfish even to the last; with me,
Miss Wharton, America and her liberties was my
earliest passion, and again she paused, and
Frances thought it was the struggle of death that
followed; but reviving, she proceeded with a flush
on her face that exceeded the bloom of health,
Why should I hesitate on the brink of the grave!
Dunwoodie was my next and my last. But,
burying
her face in her hands, it was a love that
was unsought.
Isabella! exclaimed her brother, springing
from the bed, and pacing the floor in disorder.
See how dependent we become under the
dominion
of worldly pride, said the dying maiden;
it is painful to George to learn that one he loves,
had not feelings superior to her nature and
education
.
Say no more, whispered Frances; you
distress
us bothsay no more, I entreat you.
VOL. 11
In justice to Dunwoodie I must speak; and
for the same reason, my brother, you must listen.
In no act or work has Dunwoodie ever induced
me to believe, he wished me more than a friend
naylatterly, I have had the burning shame of
thinking that he avoided my presence.
Would he dare! said Singleton fiercely.
Peace, my brother, and listen, continued
Isabella, rousing with an effort that was final;
here is the innocent, the justifiable cause. We
are both motherlessbut that auntthat mild,
plain hearted, observing aunt, has given you the
victory. Oh! how much she loses, who loses a
female guardian to her youth. I have exhibited
those feelings which you have been taught to
repress
.
After this, can I wish to live!
Isabella! my poor Isabella! you wander in
your mind.
But one word morefor I feel that blood
which ever flowed too swift, rushing where nature
never intended it to go. Woman must be sought,
to be prizedher life is one of concealed
emotions
;
blessed are they whose early impressions
make the task free from hypocrisy, for such only
can be happy with men likelikeDunwoodie;
her voice failed and she sunk back on her
pillow
in silence. The cry of Singleton brought
the rest of the party to her bed side, but death
was already upon her countenance; her
remaining
strength just sufficed to reach the hand of
George, and pressing it to her bosom for a
moment
,
she relinquished her grasp, and, with a slight
convulsion, expired.
Frances Wharton had thought that fate had
done its worst, in endangering the life of her
brother
,
and destroying the reason of her sister, but
the relief that was conveyed by the dying
declaration
of Isabella, taught her that another sorrow
had aided in loading her heart with grief. She
saw the whole truth at a glance; nor was the
manly delicacy of Dunwoodie's forbearance lost
upon herevery thing tended to raise him in her
estimation; and for mourning that duty and pride
had induced her to strive to think less of him,
she was compelled to substitute regret that her
own act had driven him from her in sorrow, if not
in desperation. It is not the nature of youth,
however, to despair, and Frances knew a secret
joy in the midst of their distress, that gave a new
spring to her existence.
The sun broke forth, on the morning that
succeeded
this night of desolation, in unclouded
lustre
,
and seemed to mock the petty sorrows of
those who received his rays. Lawton had early
ordered his steed, and was ready to mount as the
first burst of golden light broke over the hills.
His orders were already given, and the trooper
threw his leg across the saddle in silence; and,
casting a glance of fierce chagrin at the narrow
space that had favoured the flight of the Skinner,
he gave Roanoke the rein and moved slowly
towards
the valley.
The stillness of death pervaded the road, nor
was there a single vestige of the scenes of the
night to tarnish the loveliness of a glorious morn.
Struck with the contrast between man and nature,
the fearless trooper rode by each pass of danger,
regardless of what might happen, nor roused
himself
from his musings, until the noble charger,
proudly snuffing the morning air, greeted his
companions
,
as they stood patiently by the sides of
their masters, who composed the guard under
sergeant
Hollister.
Here, indeed, was sad evidence to be seen of
the midnight fray, but the trooper glanced his eye
over it with the coolness of a veteran, and
checked
his horse as he gained the spot selected by the
cautious orderly, and slightly returning his salute,
inquired---
Have you seen any thing?
Nothing, sir, that we dare charge upon,
returned
Hollister, with a little solemnity; but we
mounted once at the report of distant fire arms.
'Tis well, said Lawton, gloomily. Ah!
Hollister, I would give the animal I ride, to have
had your single arm between the wretch who drew
that triger and these useless rocks, which overhang
every bit of ground, as if they grudged pasture to
a single hoof.
The dragoons exchanged looks of surprise, and
wondered what could have occurred to tempt
their leader to offer such a bribe.
Under the light of day, and charging man to
man, 'tis but little I fear, said the sergeant, with
proud resolution; but I can't say that I'm
overfond
of fighting with them that neither steel nor
lead can bring down.
What mean you, silly fellow? cried Lawton,
frowning in disdain; none live who can
withstand
either.
If there was life, it would be easy to take it,
returned the other; but blows and powder
cannot
injure him that has already been in the grave.
I like not the dark object that has been hovering
in the skirt of the wood, since the first dawn of
day; and twice during the night the same was
seen moving across the fire-lightno doubt with
evil intent.
Ha! said the trooper, is it yon ball of black
at the foot of the rock-maple, that you mean?
By heaven! it moves.
Yes, and without mortal motion, said the
sergeant, regarding it with awful reverence; it
glides along, but no feet have been seen by any
who watch here.
Had it wings, cried Lawton, it is mine;
stand fast, until I join. The words were hardly
uttered, before Roanoke was flying across the
plain, and apparently verifying the boast of his
master.
Those cursed rocks! ejaculated the trooper,
as he saw the object of his pursuit approaching
the hill-side; but either from want of practice, or
from terror, it passed the obvious shelter they
offered
,
and fled into the open plain.
I have you, man or devil! shouted Lawton,
whirling his sabre from its scabbard. Halt, and
take quarter.
His proposition was apparently acceded to, for
at the sound of his powerful voice, the figure sunk
upon the ground, exhibiting a shapeless ball of
black, without life or motion.
What have we here? cried Lawton, drawing
up by its side; a gala suit of the good maiden,
Jeanette Peyton, wandering around its birth-place,
or searching in vain for its discomfited mistress?
He leaned forward in his stirrups, and placing the
point of his sword under the silken garment, by
throwing aside the covering, discovered part of the
form of the reverend gentleman, who had fled from
the Locusts the evening before, in his robes of
office
.
Ah! in truth, Hollister had some ground for
his alarm; an army chaplain is at any time a
terror
to a troop of horse.
The clergyman had collected enough of his
disturbed
faculties, to discover that it was a face he
knew, and somewhat disconcerted at the terror he
had manifested, he endeavoured to rise and offer
some explanation. Lawton received his apologies
good humouredly, if not with much faith in their
11*
truth; and, after a short communication upon the
state of the valley, the trooper courteously
alighted
,
and they proceeded towards the guard.
I am so little acquainted, sir, with the rebel
uniform, that I really was unable to distinguish
whether those men, whom you say are your own,
did or did not belong to the gang of marauders.
Apology, sir, is unnecessary, replied the
trooper, curling his lip; it is not your task, as
a minister of God, to take note of the facings of
a coat. The standard under which you serve is
acknowledged by us all.
I serve under the standard of his gracious
majesty
,
George III. returned the priest, wiping the
cold sweat from his brow; but really the idea of
being scalped, has a strong tendency to unman a
new beginner like myself.
Scalped! echoed Lawton, a little fiercely,
and stopping short in his walk; then recollecting
himself, he added with infinite composureif it
is to Dunwoodie's squadron of Virginian light
dragoons
that you allude, it may be well to inform
you, that they generally take a bit of the skull
with the skin.
Oh! I can have no apprehensions of
gentlemen
of your appearance, said the divine with a
smirk; it is the natives that I apprehend.
Natives! I have that honour, I do assure you,
sir.
Nay, sir, I beg that I may be understoodI
mean the Indiansthey who do nothing but rob,
and murder, and destroy.
And scalp!
Yes, sir, and scalp too, continued the
clergyman
,
eyeing his companion a little suspiciously;
the copper-coloured, savage Indians.
And did you expect to meet those
nose-jewelled
gentry in the neutral ground?
Certainly, returned the chaplain,
confidently
;
we understand in England that the interior
swarms with them.
And call you this the interior of America?
cried Lawton, again halting, and staring the other
in the face, with a surprise too naturally expressed
to be counterfeited.
Surely, sir, I conceive myself to be in the
interior
.
Attend, said Lawton, pointing towards the
east; see you not that broad sheet of water which
the eye cannot compass in its range? thither lies
the England you deem worthy to hold dominion
over half the world. See you the land of your
nativity?
'Tis impossible to behold objects at a distance
of three thousand miles! exclaimed the
wondering
priest, a little suspicious of his companion's
sanity.
No! what a pity it is that the powers of man
are not equal to his ambition. Now turn your
eyes westward; observe that vast expanse of
water
which rolls between the shores of America and
China.
I see nothing but land, said the trembling
priest; there is no water to be seen.
'Tis impossible to behold objects at a distance
of three thousand miles! repeated Lawton
gravely
,
and pursuing in his walk; if it be the savages
that you apprehend, seek them in the ranks of
your prince. Rum and gold have preserved their
loyalty.
Nothing is more probable than my being
deceived
,
said the man of peace, casting furtive
glances at the colossal stature and whiskered front
of his companion; but the rumours we have at
home, and the uncertainty of meeting with such
an enemy as yourself, induced me to fly at your
approach.
'Twas not judiciously determined, said the
trooper, as Roanoke has the heels of you
greatly
;
and flying from Scylla, you were liable to
encounter
Charybidis. Those woods and rocks
cover
the very enemies you dread.
The savages! exclaimed the divine,
instinctively
placing the trooper in the rear.
Ay! more than savages, cried Lawton, his
dark brow contracting to a look of fierceness that
was far from quieting the apprehensions of the
other. Men, who under the guise of patriotism,
prowl through the community, with a thirst for
plunder that is unsatiable, and a love of cruelty
that mocks the Indian ferocity. Fellows, whose
mouths are filled with liberty and equality, and
whose hearts are overflowing with cupidity and
gallgentlemen that are y'clep'd the Skinners.
I have heard them mentioned in our army,
said the frightened divine, and had thought them
to be the Aborigines.
You did the savages injustice, returned the
trooper, in his naturally dry manner.
They now approached the spot occupied by
Hollister, who witnessed with surprise the
character
of the prisoner made by his captain. Lawton
gave his orders promptly, and the men
immediately
commenced securing and removing such
articles
of furniture as were thought worthy of the
trouble; and the captain, with his reverend
associate
,
who was admirably mounted on a mettled
horse, returned to the quarters of the troop.
It was the wish of Singleton, that the remains
of his sister should be conveyed to the post
commanded
by his father, and preparations were early
made to this effect, as well as a messenger
despatched
with the melancholy tidings of her death.
The wounded British were placed under the
controul
of the chaplain, and towards the middle of the
day, Lawton saw that all of the arrangements were
so far completed, as to render it probable, that in
a few hours, he would be left with his small party
in undisturbed possession of the corners.
While leaning in the door-way, gazing in moody
silence at the ground on which had been the last
night's chase, his ear caught the sound of a horse
at speed, and the next moment a dragoon of his
own troop appeared dashing up the road, as if on
business of the last importance. His steed was
foaming, and the rider had the appearance of
having done a hard day's service. Without
speaking
,
he placed a letter in the hand of Lawton, and
led his charger to the stable. The trooper knew
the hand of his major, and ran his eye over the
following:
I rejoice it is the order of Washington, that
the family at the Locusts are to be removed above
the Highlands. They are to be admitted to the
society of Captain Wharton, who waits only for
their testimony to be tried. You will
communicate
this order, and with proper delicacy I do not
doubt. The English are moving up the river, and
the moment that you see the Whartons in safety,
break up and join your troop. There will be good
service to be done when we meet, as Sir Henry
is reported to have sent out a real soldier in
command
.
Reports must be made to the
commandant
at Peekskill, as Col. Singleton is withdrawn to
head-quarters to preside over the inquiry upon
poor Wharton. Fresh orders have been sent to
hang the pedlar if we can take him, but they
are not from the commander in chief.Detail a
small guard with the ladies, and get into the
saddle
as soon as possible.
Your's, sincerely,
Peyton Dunwoodie
.
This communication entirely changed the whole
arrangement. There could be no motive to
convey
the body of Isabella to a post where her father
was not, and Singleton reluctantly acquiesced in
her immediate interment. A retired and lovely
spot was selected, near the foot of the adjacent
rocks, and such rude preparations were made as
their time and the situation of the country
permitted
.
A few of the neighbouring inhabitants
collected from curiosity and interest, and Miss
Peyton and Frances wept in sincerity over her
grave. The solemn offices of the church were
performed by the minister of God, who had so
lately stood forth to officiate in another and very
different duty; and Lawton bent down his head,
as he leaned upon his sabre, and passed his hand
across his brow, while the words were
pronouncing
that forever shut such fervent feeling and
loveliness, from the sight of man.
A new stimulus was given to the Whartons by
the intelligence conveyed in the letter of
Dunwoodie
,
and Csar, with his horses, was once more
put in requisition. The relics of the property
were entrusted to a neighbour, in whom they had
confidence, and accompanied by the unconscious
Sarah, and attended by four dragoons, and all of
the American wounded, Mr. Wharton's party took
their departure. They were speedily followed by
the English chaplain, with his countrymen, who
were conveyed to the water side, where a vessel
was in waiting to receive them. Lawton joyfully
witnessed these movements, and as soon as the
latter were out of sight, he ordered his own bugle
to be sounded. Every thing was instantly in
motion
.
The mare of Mrs. Flanagan was again
fastened
to the cart;Dr. Sitgreaves exhibited his
shapeless form once more on horseback, and the
trooper appeared in the saddle, rejoicing in his
emancipation.
The word to march was given; and Lawton,
throwing a look of sullen ferocity at the place of the
Skinners' concealment, and another of melancholy
regret towards the grave of Isabella, led the way,
accompanied by the surgeon, in a brown study;
while sergeant Hollister and Betty brought up the
rear, leaving a fresh southerly wind to whistle
through the open doors and broken windows of
the Hotel Flanagan, where the laugh of
hilarity
and the joke of the hardy partisans, had so lately
echoed in triumph.
CHAPTER IX.
No vernal blooms their torpid rocks array,
But winter, lingering, chills the lap of May;
No zephyr fondly sues the mountain's breast,
But meteors glare, and stormy glooms invest.
Goldsmith
.
It
was only after the establishment of their
independence
,
that the American people seemed to
consider themselves as any thing more than
sojourners
in the land of their nativity. Before
that ra, their inventions, their wealth, and their
glory centred in the isle of Britain, as unerringly
as the needle pointed to the pole. Forty years
of self-government has done for them, what a
century and a half of dependence was unable to
achieve.
The uneven surface of West-Chester was, at
the period of which we write, intersected with
roads in every direction, it is true; but they were
of a character with the people and the times.
None of those straight, tasteless paths which,
with premeditated convenience, running directly
from one point of the country to the other,
abound in our newly settled territory, were to be
found under the ancient regime; unless in
extraordinary
instances where a river curbed their
vagaries
on one side, and a mountain on the other.
Instead of these direct and shortened passages,
with the few exceptions we have mentioned, the
highways uniformly discovered that classical taste
which is only cherished under the institutions
that partake of the poetry of lifethe two,
forming no unapt illustration of the different
institutions
to which we have alluded. On one
side is the result of accident and circumstances,
embellished with the graces of art, so as to
render
pleasing what is not always convenient; and
on the other, a straight-forward reason, that tends
directly to the object, leaving the moral of
applicability
to atone for what it may want in beauty
and interest.
Whatever evidence of a parallel between the
roads and the governments our ingenuity may
devise, Csar Thompson found in the former
nothing
but transitory pleasures and repeated
dangers
.
So long as one of those lovely valleys
which abound in the interior of the county lay
before him, all was security and ease.
Following
the meanderings of the stream that invariably
wound through the bottom, the path lingered to
the last moment among the rich meadows and
pleasant pastures; or, running off at a right
angle
.
shot up the gentle ascent to the foot of the
hill that bounded the vale, and, sweeping by the
door of some retired dwelling, again sought the
rivulet and the meadow, until every beauty was
exhausted, and no spot, however secluded, had
escaped the prying curiosity of the genius of the
highway; then, as if eager to visit another place
of sylvan beauty, the road ran boldly to the base
of a barrier that would frighten a spirit less
adventurous
,
and, regardless of danger and
difficulties
,
kept its undeviating way until the summit
was gained, when, rioting for a moment in victory,
it as daringly plunged into the opposite vale, and
resumed its meandering and its sloth. In getting
over a highway of such varied characteristics,
Csar necessarily experienced a diversity of
VOL. II. 12
emotions. The cumbersome chariot that he
directed
moved at an even pace over the level
ground, and, perched on the elevated box, the
black felt no little of the dignity of his situation;
but the moment of ascension was one of intense
anxiety, and the descentone of terror. As
soon as the foot of a hill was discerned. Csar,
with a reasoning derived from the Dutch
settlers
of the colony, commenced applying the
whip to his venerable steeds, and accompanying
the blows with a significant cry, their ambition
was roused to the undertaking. The space
between
them and the point of struggle was flown
over with a velocity that shook the crazy vehicle,
and excessively annoyed its occupants; but the
manuvre sufficed to obtain an impetus that
carried
the steeds up the ascent one third of the way
with glory. By this time their wind was gone
their strength enfeebledand the heaviest
difficulties
remained to be overcome. Then, indeed,
it was often a matter of doubt which were to
prevail in the disputethe chariot or the horses.
But the lash and the cries of the black stimulated
the steeds to unwonted efforts, and happily they
prevailed in each of these well contested points.
Short breathing-time was allowed on gaining what
in truth might be termed the debateable land,
before a descent, more dangerous, if less difficult
than the ascent, was to be encountered. At
these moments Csar would twine the reins
round his body, in a manner of remarkable
ingenuity
,
and lead them over his head in such a way,
as to make that noble member sustain the labour
of curbing his horseswith either hand grasping
a side of his dangerous perch, and with a
countenance
showing a double row of ivory, and eyes
glistening like diamonds set in ebony, he
abandoned
every thing to the government of the
ancient
proverb of the devil take the hindmost.
The vehicle, with the zeal of a new made
convert
,
would thrust the horses to the conclusion of
the argument, with a rapidity that was utterly
discomfiting to the philosophy of the African.
But practice makes perfect; and by the time that
evening had begun to warn the travellers of the
necessity of a halt, Csar was so much
accustomed
to these critical flights, that he
encountered
them with incredible fortitude. We should
not have ventured thus to describe the
unprecedented
achievements of Mr. Wharton's
coach-horses
on this memorable occasion, did not
numberless instances still exist of those dangerous
pinnaclesto which we fearlessly refer as
vouching
for our veracitya circumstance the more
fortunate for us, when we consider, that in almost
every instance inviting passes are open, where
alterations might long since have been made, that
would have entirely deprived us of this
indisputable
testimony.
While Csar and his steeds were thus
contending
with the difficulties we have recorded, the
inmates of the carriage were too much engrossed
with their own cares to attend to those who served
them. The mind of Sarah had ceased to wander
so wildly as at first; but at every advance that
she made towards reason she seemed to retire a
step from animationfrom being excited and
flighty, she was gradually becoming moody and
melancholy. There were moments indeed when
her anxious companions thought, with extacy,
that they could discern marks of recollection;
but the expression of exquisite woe that
accompanied
these transient gleams of reason, forced
them to the dreadful alternative of wishing, at
times, that she might forever be spared the agony
of thought. The day's march was performed
chiefly in silence, and the party found shelter for
the night in different farm-houses.
The following morning the cavalcade dispersed.
The wounded diverged towards the river, with the
intention of taking water at Peeks-kill, and thus
be transported to the hospitals of the American
army abovethe litter of Singleton was
conveyed
to a part of the highlands where his father held
his quarters, and where it was intended that the
youth should complete his curethe carriage of
Mr. Wharton, accompanied by a wagon,
conveying
the housekeeper and what baggage had
been saved and could be transported, resumed
its route towards the place where Henry
Wharton
was held in duresse, and where he only waited
their arrival to be put upon trial for his life.
The country which lies between the waters of
the Hudson and Long-Island Sound, is, for the
the first forty miles from their junction, a
succession
of hills and dales. The land bordering on
the latter then becomes less abrupt, and
gradually
assumes a milder appearance, until it finally
melts into the lovely plains and meadows of the
Connecticut. But as you approach the Hudson
the rugged aspect increases, until you at length
meet with the formidable barrier of the
Highlands
.
It was here the Neutral Ground ceased.
The royal army held the two points of land that
commanded the Southern entrance of the river
into the the mountains; but all of the remaining
passes were guarded by the Americans.
We have already stated that the picquets of
the Continental army were sometimes pushed
low into the country, and that the hamlet of the
White Plains was occasionally maintained by
parties
of troops. At other times, their advanced
guards were withdrawn to the Northern extremity
of the county, and the intermediate country
abandoned entirely to the ravages of the
miscreants
who plundered between both armies,
serving neither.
The road taken by our party was not the one
that communicates between the two principal
cities of the state, but was a retired and
unfrequented
pass, that to this hour is but little known,
and which, entering the hills near the eastern
boundary, emerges into the plain above, many
miles from the Hudson.
It would have been impossible for the tired
steeds of Mr. Wharton to drag the heavy chariot
up the lengthened and steep ascents which now
lay before them, and a pair of country horses were
procured, with but little regard to their owner's
wishes, by the two dragoons who still continued
to accompany the party. With their assistance,
Csar was enabled to advance by slow and
toilsome
steps into the bosom of the hills. Willing
to relieve her own melancholy by breathing a
fresher air, and also to lessen the weight,
Frances
alighted, as they reached the foot of a mountain
and found that Katy had made similar
preparations
,
with the like intention of walking to the
summit. It was near the setting of the sun, and
from the top of the mountain their guard had
declared
,
that the desired end of their journey
might be discerned. The maid moved forward
with the elastic step of youth, and followed by
the housekeeper at a little distance, they soon
lost sight of the sluggish carriage, that was slowly
toiling up the hill, occasionally halting to allow
the animals that drew it to breathe.
Oh, Miss Fanny, what dreadful times these
be, said Katy, when they paused for breath
themselves; but I know'd that calamity was
about to befall, ever sin the streak of blood was
seen in the clouds.
12*
There has been blood upon earth, Katy,
returned the shuddering Frances, though but
little I imagine is ever seen in the clouds.
Not blood in the clouds! echoed the
housekeeper
;
yes, that there has, oftenand comets
with fiery smoking tailsDidn't people see armed
men in the heavens the year the war begun? and
the night before the battle of the Plains, wasn't
there thunder just like the cannon themselves?
Ah! Miss Fanny, I'm fearful that no good can
follow rebellion against the Lord's anointed.
These events are certainly dreadful,
returned
the maid, and enough to sicken the
stoutest heartBut what can be done, Katy?
Gallant and independent men are unwilling to
submit to oppression; and I am fearful that such
scenes are but too common in war.
If I could but see any thing to fight about, said
Katy, renewing her walk as the young lady
proceeded
,
I shouldn't mind it so much'twas said
the king wanted all the tea for his own family, at
one time; and then agin, that he meant the
colonies
should pay over to him all their arnins.
Now this is matter enough to fight aboutfor I'm
sure that no one, howsomever he may be a lord
or a king, has a right to the hard arnins of
another
.Then
it was all contradicted, and some
said Washington wanted to be king himself, so
that between the two one doesn't know which to
believe.
Believe neitherfor neither are true. I do
not pretend to understand, myself, all the merits
of this war, Katy, said Frances pausing, and
blushing with the consciousness of whence it was
that she had derived her opinions; but to me it
seems unnatural, that a country like this should be
ruled by another so distant as England.
So I have heard Harvey say to his father that
is dead and in his grave, returned Katy,
approaching
nearer to the young lady, and lowering
her voice.Many is the good time that I've
listened to them talking, when all the neighbours
were asleep; and sich conversations, Miss Fanny,
that you can have no idee on.Well, to say the
truth, Harvey was a mystified body, and he was
like the winds in the good bookno one could tell
whence he came or whither he went.
Frances glanced her eye at her companion with
an interest altogether new to her, and with an
apparent
desire to hear more, observed
There are rumours abroad relative to the
character
of Harvey, that I should be sorry were
true.
'Tis a disparagement every word on't, cried
Katy, vehemently; Harvey had no more
dealings
with Belzebub than you nor I had. I'm sure
if Harvey had sold himself, he would take care
to be better paid; though, to speak the truth, he
was always a wasteful and disregardful man.
Nay, nay, returned the smiling Frances
I have no such injurious suspicion of him; but
has he not sold himself to an earthly prince, one
good and amiable I allow, but too much attached
to the interests of his native island to be always
just to this country?
To the king's majesty! replied Katy. Why,
Miss Fanny, your own brother that is in gaol,
serves king George.
True, said Frances, but not in secret
openly, manfully, and bravely.
'Tis said he is a spy, and why a'n't one spy as
bad as another.
'Tis false, exclaimed Frances, her eyes
lighting
with extraordinary animation, and the colour
rushing to her face, until even her fine forehead
glowed with fire; no act of deception is worthy
of my brother, nor of any would he be guilty, for
so base a purpose as gain or promotion.
Well, I'm sure, said Katy, a little appalled at
the manner of the young lady, if a body does the
work, he should be pain for it. Harvey is by no
means partic'lar about getting his lawful dues, and
I dar'st to say, if the truth was forthcoming, king
George owes him money this very minute.
Then you acknowledge his connexion with the
British army, said Frances; I confess there
have been moments when I have thought
differently
.
Lord, Miss Fanny, Harvey is a man that no
calculation can be made on. Though I lived in his
house for a long concourse of years, I have never
known whether he belonged above or below. The
time that Burg'yne was taken, he came home, and
there was great doings between him and the old
gentleman, but for the life I couldn't tell if'twas
joy or grief. Then, here, the other day, when the
great British generalI'm sure I have been so
flurried with losses and troubles, that I forget his
name
Andr, said Frances, in a melancholy tone.
Yes, Ondree; when he was hung acrost the
Tappaan, the old gentleman was near hand to
going crazy about it. and didn't sleep for night
nor day till Harvey got back; and then his money
was mostly golden guineas; but the skinners took
it all, and now he is a beggar, or what's the same
thing, dispiscable for poverty and want.
To this speech Frances made no reply, but
continued
her walk up the hill, deeply engaged in her
own reflections. The allusions to Andr had
recalled her thoughts to the situation of her own
brother. Hope is a powerful stimulus to
enjoyment
and though arising from a single cause,
seldom
fails to mingle with every emotion of the heart.
The dying declarations of Isabella had left an
impression
on the mind of Frances that influenced
her whole deportment. She looked forward with
confidence to the restoration of Sarah's intellect,
and even now, as she mused on the condition of
Henry, there was a secret presentiment of his
acquittal
that pervaded her thoughts, which sprang
from the buoyancy of youth, but for which she
would have been at a loss to account.
They now reached the highest point in their
toilsome progress to the summit, and Frances
seated herself on a rock to rest and to admire,
Immediately at her feet lay a deep dell, but little
altered by cultivation, and dark with the gloom of
a November sun-set. Another hill rose opposite
to where she sat, at no great distance, along whose
rugged sides nothing was to be seen but shapeless
rocks, and oaks whose stinted growth proved the
absence of soil.
To be seen in their perfection, the Highlands
must be passed immediately after the fall of the
leaf. The picture is then in its chastest keeping,
for neither the scanty foliage which the summer
lends the trees, nor the snows of winter, are
present
to conceal the minutest objects from the eye.
Chilling solitude is the characteristic of the
scenery
,
nor is the mind at liberty, as in March, to look
forward to a renewed vegetation that is soon to
check, without improving the view.
The day had been cloudy and cool, and thin
fleecy clouds hung around the horizon, often
promising
to disperse, but as frequently
disappointing
the maid of a parting beam from the setting
sun. At length a solitary gleam of light struck
on the base of the mountain on which she was
gazing, and moved gracefully up its side, until
reaching the summit, it stood for a minute,
forming
a crown of glory to the sombre pile
beneath
.
So strong were the rays, that what was
before indistinct, now clearly opened to the
view. With a feeling of awe at being thus
unexpectedly
admitted, as it were, into the secrets
of that desart place, the maid gazed intently,
until among the scattered trees and fantastic rocks,
something like a rude structure was seen. It
was low, and so obscured by the colour of its
materials
,
that but for its roof, and the glittering
of a window, must have escaped her notice.
While yet lost in the astonishment created by
discovering
a habitation for man in such a spot,
Frances
,
on moving her eyes, perceived another object
that increased her wonder. It apparently was a
human figure, but of singular mould and unusual
deformity. It stood on the edge of a rock, but a
little
above the hut, and it was no difficult task for our
heroine to fancy it was gazing at the vehicles that
were ascending the side of the mountain beneath
her. The distance, however, was too great for
her to distinguish with precision. After looking
at it a moment in breathless wonder, Frances
had just come to the conclusion that it was ideal,
and that what she saw was part of the rock itself,
when the object moved swiftly from its position,
and glided into the hut, at once removing any doubts
as to the nature of either. Whether it was owing
to the recent conversation that she had been
holding with Katy, or some fancied resemblance
that she discerned, Frances thought, as the figure
vanished from her view, that it bore a marked
likeness to Birch, moving under the weight of his
pack. She continued to gaze in breathless silence
towards the mysterious residence, when the
gleam of light passed away, and at the same
instant the tones of a bugle rang through the glens
and hollows, and were re-echoed in every
direction
.
Springing on her feet in alarm, the maid
heard the trampling of horses, and directly a party,
in the well known uniform of the Virginians, came
sweeping around a point of rock near her, and
drew up at a short distance from where she stood.
Again the bugle sounded a lively strain, and before
the agitated girl had time to rally her thoughts,
Dunwoodie dashed by the party of dragoons, threw
himself from his charger, and advanced to the side
of his mistress.
His manner was earnest and interested, but in a
slight degree constrained. In a few words he
explained
to Frances, that he had been ordered up,
with a party of Lawton's men, in the absence of the
captain himself, to attend the trial of Henry, which
was fixed for the morrow, and that anxious for their
safety in the rude passes of the mountain, he had
ridden
a mile or two in quest of the travellers.
Frances
explained, with blushing cheeks and trembling
voice, the reason of her being in advance, and
taught him to expect the arrival of her father
momentarily
.
The constraint of his manner had,
however, unwillingly on her part, communicated
itself to her own deportment, and the approach of
the chariot was a relief to both. The major
handed her in, spoke a few words of
encouragement
to Mr. Wharton and Miss Peyton, and again
mounting, led the way towards the plains of
Fishkill
,
which broke on their sight on turning the
rock, with the effect of enchantment. A short half
hour brought them to the door of the farm-house,
where the care of Dunwoodie had already
prepared
for their reception, and where Captain
Wharton was anxiously expecting their arrival.
CHAPTER X.
These limbs are strengthen'd with a soldier's toil,
Nor has this cheek been ever blanch'd with fear
But this sad tale of thine, enervates all
Within me, that I once could boast as man
Chill, trembling agues seize upon my frame,
And tears of childish sorrow pour apace
Through scarred channels, that were mark'd by wounds.
Duo
.
The
friends of Henry Wharton, had placed so
much reliance on his innocence, that they were
unable to see the full danger of his situation. As
the moment of trail, however, approached, the
uneasiness
of the youth himself increased; and
after spending most of the night with his afflicted
family, he awoke, on the following morning, from a
short and disturbed slumber, to a clearer sense of
his condition, and a survey of the means that were
to extricate him from it with life. The rank of
Andr, and the importance of the measures he
was plotting, together with the powerful
intercessions
that had been made on his behalf,
occasioned
his execution to be stamped with greater
notoriety
than the ordinary events of the war. But
spies were frequently arrested, and the instances
that occurred of summary punishment for this
crime, were numberless. These were facts that
were well known to both Dunwoodie and the
prisoner
;
and to their experienced judgments the
preparations
for the trial were indeed alarming.
Notwithstanding
their apprehensions, they succceded
so far in concealing them, that neither Miss Peyton,
nor Frances, was aware of their extent. A strong
guard was stationed in the out-buildings of the
farm-house where the prisoner was quartered, and
several sentinels watched the avenues that
approached
the dwellingone was constantly near
the room of the British officer. A court was
already
detailed to examine into the circumstances,
and upon their decision the fate of Henry rested.
The moment at length arrived, and the different
actors in the approaching investigation assembled.
Frances experienced a feeling like suffocation,
as, after taking her seat in the midst of her family,
her eyes wandered over the groupe who were thus
collected. The judges, three in number, sat by
themselves, clad in the martial vestments of their
profession, and maintained a gravity worthy of the
occasion, and becoming in their rank. In the
centre was a man of advanced years, but whose
person continued rigidly erect, and whose whole
exterior bore the stamp of early and long-tried
military habits. This was the president of the
court, and Frances, after taking a hasty and
unsatisfactory
view of his associates, turned to his
benevolent countenance, as the harbinger of
mercy
to her brother. There was a melting and
subdued
expression in the features of the veteran,
that, contrasted with the rigid decency and
composure
of the others, could not fail to attract
notice
.
His attire was strictly in conformity to the
prescribed rules of the service to which he
belonged
;
but his fingers trifled, with a kind of
convulsive
and unconscious motion, with the crape
that entwined the hilt of the sword on which his
body partly reclined, and which, like himself,
seemed a relic of older times. There were the
workings of an unquiet soul within; but his
commanding
Vol. II. 13
and martial front blended awe with the
pity that its exhibition excited. His associates
were officers selected from the eastern troops who
held the fortresses of West-Point and the adjacent
passesthey were men who had attained the
meridian
of life, and the eye sought in vain the
expression
of any passion or emotion, on which it
might seize as an indication of human infirmity.
There was a mild, but a grave intellectual reserve.
If there was no ferocity or harshness to chill,
neither was there compassion or interest to
attract
.
They were men who had long acted under
the dominion of a prudent reason, and whose
feelings
seemed trained to a perfect submission to
their judgments.
Before these arbiters of his fate Henry
Wharton
was ushered, under the custody of two armed
men. A profound and awful silence succeeded
his entrance, and the blood of Frances chilled
in her veins. There was but little of pomp in
the preparations to impress her imagination,
but the reserved, business-like air of the whole
scene seemed indeed as if the destinies of life
awaited on the judgment of these men. Two of the
judges sat in grave reserve, fixing their inquiring
eyes on the subject of their investigation; but the
president continued gazing around in uneasy
convulsive
motions of the muscles of the face, that
indicated a restlessness foreign to his years and
duty.It was Colonel Singleton, who, but the day
before, had learnt the fate of Isabella, but who
proudly stood forth in the discharge of a duty
that his country required at his hands. The silence
and the expectation in every eye, at length struck
him, and, making an effort to collect himself, he
spoke in the deep tones of one used to authority
Bring forth the prisoner.
The sentinels dropped their bayonet points
towards
the judges, and Henry Wharton advanced
with a firm step into the centre of the apartment.
All was now anxiety and eager curiosity.
Frances
turned for a moment, in grateful emotion, as
the deep and perturbed breathing of Dunwoodie
reached her ear; but her brother again
concentrated
all her interest into one feeling of intense
care. In the back ground were arranged the
inmates
of the family who owned the dwelling, and
behind them again was a row of shining faces of
ebony, glistening with pleased wonder at the
scene. Amongst these was the faded lustre of
Csar Thompson's countenance.
You are said, continued the president, to
be Henry Wharton, a Captain in his Britannic
Majesty's
60th regiment of foot.
I am.
I like your candour, sir; it partakes of the
honourable feelings of a soldier, and cannot fail to
impress your judges favourably.
It would be prudent, said one of his
companions
,
to advise the prisoner that he is bound
to answer no more than he deems necessary;
although
we are a court of martial law, yet, in this
respect, we own the principles of all free
governments
.
A nod of approbation, from the silent member,
was bestowed on this remark, and the president
proceeded with cautionreferring to the minutes
he held in his hand.
It is in accusation against you, that, being an
officer of the enemy, on the 29th of October last,
you passed the picquets of the American army at
the White Plains, in disguise, whereby you are
suspected
of views hostile to the interests of
America
;
and have subjected yourself to the
punishment
of a Spy.
The mild but steady tones of the speaker's
voice, as he slowly repeated the substance of this
charge, sunk to the hearts of many of the
listeners
.
The accusation was so plain, the facts so
limited, the proof so obvious, and the penalty so
well established, that escape at once seemed
impossible
.
But Henry replied, with earnest grace
That I passed your picquets, in disguise, is
true, but
Peace, interrupted the president; the
usages
of war are stern enough, in themselves; you
need not aid them to your own condemnation.
The prisoner can retract that declaration, if
he pleases, remarked another judge. His
confession
,
which must be taken, goes fully to prove
the charge.
I retract nothing that is true, said Henry,
proudly.
The two nameless judges heard him in silent
composure, yet there was no exultation mingled
with their gravity. The president now appeared,
however, to take new interest in the scene; and,
with an animation unlooked for in his years, he
cried
Your sentiment is noble, sir. I only regret
that a youthful soldier should so far be misled by
loyalty, as to lend himself to the purposes of
deceit
.
Deceit! echoed Wharton; I thought it
prudent
to guard against capture from my enemies.
A soldier, Captain Wharton, exclaimed the
veteran, in proud exultation, should never meet
his enemy but openly and with arms in his hands.
For fifty years have I served two kings of
England
,
and now my native land; but never did I
approach a foe, unless under the light of the sun,
and with honest notice that an enemy was nigh.
You are at liberty to explain what your
motives
were, in entering the ground held by our
army
,
in disguise; said the other judge, with a
slight movement of the muscles of his mouth.
I am the son of this aged man, before you,
continued Henry. It was to visit him that I
encountered
the danger. Besides, the country
below
is seldom held by your troops, and its very
name implies a right to either party to move at
pleasure over its territory.
Its name, as a neutral ground, is unauthorised
by law; and is an appellation that originates with
the condition of the country. But wherever an
army goes, it carries its rights along, and the first
is, the ability to protect itself.
I am no casuist, sir, returned the youth,
earnestly
;
but I feel that my father is entitled to
my affection, and would encounter greater risks to
prove it to him, in his old age.
A very commendable spirit, cried the
veteran
;
come, gentlemen, this business brightens.
I confess, at first, it was very bad; but no man
can censure him for desiring to see his parent.
And have you proof that such only was your
intention?
Yeshere, said Henry, admitting a ray of
hope; here is proofmy father, my sister,
Major
Dunwoodie, all know it.
Then, indeed, returned his immoveable
judge, we may be able to save you. It would
be well, sir, to examine further into this business.
Certainly, said the president with alacrity;
let the elder Mr. Wharton approach and take
the oath.
The father made an effort at composure, and
advancing with a feeble step, complied with the
necessary forms of the court.
You are the father of the prisoner? said
Colonel Singleton, in a subdued voice, after
pausing
13*
a moment in respect to the agitation of the
witness.
He is my only son.
And what, sir, do you know of his visit to your
house, on the 29th day of October last?
He came, as he told you, sir, to see me and
his sisters.
Was he in disguise? asked the other judge.
He did not wear the uniform of the 60th.
To see his sisters too! said the president,
with great emotion. Have you daughters, sir?
I have twoboth are in this house.
Had he a wig? continued the officer.
There was some such thing, I do believe,
upon
his head.
And how long had you been separated?
asked
the president.
One year and two months.
Did he wear a loose great coat of coarse
materials
?
inquired the officer, referring to the
paper
that contained the charges.
There was an over-coat.
And you think that it was to see you, only,
that he came out?
And my daughters.
A boy of spirit, whispered the president to
his silent comrade. I see but little harm in such
a freak'twas imprudent, but then it was kind.
Do you know that your son was entrusted
with no commission from Sir Henry Clinton, and
that the visit to you was not merely a cloak to
other designs.
How can I know it? said Mr. Wharton, in
alarm; would Sir Henry entrust me with such a
business?
Know you any thing of this pass?
exhibiting
the paper that Dunwoodie had retained when
Wharton was taken.
Nothingupon my honour, nothing, cried
the father, shrinking from the paper as from
contagion
.
But, on your oath?
Nothing.
Have you other testimony; this does not
avail you. Captain Wharton. You have been
taken in a situation where your life is forfeited
the labour of proving your innocence rests with
yourself; take time to reflect, and be cool.
There was a frightful calmness in the manner of
this judge that appalled the prisoner. In the
sympathy of Colonel Singleton, he could easily
lose sight of his danger; but the obdurate and
collected air of the others, was ominous of his
fate. He continued silent, casting expressive
glances towards his friend. Dunwoodie
understood
the appeal, and offered himself as a witness.
He was sworn and desired to relate what he knew.
His statement did not materially alter the case, and
Dunwoodie felt that it could not. To him
personally
but little was known, and that little rather
militated against the safety of Henry than
otherwise
.
His account was listened to in silence, and
the significant shake of the head that was made by
the silent member, spoke too plainly what effect it
had produced.
Still you think that the prisoner had no other
object than what he has avowed, said the
president
,
when he had ended.
None other, I will pledge my life, cried the
Major, with fervour.
Will you swear it, asked the immoveable
judge.
How can I? God alone can tell the heart;
but I have known this gentleman from a boy;
deceit
never formed part of his character. He is
above it.
You say that he escaped, and was retaken in
open arms, said the president.
He was; nay, he received a wound in the
combat
.
You see he yet moves his arms with
difficulty
.
Would he, think you, sir, have
trusted
himself where he could fall again into our hands,
unless conscious of his innocence?
Would Andr have deserted a field of battle,
Major Dunwoodie, had he encountered such an
event near Tarry-town? asked his deliberate
examiner
.
Is it not natural to youth to seek glory?
Do you call this glory? exclaimed the Major,
an ignominious death, and a tarnished name.
Major Dunwoodie, returned the other, still
with inveterate gravity, you have acted nobly;
your duty has been arduous and severe, but it has
been faithfully and honourably dischargedour's
must not be less so.
During this examination, the most intense
interest
prevailed amongst the hearers. With that
kind of feeling which could not separate the
principle
from the cause, most of the auditors thought
that if Dunwoodie failed to move the hearts of
Henry's judges, no other possessed the power.
Csar thrust his mishapen form forward; and
his features, so expressive of the concern he felt,
and so different from the vacant curiosity pictured
in the countenances of the other blacks, caught
the attention of the silent judge. For the first
time he spoke
Let that black be brought forward.
It was too late to retreat, and Csar found
himself
confronted with a row of the rebel officers,
before he knew what was uppermost in his
thoughts. The others yielded the examination to
the one who suggested it, and using all due
deliberation
,
he proceeded accordingly
You know the prisoner?
I tink I ought, returned the black, in a
manner
as sententious as his examiner's.
Did he give you the wig, when he threw it
aside?
I don't want' em, grumbled Csar; got a
berry good hair he'self.
Were you employed in carrying any letters or
messages, while Captain Wharton was in your
master's house?
I do what a' tell me, returned the black.
But what did they tell you to do?
Sometime a one tingsometime anoder.
Enough, said Colonel Singleton, with dignity;
you have the noble acknowledgment of a
gentleman
,
what more can you obtain from this
slave? Captain Wharton, you perceive the
unfortunate
impression against you? Have you other
testimony to adduce?
To Henry, there now remained but little hope;
his confidence in his security was fast ebbing, but
with an indefinite expectation of assistance from
the loveliness of his sister, he fixed an earnest
gaze on the pallid features of Frances. She arose,
and with a tottering step moved towards the
judges
;
the paleness of her cheek continued but for
a moment, and gave place to a flush of fire,
and with a light but firm tread, she stood
before
them. Raising her hand to her polished
forehead, Frances threw aside her exuberant
locks, and displayed a beauty and innocence
to their view, that was unrivalled. The president
shrouded his eyes for a moment, as if the wildly
expressive eye and speaking countenance recalled
the image of another. The movement was
transient
,
and recovering himself proudly, he said,
with an earnestness that betrayed his secret
wishes
To you, then, your brother communicated his
intention of paying your family a secret visit?
No!no! said Frances, pressing her hand
on her brain, as if to collect her thoughts; he
told me nothingwe knew not of the visit until
he arrived; but can it be necessary to explain to
gallant men, that a child would incur hazard to
meet his only parent, and that in times like these,
and in a situation like ours.
But was this the first time? Did he never even
talk of doing so before? inquired the Colonel,
leaning towards her with paternal interest.
Certainlycertainly, cried Frances,
catching
the expression of his own benevolent
countenance
.
This is but the fourth of his visits.
I knew it! exclaimed the veteran, rubbing
his hands with delight; an adventurous,
warmhearted
sonI warrant me, gentlemen, a fiery
soldier in the field. In what disguises did he
come?
In none, for none were then necessary; the
royal troops covered the country, and gave him
safe passage.
And was this the first of his visits, out of the
uniform of his regiment? asked the Colonel in a
suppressed voice, avoiding the looks of his
companions
.
Oh! the very first, exclaimed the eager girl;
his first offence, I do assure you, if offence it
be.
But you wrote himyou urged the visit;
surely, young lady, you wished to see your
brother
?
added the impatient Colonel.
That we wished it, and prayed for it, oh! how
fervently we prayed for it, is true; but to have
held communion with the royal army, would have
endangered our father, and we dare not.
Did he leave the house until taken, or had he
intercourse with any out of your own dwelling?
With nonenot one, excepting our
neighbour
,
the pedlar Birch.
With whom? exclaimed the Colonel, turning
pale, and shrinking as from the sting of an adder.
Dunwoodie groaned aloud, and striking his head
with his hand, cried in piercing tones, He is lost!
and rushed from the apartment.
But Harvey Birch, repeated Frances, gazing
wildly at the door through which her lover had
disappeared.
Harvey Birch! echoed all the judges. The
two immoveable members of the court exchanged
significant looks, and threw many an inquisitive
glance at their prisoner.
To you, gentlemen, it can be no new
intelligence
to hear that Harvey Birch is suspected of
favouring the royal cause, said Henry, again
advancing
before his judges; for he has already
been condemned by your tribunals to the fate that
I now see awaits myself. I will, therefore,
explain
,
that it was by his assistance that I procured
the disguise, and passed your picquets; but, to my
dying moment, and with my dying breath, I will
avow, that my intentions were as pure as the
innocent
being before you.
Captain Wharton, said the president
solemnly
,
the enemies of American liberty have made
mighty and subtle efforts to overthrow our power.
A more dangerous man for his means and
education
,
is not ranked among our foes, than this
pedlar
of West-Chester. He is a spyartful
delusive
and penetrating, beyond the abilities of any
of his class. Sir Henry could not do better than
to associate him with the officer in his next
attempt
.He
would have saved him Andre.
Indeed
,
young man, this is a connexion that may
prove fatal to you.
The honest indignation that beamed on the
countenance of the aged warrior as he spoke, was
met by a satisfied look of perfect conviction on
the part of his comrades.
I have ruined him! cried Frances, clasping
her hands in terror; do you desert us? then he
is lost indeed.
Forbear!lovely innocentforbear! cried
the Colonel, with strong emotion; you injure
none, but distress us all.
Is it then such a crime to possess natural
affection
?
said Frances wildly; would
Washington
the
noble----upright----impartial Washington,
judge so harshly? delay but till Washington can
hear his tale.
It is impossible, said the president, covering
his eyes, as if to hide her beauty from his view.
Impossible! oh! but for a week suspend your
judgment.---On my knees I entreat you; as you
will expect mercy yourself, where no human
power
can avail you, give him but a day.
It is impossible, repeated the Colonel, in a
voice that was nearly choked; our orders are
peremptory, and too long delay has been given
already
.
He turned from the kneeling suppliant, but could
not, or would not, extricate the hand that she
grasped with frenzied fervour.
Remand your prisoner, said one of the
judges
,
to the officer who was in charge of Henry.
Colonel Singleton. shall we withdraw?
Singleton! Singleton! echoed Frances, then
you are a father, and know how to pity a father's
woes; you cannot, will not, wound a heart that is
now nearly crushed. Hear me, Colonel
Singleton
;
as God will listen to your dying prayers, hear
me, and spare my brother.
Remove her, said the Colonel, gently
endeavouring
to extricate his hand; but there were
none who appeared disposed to obey. Frances
eagerly
strove to read the expression of his averted
face, and resisted all his efforts to retire.
Colonel Singleton! how lately was your own
son in suffering and in danger? under the roof of
my father he was cherished---under my father's
roof he found shelter and protection. Oh! suppose
that son the pride of your age, the solace and
protector
of your orphan children, and then
pronounce
my brother guilty if you dare.
What right has Heath to make an executioner
of me! exclaimed the veteran fiercely, rising
with a face flushed like fire, and every vein and
artery swollen with suppressed emotion. But
I forget myselfcome gentlemen, let us mount,
our painful duty must be done.
Mount not!--go not! shrieked Frances; can
you tear a son from his parent? a brother from his
sister, so coldly? Is this the cause I have so
ardently
loved? Are these the men that I have
been taught to reverence? But you relent, you
do hear me, you will pity and forgive.
Lead on, gentlemen, motioning towards the
door, erecting himself into an air of military
grandeur
,
in the vain hope of quieting his feelings.
Lead not on, but hear me, cried Frances,
grasping his hand convulsively; Colonel
Singleton
you are a father!---pity---mercy---mercy. for
the son---mercy for the daughter! Yes---you had
a daughter. On this bosom she poured out her
last breath; these hands closed her eyes; these
very hands, that are now clasped in prayer, did
those offices for her, that you now condemn my
poor, poor brother to require.
VOL. II. 14
One mighty emotion the veteran struggled with
and quelled, but with a groan that shook his whole
frame. He even looked around in conscious pride
at his victory; but a second burst of feeling
conquered
.---His
head, white with the frost of seventy
winters, sunk upon the shoulder of the frantic
suppliant
.
The sword that had been his companion
in so many fields of blood, dropped from his
nerveless
hand, and as he cried---
May God bless you for the deed! he wept
aloud.
Long and violent was the indulgence that
Colonel
Singleton yielded to his feelings. On
recovering
,
he gave the senseless Frances into the
arms of her aunt, and turning with an air of
fortitude
to his comrades, he said
Still, gentlemen, we have our duty as officers
to discharge;our feelings as men may be
indulged
hereafter. What is your pleasure with the
prisoner?
One of the judges placed in his hand a written
sentence that he had prepared, while the Colonel
was engaged with Frances, and declared it to be
the opinion of himself and his companion.
It briefly stated, that Henry Wharton had been
detected in passing the lines of the American
army
as a spy, and in disguise. That, thereby,
according
to the laws of war, he was liable to suffer
death, and that this court adjudged him to the
penaltyordering him to be executed, by
hanging
,
before nine o'clock on the following morning.
It was not usual to inflict capital punishments
even on the enemy, without referring the case to
the Commander-in-Chief, for his approbation; or,
in his absence, to the officer commanding for the
time being. But, as Washington held his
headquarters
at New-Windsor, on the western bank of
the Hudson, sufficient time was yet before them to
receive his answer.
This is short notice, said the veteran,
holding
the pen in his hand, in a suspense that had no
object; not a day to fit one so young for
heaven
?
The royal officers gave Hale but an hour,
returned his comrade; we have extended the
usual time. But Washington has the power to
extend it, or to pardon.
Then to Washington will I go, cried the
Colonel
,
returning the paper with his signature, and
if the services of an old man like me, or that brave
boy of mine, entitle me to his ear, I will yet save
the youth.
So saying, he departed, full of his generous
intentions
in favour of Henry Wharton.
The sentence was communicated with proper
tenderness to the prisoner; and after giving a few
necessary instructions to the officer in command,
and despatching a courier to head-quarters with
their report, the remaining judges mounted, and
rode to their own quarters, with the same
unmoved
exterior, but with the same dispassionate
integrity
,
they had maintained throughout the trial.
CHAPTER XI.
Have you no countermand for Claudio yet,
But he must die to-morrow?
Measure for Measure
.
A few hours were passed by the condemned
prisoner
,
after his sentence was received, in the
bosom
of his family. Mr. Wharton wept in
hopeless
despondency over the untimely fate of his son,
and Frances, after recovering from her
insensibility
,
experienced an anguish of feeling to which the
bitterness of death itself would have been
comparatively
light. Miss Peyton alone retained a
vestige
of hope, or presence of mind to suggest
whamight
be proper to be done under their circumt
stances. The comparative composure of the good
spinster in no degree arose from any want of
interest
in the welfare of her nephew, but was
founded
in a kind of instinctive dependence on the
character
of Washington. He was a native of the
same colony with herself, and although his early
military services, and her frequent visits to the
family
of her sister, and subsequent establishment at
its head, had prevented their ever meeting, still
she was familiar with his domestic virtues, and
well knew that the rigid inflexibility for which his
public acts were distinguished, formed no part of
his reputation in private life. He was known in
Virginia as a consistent but just and lenient master,
and the maiden felt a kind of pride in associating
in her mind, her countryman with the man who
led the armies, and in a great measure, controlled
the destinies of America. She knew that Henry
was innocent of the crime for which he was
condemned
to suffer, and with that kind of simple
faith, that is ever to be found in the most
ingenuous
and innocent characters, could not conceive
of those constructions and interpretations of law,
that inflicted punishment without the actual
existence
of crime. But even her confiding hopes
were doomed to meet with a speedy termination.
Towards noon, a regiment that was quartered on
the banks of the river, moved up to the ground in
front of the house that held our heroine and her
family, and deliberately pitched their
tents
with
the avowed intention of remaining until the
following
morning, to give solemnity and impression
to the execution of a British spy.
Dunwoodie had performed all that was required
of him by his orders, and was at liberty to retrace
his steps to his expecting troops, who were
impatiently
awaiting his return to be led against a
detachment
of the enemy, that was known to be
slowly
moving up the banks of the river, to cover a
party
of foragers in their rear. He was accompanied
by a small party of Lawton's troop, under the
expectation
of their testimony being required to
convict
the prisoner, and Mason, the lieutenant, was
in command. But the confession of Capt.
Wharton
had removed the necessity of examining any
witnesses on behalf of the people. The Major,
from an unwillingness to encounter the distress of
Henry's friends, and a dread of trusting himself
within its influence, had spent the time we have
mentioned, in walking by himself, in keen anxiety,
at a short distance from the dwelling. Like Miss
Peyton, he had some reliance on the mercy of
Washington, although moments of terrific doubt
ned despondency were continually crossing his
14*
mind. To him the rules of service were familiar,
and he was more accustomed to consider his
general
in the capacity of a ruler, than as exhibiting the
characteristics of the individual. A dreadful
instance
had too recently occurred, which fully
proved that Washington was above the weakness
of sparing another in mercy to himself. While
pacing with hurried steps through the orchard,
labouring
under these constantly recurring doubts,
enlivened by transient rays of hope, Mason
approached
him, accoutred completely for the saddle.
Thinking you might have forgotten the news
brought this morning from below, sir, I have taken
the liberty to order the detachment under arms,
said the Lieutenant, very coolly, cutting down the
mullen tops with his sheathed sabre that grew
within his reach.
What news? cried the Major, starting.
Only that John Bull is out in West-Chester.
with a train of wagons, which, if he fills, will
compel
us to retire through these cursed hills, in
search of provender. These greedy Englishmen
are so shut up on York island, that when they do
venture out, they seldom leave straw enough to
furnish the bed of a yankee heiress.
Where did the express leave them, did you
say? The intelligence has entirely escaped my
memory.
On the heights above Sing-Sing, returned the
Lieutenant, with no little amazement. The road
below looks like a hay-market, and all the swine
are sighing forth their lamentations, as the corn
passes them towards Kingsbridge. George
Singleton's
orderly, who brought up the tidings,
says that our horses were holding consultation if
they should not go down without their riders,
and eat another meal, for it is questionable with
them whether they can get a full stomach again.
If they are suffered to get back with their plunder,
we shall not be able to find a piece of pork, at
Christmas, fat enough to fry itself.
Peace, with all this nonsense of Singleton's
orderly, Mr. Mason, cried Dunwoodie,
impatiently
;
let him learn to wait the orders of his
superiors
.
I beg pardon in his name, Major Dunwoodie,
said the subaltern; but like myself, he was in
error. We both thought it was the order of
General
Heath, to attack and molest the enemy
whenever
he ventured out of his nest.
Recollect yourself, Lieutenant Mason, said
the Major, fiercely, or I may have to teach you
that your orders pass through me.
I know it, Major DunwoodieI know it, said
Mason, with a look of reproach; and I am sorry
that your memory is so bad, as to forget that I
I never have yet hesitated to obey them.
Forgive me, Mason, cried Dunwoodie, taking
both his hands, I do know you for a brave and
obedient soldier; forget my humour. But this
business
Had
you ever a friend?
Nay, nay, interrupted the Lieutenant,
forgive
me and my honest zeal. I knew of the
orders
,
and was fearful that censure might fall on my
officer. But remain, and let a man breathe a
syllable against the corps, and every sword will
start from the scabbard of itselfbesides they are
still moving up, and it is a long road from Croton
to Kingsbridge. Happen what may, I see plainly
that we shall be on their heels, before they are
housed again.
Oh! that the courier was returned from
headquarters
,
exclaimed Dunwoodie. This
suspense
is insupportable.
You have your wish, cried Mason; here
he is coming at the moment, and riding like the
bearer of good newsGod send it may be so; for
I can't say that I particularly like, myself, to see
a brave young fellow dancing upon nothing.
Dunwoodie heard but very little of this
feeling
declaration; for, ere half of it was uttered,
he had leaped the fence and stood before the
messenger
What news have you? cried the Major, the
moment that the soldier stopped his horse.
Good! exclaimed the man; and feeling no
hesitation to entrust an officer so well known as
Major Dunwoodie, he placed the paper in his
hands, as he added, But you can read it, sir, for
yourself.
Dunwoodie paused not to read; but flew, with
the elastic spring of youth and joy, to the
chamber
of the prisoner. The sentinel knew him, and
he was suffered to pass without question.
Oh! Peyton, cried Frances as he entered the
apartment; you look like a messenger from
heaven: bring you tidings of mercy?
Here, Franceshere, Henryhere, dear
cousin Jeannette, cried the youth, as with
trembling
hands he broke the seal; here is the letter
itself, directed to the captain of the guard. But
listen
All did listen, with intense anxiety; and the
pang of blasted hope was added to their misery,
as they saw the glow of delight which had beamed
on the countenance of the Major on his entrance,
give place to a look of astonishment and terror.
The paper contained the sentence of the court,
and underneath was written these simple words
ApprovedGeorge Washington.
He's losthe's lost! cried Frances, in the
piercing tones of despair, sinking into the arms
of her aunt.
My sonMy son! sobbed the father, there
is mercy in heaven, if there is none on earth.
May Washington never want that mercy he thus
denies to my innocent child.
Washington! echoed Dunwoodie, gazing
around him in vacant horror. Yes, 'tis the act
of Washington himself; there are his characters
his very name is here to sanction the dreadful
deed.
Cruel, cruel Washington! cried Miss
Peyton
;
how has familiarity with blood changed his
nature!
Blame him not, said Dunwoodie; it is the
General, and not the man; my life on it, he feels
the blow he is compelled to inflict.
I have been deceived in him, cried Frances.
He is not the saviour of his country; but a cold
and merciless tyrant. Oh! Peyton, Peyton! how
have you misled me in his character!
Peace, dear Frances; peace, for God's sake;
use not such language, cried her lover. He is
but the guardian of the law.
You speak the truth, Major Dunwoodie, said
Henry, recovering from the shock of having his
last ray of hope extinguished, and advancing from
his seat by the side of his father. I, who am to
suffer, blame him not. Every indulgence has
been granted me that I can ask. On the verge of
the grave, I cannot continue unjust. At such a
moment, with so recent an instance of danger to
your cause from treason, I wonder not at
Washington's
unbending justice. Nothing now remains,
but for me to prepare for that fate which so
speedily
awaits me. To you Major Dunwoodie, I make
my first request.
Name it, said the Major, giving utterance
with difficulty.
Henry turned and pointed impressively at the
groupe of weeping mourners near him, as he
continued
Be a son to this aged manhelp his weakness,
and defend him from any usage to which the stigma
thrown upon me may subject him. He has not
many friends amongst the rulers of this country;
let your powerful name be found among them.
It shall, said Dunwoodie, fervently pressing
the hand of his friend.
And this helpless innocent, continued
Henry
,
pointing to where Sarah sat, in unconscious
melancholy. I had hoped for an opportunity to
revenge her wrongs, a momentary flush of
excitement
passed over his pallid features; but
such thoughts are evilI feel them to bewrong.
Under your care, Peyton, she will find sympathy
and refuge.
She will, whispered Dunwoodie, unable to
speak aloud.
This good aunt has claims upon you already;
of her I will not speak; but here, taking the
hand of Frances, and dwelling upon her
countenance
with an expression of fraternal affection
Here is the choicest gift of all. Take her to your
bosom, and cherish her as you would cultivate
innocence
and virtue.
The Major could not repress the eagerness with
which he extended his hand to receive the
precious
boon, but Frances shrinking from his touch,
hid her face in the bosom of her aunt, as she
murmured
No, no, nonone can ever be any thing to
me, who aid in my brother's destruction.
Henry continued gazing at her in tender pity
for several moments, before he again resumed a
discourse that all felt was most peculiarly his own.
I have been mistaken then. I did think,
Peyton
,
that your worth, your noble devotion to a
cause that you have been taught to revere, that
your kindness to our father when in imprisonment,
your friendship to me, in short, that your
character
was understood and valued by my sister.
It isit is, whispered Frances, burying her
face still deeper in the bosom of her aunt.
I believe, dear Henry, said Dunwoodie,
this is a subject that had better not be dwelt upon
now.
You forget, returned the prisoner, with a
faint smile, how much I have to do, and how
little time is left to do it in.
I apprehend, continued the Major, with a
face of fire, that Miss Wharton has imbibed some
opinions of me, that would make a compliance
with your request irksome to heropinions that it
is now too late to alter.
No, no, no, cried Frances, quickly; you
are exonerated, Peytonwith her dying breath
she removed my doubts.
Generous Isabella! murmured Dunwoodie,
with a glow of momentary rapture; but still,
Henry, spare your sister now; nay, spare even
me.
I cannot spare myself, returned the brother
gently removing Frances from the arms of her
aunt. What a time is this to leave two such
lovely females without a protector!Their abode
is destroyed, and misery will speedily deprive
them of their last male friend, looking at his
father; can I die in peace, with the knowledge of
the danger to which they will be exposed?
You forget me, said Miss Peyton, shrinking
herself at the idea of celebrating nuptials at such
a moment.'
No, my dear aunt, I forget you not, nor
shall I, until I cease to remember; but you forget
the times and the danger.The good woman who
lives in this house has already despatched a
messenger
for a man of God, to smooth my passage to
another world;Frances, if you would wish me
to die in peaceto feel a security that will allow
me to turn my whole thoughts to heaven, you will
let this clergyman unite you to Dunwoodie.
Frances shook her head, but remained silent.
I ask for no joyno demonstration of a
felicity
that you will not, cannot feel for months to
come.But obtain a right to his powerful name
give him an undisputed title to protect you
Again the maid made an impressive gesture of
denial.
For the sake of that unconscious sufferer
pointing to Sarah, for your sakefor my sake
my sister
Peace, Henry, or you will break my heart,
cried the agitated girl; not for worlds would I
at such a moment engage in the solemn vows that
you wish.It would render me miserable for life.
You love him not, said Henry
reproachfully
.
I cease to importune you to do what is
against your inclinations.
Frances raised one hand to conceal the
countenance
that was overspread with crimson, as she
extended the other towards Dunwoodie, and said
earnestly
Now you are unjust to mebefore you were
unjust to yourself.
Promise me, then, said Wharton, musing
awhile in silence, that so soon as the
recollection
of my fate is softened, you will give my friend
that hand for life, and I am satisfied.
I do promise, said Frances, withdrawing the
hand that Dunwoodie delicately relinquished
without even pressing it to his lips.
Well then, my good aunt, continued Henry,
will you leave me for a short time alone with my
friend. I have a few melancholy commissions
with which to intrust him, and would spare you
and my sister the pain of hearing them.
There is yet time to see Washington again,
said Miss Peyton, moving towards the door; and
then speaking with extreme dignity, she
continued
I
will go myself; surely he must listen to a
woman from his own colony?and we are in some
degree connected with his family.
Why not apply to Mr. Harper? said
Frances
,
recollecting the parting words of their guest
for the first time.
Harper! echoed Dunwoodie, turning
towards
her with the swiftness of lightning; what
of him? do you know him?
It is in vain, said Henry drawing him aside;
Frances clings to hope with the fondness of a
sisterretire, my love, and leave me with my
friend.
But Frances read an expression in the eye of
Dunwoodie that chained her to the spot. After
struggling to command her feelings, she
continued
He staid with us for two dayshe was with
us when Henry was arrested.
Andanddid you know him?
Nay, continued Frances, catching her breath
as she witnessed the intense interest of her lover,
we knew him nothe came to us in the night a
stranger, and remained with us during the severe
storm; but he seemed to take an interest in
Henry
,
and promised him his friendship.
What! exclaimed the youth in astonishment;
did he know your brother?
Certainly;it was at his request that Henry
threw aside his disguise.
VOL. II. 15
But said Dunwoodie, turning pale with
suspense, he knew him not as an officer of the
royal army.
Indeed he did, cried Miss Peyton; and
cautioned against this very danger.
Dunwoodie caught up the fatal paper, that still
lay where it had fallen from his own hands. and
studied its characters intently. Something seemed
to bewilder his brain.He passed his hand over
his forehead, while each eye was fixed on him in
dreadful suspenseall feeling afraid to admit
those hopes anew, that had once been so sadly
destroyed.
What said he?what promised he?at
length Dunwoodie asked with feverish impatience.
He bid Henry apply to him when in danger,
and promised to requite to the son the hospitality
of the father.
Said he this, knowing him to be a British
officer?
Most certainly; and with a view to this very
danger.
Then cried the youth aloud, and yielding
to his rapture, then you are safethen will I
save himyes, Harper will never forget his
word.
But has he the power? said Frances; Can
he move the stubborn purpose of Washington?
Can he! if he cannot shouted the youth
in uncontrollable emotion, if he cannot, who
can?Greene, and Heath, and young Hamilton
are as nothing, compared to this Harper.But,
rushing to his mistress, and pressing her hands
convulsively, repeat to meyou say you have
his promise?
SurelysurelyPeyton;his solemn,
deliberate
promise, knowing all of the
circumstances
.
Rest easy cried Dunwoodie, holding her
to his bosom for a moment, rest easy, for Henry
is safe.
He waited not to explain, but darting from the
room he left the family in amazement. They
continued in silent wonder, until they heard the
feet of his charger, as he dashed from the door
with the speed of an arrow.
A long time was spent after this abrupt
departure
of the youth, by the anxious friends he had
left, in discussing the probability of his success.
The confidence of his manner had, however,
communicated
to his auditors something of its own
spirit. Each felt that the prospects of Henry were
again brightening, and, with their reviving hopes,
they experienced a renewal of spirits, which in all
but Henry himself amounted to pleasure; with
him, indeed, his state was too awful to admit of
trifling, and for a few hours he was condemned
to feel how much more intolerable was suspense,
than even the certainty of calamity. Not so with
Frances. She, with all the reliance of affection,
reposed in security on the assurance of
Dunwoodie
,
without harassing herself with doubts, that
she possessed not the means of satisfying; but
believing her lover able to accomplish every
thing that man could do, and retaining a vivid
recollection
of the manner and benevolent
appearance
of Harper, the maid abandoned herself to
all the felicity of renovated hope.
The joy of Miss Peyton was more sobered,
and she took frequent occasions to reprove her
niece for the exuberance of her spirits, before
there was a certainty that their expectations were
to be realized. But the slight smile that hovered
around the lips of the spinster contradicted the
very sobriety of feeling that she inculcated.
Why, dearest aunt, said Frances playfully,
in reply to one of her frequent reprimands, would
you have me repress the pleasure that I feel at
Henry's deliverance, when you yourself have so
often declared it to be impossible, that such men
as ruled in our country could sacrifice an
innocent
man.
Nay, I did believe it impossible, my child,
and yet think so; but still there is a discretion to
be shown in joy as well as in sorrow.
Frances recollected the declarations of
Isabella
,
and turned an eye filled with tears of gratitude
on her excellent aunt as she replied
True; but there are feelings that will not
yield to reason.Ah! there are those monsters,
who have come to witness the death of a fellow
creature, moving around yon field, as if this life
was to them but a military show.
It is but little more to the hireling soldier,
said Henry, endeavouring to forget his uneasiness.
You gaze, my love, as if you thought a
military
show of some importance, said Miss
Peyton
,
observing her niece to be looking from the
window with a fixed and abstracted attention.
But Frances answered not.
From the window where she stood the pass
that they had travelled through the highlands was
easily to be seen; and the mountain which held on
its summit the mysterious hut was directly before
her. Its side was rugged and barren; huge and
apparently impassable barriers of rocks presenting
themselves through the stunted oaks, which,
stripped
of their foliage, were scattered over its
surface
.
The base of the hill was not half a mile
from the house, and the object which attracted
the notice of Frances, was the figure of a man
emerging from behind a rock of remarkable
formation
,
and as suddenly disappearing. This man
uvre
was several times repeated, as if it were the
intention of the fugitive, (for such by his air he
seemed to be,) to reconnoitre the proceedings of
the soldiery, and assure himself of the position of
things on the plain. Notwithstanding the distance,
Frances instantly imbibed the opinion that it was
Birch. Perhaps this impression was partly owing
to the air and figure of the man, and in some
measure
to the idea that presented itself on formerly
beholding the object at the summit of the
mountain
.That
they were the same figure she was
confident, although this wanted the appearance,
which in the other she had taken for the pack of
the pedlar. Harvey had so connected himself with
the mysterious deportment of Harper within her
imagination, that under circumstances of less
agitation
than those in which she had laboured since
her arrival, she would have kept her suspicions to
herself. Frances, therefore, sat ruminating on this
second appearance in silence, and endeavouring
to trace in her thoughts, what possible connexion
this extraordinary man could have with the
fortunes
of her own family. He had certainly saved
Sarah, in some degree, from the blow that had
partially alighted on her, and in no instance had
he proved himself to be hostile to their interests.
After gazing for a long time at the point
where she had last seen the figure, in the vain
expectation of its re-appearance, she turned to
her friends in the apartment. Miss Peyton was
sitting by Sarah, who gave some slight additional
signs of noticing what passed, but who still
continued
insensible to either joy or grief.
I suppose by this time, my love, that you are
well acquainted with the manuvres of a
regiment
,
said the spinster, smiling at her nephew.
It is no bad quality in a soldier's wife, at all
events.
I am not a wife yet, said Frances, colouring
to the eyes; and we have no reason to wish for
another wedding in our family.
Frances! exclaimed her brother, starting
from his seat, and pacing the floor in violent
agitation
,
touch not that chord again, I entreat you.
While my fate is yet so uncertain I would wish to
be at peace with all men.
Then let the uncertainty cease, cried
Frances
,
springing to the door; for here comes
Peyton
with the joyful intelligence of your release.
The words were hardly uttered before the door
opened, and the Major entered. In his air there
was neither the appearance of success nor defeat,
but there was a marked display of vexation. He took
the hand that Frances in the fulness of her heart
extended towards him, but instantly relinquishing
it, threw himself into a chair, in evident fatigue.
You have failed, said Wharton, with a bound
of his heart, but an appearance of composure.
Have you seen Harper? cried Frances,
turning
pale.
I have notI crossed the river in one boat as
he must have been coming to this side in another.
I returned without delay, and traced him for
several
miles into the Highlands by the western pass,
but there I unaccountably lost him. I have
returned
here to relieve your uneasiness; but see him
I will this night, and bring a respite for Henry.
But saw you Washington? asked Miss
Peyton
.
Dunwoodie gazed at her a moment in
abstracted
musing, and the question was repeated. He
answered gravely, and with some reserve
The commander in chief had left his
quarters
.
But, Peyton, cried Frances, in returning
terror
,
if they should not see each other, it will be
too late. Harper alone will not be sufficient.
Her lover turned his eyes slowly on her anxious
countenance, and dwelling a moment on her
features
,
said, still musing
You say that he promised to assist Henry.
Certainly, of his own accord, and in requital
for the hospitality that he had received.
Dunwoodie shook his head, and began to look
extremely grave.
I like not that word hospitalityit has an
empty soundthere must be something more
reasonable
to tie Harper. I dread some mistake
repeat to me all that passed.
Frances, in a hurried and earnest voice,
complied
with his request. She related particularly
the manner of his arrival at the Locusts, the
reception
that he received, and the events that
passed
,
as minutely as her memory would supply her
with the means. As she alluded to the
conversation
that occurred between her father and his
guest, the Major smiled, but remained silent. She
then gave a detail of Henry's arrival, and the
events of the following day. She dwelt upon the
part where Harper had desired her brother to
throw aside his disguise, and recounted with
wonderful
accuracy his remarks upon the hazard of
the step that the youth had taken. She even
remembered
his remarkable expression to her
brother
,
that he was safer from Harper's knowledge
of his person than he would be without it.
Frances
mentioned, with the warmth of her youthful
admiration, the benevolent character of his
deportment
to herself, and gave a minute relation of
his adieus to the whole family.
Dunwoodie at first listened with grave
attention
then
evident satisfaction followed as she
proceeded
.
When she spoke of herself in connexion
with their guest, he smiled with pleasure, and as
she concluded, he exclaimed, with perfect
delight
We are safewe are safe.
But he was interrupted, as we will show in the
following chapter.
CHAPTER XII.
The owlet loves the gloom of night,
The lark salutes the day,
The timid dove will coo at hand
But falcous soar away.
Song in Duo.
In
a country, settled like these states, by a
people
who fled their native land, and much-loved
fire sides, victims to their tender consciences and
religious zeal, none of the decencies and
solemnities
of a christian death are dispensed with, when
circumstances will admit of their exercise. The
good woman of the house was a strict adherent to
the forms of the church to which she belonged;
and, having herself been awakened to a sense of
her depravity, by the ministry of the divine who
harangued the people of the adjoining parish, she
thought that it was from his exhortations only, that
salvation could be meted out to the short-lived
hopes of Henry Wharton. Not that the
kind-hearted
matron was so ignorant of the doctrines
of the religion which she professed, as to depend,
theoretically, on mortal aid for protection; but she
had, to use her own phrase, set so long under
the preaching of good Mr., that she had
unconsciously imbibed a practical reliance on his
assistance for that, which, her faith should have
taught her, could come from the Deity alone.
With her, the consideration of death was at all
times awful; and the instant that the sentence of
the prisoner was promulgated, she despatched
Csar, mounted on one of her husband's best
horses, in quest of her clerical monitor. This
step had been taken without consulting either
Henry or his friends, and it was only when the
services of Csar were required upon some
domestic
emergency, that she explained the nature
of his absence. The youth heard her, at first,
with an unconquerable reluctance to admit of
such a spiritual guide; but as our view of the
things of this life becomes less vivid, our
prejudices and habits cease to retain their
influence
;
and a civil bow of thanks was finally given
in requital of the considerate care of the
well-meaning
woman.
The black returned early from his expedition,
and as well as could be gathered from his
somewhat
incoherent narrative, a minister of God
might be expected to arrive in the course of the
day. The interruption that we mentioned in our
preceding chapter, was occasioned by the entrance
of the landlady. At the intercession of
Dunwoodie
,
orders had been given to the sentinel who
guarded the door of Henry's room, that the
members
of the prisoner's family should, at all times,
have free access to his apartment: Csar was
included
in this arrangement, as a matter of
convenience
,
by the officer in command; but strict
inquiry and examination were made into the
errand
of every other applicant for admission. The
Major had, however, included himself among the
relatives of the British officer; and one pledge,
that no rescue should be attempted, was given
in his name for them all. A short
conversation
was passing between the woman of the house
and the corporal of the guard, before the door
that the sentinel had already opened in
anticipation
of the decision of his non-commissioned
commandant.
Would you refuse the consolations of religion
to a fellow-creature, about to suffer death? said
the matron with earnest zeal. Would you
plunge a soul into the fiery furnace, and a
minister
at hand to point out the straight and narrow
path.
I'll tell you what, good woman, returned the
corporal, gently pushing her away; I've no
notion
of my back being a highway for any man to
walk to heaven upon.A pretty figure I should
make at the pickets, for disobeying my orders
Just step down and ask Lieutenant Mason, and
you may bring in the whole congregation. We
have not taken the guard from the foot-soldiers
but an hour, and I shouldn't like to have it said
that we know less of our duty than the militia.
Admit the woman, said Dunwoodie, sternly;
observing, for the first time, that one of his own
corps was on post.
The corporal raised his hand to his cap and fell
back in silence; the soldier stood to his arms, and
the matron entered.
Here is a reverend gentleman below, come to
soothe the parting soul, in the place of our own
divine, who is engaged with an appointment that
could not be put aside'tis to bury old Mr..
Show him in, said Henry, with feverish
impatience
.
But will the sentinel let him pass? I would
not wish a friend of Mr.  to be rudely
stopped
on the threshold, and he a stranger.
All eyes were now turned on Dunwoodie, who,
looking at his watch, spoke a few words with
Henry, in an under tone, and hastened from the
apartment, followed by Frances. The subject of
their conversation, was a wish expressed by the
prisoner for a clergyman of his own persuasion, and
a promise from the Major that one should be sent
from Fish-kill town, through which he was about
to pass, on his way to the ferry to intercept the
expected
return of Harper. Mason soon made his
bow at the door, and willingly complied with the
wishes of the landlady, and the divine was invited
to make his appearance accordingly.
The person who was ushered into the
apartment
,
preceded by Csar with a face of awful
gravity, and followed by the matron with one of
deep concern, was a tall man, beyond the middle
age, or who might rather be said to approach the
down-hill of life. In stature, he was above the size of
ordinary men, though his excessive leanness might
contribute in deceiving as to his height; his
countenance
was sharp and unbending, and every
muscle
seemed set in the most rigid compression. No
joy or relaxation appeared ever to have dwelt on
features that frowned habitually, as if in
detestation
of the vices of mankind. The brows were
beetling, dark, and forbidding, giving the promise of
eyes of no less repelling expression; but the
organs
were concealed beneath a pair of enormous
green spectacles, through which they glared
around with a fierceness that denounced the
coming
day of wrath, nor spoke any of that
benevolence
which, forming the essence of our holy
religion
,
should be the characteristic of its ministers.
All was fanaticism, uncharitableness, and
denunciation
.
Long, lank, and party-coloured hair,
being
a mixture of gray and black, fell down his
neck, and in some degree obscured the sides of
his face, and, parting on his forehead, fell in
either direction in straight and formal screens.
On the top of this ungraceful exhibition, was laid,
impending forward, so as to overhang in some
measure the whole fabric, a large hat of three
equal cocks. His coat was of a rusty black, and
his breeches and stockings were of the same
colour
:
his shoes without lustre, and half concealed
beneath their huge plated buckles.
He stalked into the room, and giving a stiff
nod with his head, took the chair offered to him by
the black, in dignified silence. For several
minutes
no one broke this ominous pause in the
conversation
;
Henry feeling a repugnance to his guest
that he was vainly endeavouring to conquer, and
the stranger himself drawing forth occasional sighs
and groans, that threatened a dissolution of the
unequal connexion between his sublimated soul
and its ungainly tenement. During this
deathlike
preparation, Mr. Wharton, with a feeling
nearly allied to that of his son, led Sarah from the
apartment. His retreat was noticed by the divine
in a kind of scornful disdain, and he began to hum
the air of a popular psalm tune, giving it the full
richness of the twang that distinguishes the eastern
psalmody.
Csar, said Miss Peyton, hand the gentleman
some refreshment; he must need it after his ride.
My strength is not in the things of this life,
said the divine, sternly, speaking in the startling
tones of a hollow sepulchral voice. Thrice have
I this day held forth in my master's service, and
fainted not; still it is prudent to help this frail
tenement
of clay, for, surely, `the labourer is worthy
of his hire.'
Opening a pair of enormous jaws to the exit of a
proportionable chew of tobacco, he took a good
measure of the proffered brandy, and suffered it
to glide downwards, with that facility with which
man is prone to sin.
VOL. II. 16
I apprehend then, sir, that fatigue will
disable
you from performing those duties which
kindness
has induced you to attempt.
Woman! exclaimed the stranger, with
appalling
energy; when was I ever known to shrink
from a duty? But `judge not lest ye be judged', and
fancy not that it is given to mortal eyes to fathom
the intentions of the deity.
Nay, returned the spinster, meekly, and
slightly disgusted with his jargon; I pretend not to
judge of either events or the intentions of my
fellow
creatures, much less of those of omnipotence.
'Tis well, woman'tis well, cried the
minister
,
waving his head with supercilious disdain;
humility becometh thy sex, and lost condition
thy weakness driveth thee on headlong, like `unto
the besom of destruction.'
Surprised at this extraordinary deportment, but
yielding to that habit which urges us to speak
reverently
on sacred subjects, even when perhaps we
had better continue silent, Miss Peyton replied
There is a power above, that can and will
sustain us all in well-doing, if we seek its support
in humility and truth.
The stranger turned a lowering look of
dissatisfaction
at the speaker, and then composing
himself into an air of self-abasement, continued
in the same repelling tones as before
It is not every one that cryeth out for mercy
that will be heard. The ways of providence are
not to be judged by men`Many are called, but
few chosen.' It is easier to talk of humility, than
to feel it. Are you so humbled, vile worm, as to
wish to glorify God by your own damnation? If
not, away with you for a publican and a pharisee.
Such gross fanaticism was uncommon in
America
,
and Miss Peyton began to imbibe the
impression
that their guest was deranged; but
remembering
that he had been sent by a well known divine,
and one of reputation, she discarded the idea, and
with much forbearance, observed
I may deceive myself, in believing that mercy
is proffered to all, but it is so soothing a doctrine
that I would not willingly be undeceived.
Mercy is only for the elect, cried the
stranger
,
with an unaccountable energy; and you
are in the `valley of the shadow of death.' Are
you not a follower of them idle ceremonies, which
belong to the vain church, that our tyrants would
gladly establish here, along with their stamp-acts
and tea-laws? Answer me that, woman; and
remember
,
that heaven hears your answer: Are you
not of that idolatrous communion?
I worship at the altars of my fathers, said
the spinster, motioning to Henry for silence;
but bow to no other idol than my own
infirmities
.
Yes, yesI know yeself-righteous and
papal
,
as ye arefollowers of forms and listeners
to bookish preachingthink you, woman, that
holy Paul had notes in his hand to propound the
word to the believers.
My presence disturbs you, said Miss Peyton,
rising; I will leave you with my nephew, and
offer those prayers in private that I did wish to
mingle with his.
So saying, she withdrew, followed by the
landlady
;
who was not a little shocked and somewhat
surprised by the intemperate zeal of her new
acquaintance
.
For although the good woman
believed
that Miss Peyton and her whole church were on
the high road to destruction, she was by no means
accustomed to hear such offensive and open
avowals
of their fate.
Henry had with difficulty repressed the
indignation
excited by this unprovoked attack on his
meek and unresisting aunt; but as the door
closed
on her retiring figure he gave way to his
feelings
,
and exclaimed with heat
I must confess, sir, that in receiving a
minister
of God, I thought I was admitting a
Christian
;
and one who, by feeling his own
weaknesses
,
knew how to pity the frailties of others.
You have wounded the meek spirit of that
excellent
woman, and I acknowledge but little
inclination
to mingle in prayer with so intolerant a
spirit.
The minister stood erect, with grave
composure
,
following with his eyes in a kind of scornful
pity, the retiring spinster, and suffered the
expostulation
of the youth to be given as if unworthy
of his noticeA third voice, however, spoke
Such a denunciation would have driven many
women into fits; but it has answered the purpose
well enough as it is.
Who's that? cried the prisoner, in
amazement
,
gazing around the room in quest of the
speaker
It is me, Captain Wharton, said Harvey Birch,
removing the spectacles, and exhibiting his
piercing
eyes shining under a pair of false
eye-brows
.
Good Heavens!Harvey!
Silence! said the pedlar solemnly;  'tis a
name not to be mentioned, and least of all, here,
within the heart of the American army. Birch
paused, and gazed around him for a moment, with
an emotion exceeding the base passion of fear
and then continued in a gloomy tone, There are
a thousand halters in that very name, and little
hope would there be left me of another escape,
should I be again taken. This is a fearful venture
that I now am making; but I could not sleep in
quiet, and know that an innocent man was about
to die the death of a dog, when I might save him.
No, said Henry, with a glow of generous
feeling on his cheek; if the risk to yourself be
so heavy, retire as you came, and leave me to my
fate. Dunwoodie is making, even now, powerful
exertions in my behalf, and if he meets with Mr.
Harper in the course of the night, my liberation
is certain.
Harper! echoed the pedlar, remaining with
his hands raised, in the act of replacing the
spectacles
;
what do you know of Harper? and why
do you think he will do you service?
I have his promise;you remember our
recent
meeting in my father's dwelling, and he then
gave an unasked promise to assist me.
Yesbut do you know himthat iswhy do
you think he has the power? or what reason have
you for believing he will remember his word?
If there ever was the stamp of truth, or
simple
,
honest, benevolence, in the countenance of
man, it shone in his, said Henry; besides,
Dunwoodie
has powerful friends in the rebel army,
and it would be better that I take the chance
where I am, than thus to expose you to certain
death, if detected.
Captain Wharton, said Birch, looking
guardedly
around, with habitual caution, and speaking
with impressive seriousness of manner, if I fail
you, all fail you. No Harper or Dunwoodie can
save your life; unless you get out with me, and
that within the hour, you die to-morrow on the
gallows of a murdereryes, such are their laws;
the man who fights, and kills, and plunders, is
honoured
;
but, he who serves his country as a spy,
no matter how faithfully, no matter how honestly,
lives to be reviled, or dies like the vilest criminal.
You forget, Mr. Birch, said the youth, a
little
indignantly, that I am not a treacherous,
16*
lurking spy, who deceives to betray; but am
innocent
of the charge imputed to me.
The blood rushed over the pale, meager
features
of the pedlar, until his face was one glow of
fire; but it passed away as quickly, and he
replied
I have told you. Csar met me, as he was
going on his errand this morning, and with him I
have laid the plan, which, if executed as I wish,
will save youotherwise, you are lost; and I again
tell you, that no other power on earth, not even
Washington, can save you.
I submit, said the prisoner, yielding to his
earnest manner, and goaded by the fears that were
thus awakened anew.
The pedlar beckoned him to be silent, and
walking to the door, opened it, with the stiff,
formal air, with which he had entered the
apartment
.
Friend, let no one enter, he said to the
sentinel
,
we are about to go to prayer, and would
wish to be alone.
I don't know that any will wish to interrupt
you, returned the soldier, with a waggish leer of
his eye; but, should they be so disposed, I have
no power to stop them, if they be of the
prisoner's
friends; I have my orders, and must mind
them, whether the Englishman goes to heaven or
not.
Audacious sinner! said the pretended priest,
have you not the fear of God before your eyes?
I tell you, as you will dread punishment at the last
day, to let none of the idolatrous communion
enter
to mingle in the prayers of the righteous.
Whewewewwhat a noble commander
you'd make for sergeant Hollister; you'd preach
him dumb in a roll-call. Hark'ee, I'll just thank
you not to make such a noise when you hold forth,
as to drown our bugles, or you may get a poor
fellow
a short horn at his grog, for not turning out to
the evening parade: if you want to be alone, have
you no knife to stick over the door-latch, that you
must have a troop of horse to guard your
meeting-house
?
The pedlar took the hint, and closed the door
immediately, using the precaution suggested by the
angry dragoon.
You overact your part, said young Wharton,
in constant apprehension of a discovery; your
zeal is too intemperate.
For a foot soldier and them eastern militia, it
might be, said Harvey, turning a bag upside down
that Csar now handed him; but these dragoons
are fellows that you must brag down. A faint
heart, Captain Wharton, would do but little here;
but come, here is a black shroud for your
good-looking
countenance, taking at the same time, a
parchment mask and fitting it to the face of Henry.
The master and the man must change places for
a season.
I don't tink he look a bit like me, said Csar,
with disgust, as he surveyed his young master with
his new complexion.
Stop a minute, Csar, said the pedlar, with
the lurking drollery that at times formed part of
his manner,  'till we get on the wool.
He worse than ebber now, cried the
discontented
African. A tink coloured man like a
sheep. I nebber see sich a lip, Harvey; he most
as big as a sausage.
Great pains had been taken in forming the
different
articles used in the disguise of Captain
Wharton, and when arranged under the skilful
superintendance
of the pedlar, they formed together
a transformation that would easily escape
detection
from any but an extraordinary observer.
The mask was stuffed, and shaped in such a
manner as to preserve the peculiarities, as well as
the colour, of the African visage, and the wig
was so artfully formed of black and white wool, as
to imitate the pepper-and-salt colour of Csar's
own head, and to extract plaudits from the black
himself, who thought it an excellent counterfeit
in every thing but quality.
There is but one man in the American army
who could detect you, Captain Wharton, said the
pedlar, surveying his work with satisfaction, and
he is just now out of our way.
And who is he?
The man who made you prisoner. He would
see your white skin through a horse-hide; but
strip both of you; your clothes must be changed
from head to foot.
Csar, who had received minute instructions
from the pedlar in their morning interview,
immediately
commenced throwing aside his coarse
garments, which the youth took up and prepared
to invest himself with, unable however to repress a
few signs of loathing.
In the manner of the pedlar, there was an odd
mixture of care and humour; the former was the
result of a perfect knowledge of their danger, and
the means necessary to be used in avoiding it; and
the latter proceeded from the unavoidably ludicrous
circumstances before him, acting on an indifference
which sprung from habit, and long familiarity with
such scenes as the present.
Here Captain, he said, taking up some loose
wool, and beginning to stuff the stockings of Csar,
which were already on the leg of the prisoner;
some judgment is necessary in shaping this limb.
You will have to display it on horseback and them
southern dragoons are so used to the brittle-shins,
that should they notice your well turned calf, they'd
know at once that it never belonged to the
carcase
of a black.
Golly! said Csar, with a chuckle that
exhibited
a mouth open from ear to ear, massy
Harry
breeches fit like ebbery ting.
Every thing but your leg, said the pedlar,
coolly pursuing the toilet of Henry. Slip on the
coat, Captain, over all. Upon my word you'd pass
well at a pinkster frolic; and here, Csar, place
this powdered wig over your curls, and be careful
and look out of the window whenever the door
is open, and on no account speak, or you will
betray
all.
I s'pose Harvey tink a color'd man an't got a
tongue like oder folk, grumbled the black, as he
took the station assigned to him.
Every thing now was arranged for action, and
the pedlar very deliberately went over the whole
of his injunctions to the two actors in the scene.
The Captain he conjured to dispense with his
erect military carriage, and for a season to adopt
the humbler paces of his father's negro, and
Csar
he enjoined to silence and disguise, so long as
he could possibly maintain them. Thus prepared he
opened the door, and called aloud to the sentinel,
who had retired to the farthest end of the passage,
in order to avoid receiving any of that spiritual
comfort, which he felt was the sole property of
another.
Let the woman of the house be called, said
Harvey, in the solemn key of his assumed
character
;
and let her come alone. The prisoner is
in a happy train of meditation, and must not be
led from his devotions.
Csar sunk his face between his hands, and
when the soldier looked into the apartment, he
thought he saw his charge in deep abstraction.
Casting a glance of huge contempt at the divine,
he cried aloud for the good woman of the house.
She hastened at the call with earnest zeal,
entertaining
a secret hope that she was to be admitted
to the gossip of a death-bed repentance.
Sister, said the minister in the authoritative
tones of a master, have you in the house `The
Christian criminal's last moments, or thoughts on
eternity for those who die a violent death?'
I never heard of the book! said the matron
in astonishment.
'Tis not unlikely; there are many books you
have never heard ofit is impossible for this poor
penitent to pass in peace, without the consolations
of that volume. One hours reading in it, is worth
an age of man's preaching.
Bless me, what a treasure to possess!when
was it put out?
It was first put out at Geneva in the Greek
language, and then translated at Boston. It is a
book, woman, that should be in the hands of
every Christian, especially such as die upon the
gallows.Have a horse prepared instantly for this
black, who shall accompany me to my Brother
, and I will send down the volume yet in
season.Brother compose thy mind; you are
now in the narrow path to glory.
Csar wriggled a little in his chair, but had
sufficient
recollection to conceal his face with hands,
that were in their turn concealed by gloves. The
landlady departed to comply with this very
reasonable
request, and the group of conspirators
were again left to themselves.
This is well, said the pedlar, but the
difficult
task is to deceive the officer who commands
the guardhe is lieutenant to Lawton, and has
learned some of the captain's own cunning in
these thingsremember, Captain Wharton,
continued
he, with an air of pride, that now is the
moment when every thing depends on our
coolness
.
My fate can be made but little worse than it
is at present, my worthy fellow, said Henry, but
for your sake I will do all that in me lies.
And wherein can I be more forlorn and
persecuted
than I now am? asked the pedlar, with
that wild incoherency which often crossed his
manner
.
But I have promised
one
to save you, and
to him I never yet have broken my word.
And who is he? said Henry with awakened
interest.
No one, returned the pedlar.
The man now returned and announced that
both their horses were at the door. Harvey gave
the captain a glance of his eye, and led the way
down the stairs, first desiring the woman to leave
the prisoner to himself, in order to his digesting
the wholesome food that he had so lately received
at his hands.
The rumour of the odd character of the priest,
had spread from the sentinel at the door, to his
comrades; so, that when Harvey and Wharton
reached the open space before the building, they
found a dozen idle dragoons loitering about, with
the waggish intention of quizzing the fanatic, and
employed in affected admiration of the steeds.
A fine horse, you have, said the leader in
this plan of mischief; but a little low in flesh; I
suppose from hard labour in your calling.
My calling may be laborious to both myself
and this faithful beast, but then a day of settling
is at hand, that will reward me for all my
out-goings
and in-comings, said Birch, putting his foot
in the stirrup, and preparing to mount.
So, then you work for pay, as we fight for't?
cried another of the party.
Even so`is not the labourer worthy of his
hire?'
Come, suppose you give us a little preaching;
we have a leisure moment just now, and there's
no telling how much good you might do a set of
reprobates like us, in a few words; here, mount
this horse-block, and take your text from where
you please.
The men now gathered around the pedlar in
eager
delight, and glancing his eye expressively
towards
the Captain, who had been suffered to
mount in peace, he replied
Doubtless, for such is my duty. But Csar,
you can ride up the road, and give the notethe
unhappy prisoner will be wanting the book, for
his hours are numbered.
Ayeaye, go along Csar, and get the book,
shouted have a dozen voices, all crowding
eagerly
around the ideal priest, in anticipation of a
frolic.
The pedlar inwardly dreaded, that, in their
unceremonious handling of himself and
garments
,
his hat and wig might be displaced, when
detection would be certain; he was, therefore,
fain to comply with their request. Ascending the
horse-block, after hemming once or twice, and
casting several glances at the Captain, who
continued
immoveable, he commenced as follows:
I shall call your attention, my brethren, to that
portion of scripture which you will find in the 2d
book of Samuel, and which is written in the
following words: `And the king lamented over
Abner
,
and said, died Abner as a fool dieththy
hands were not bound, nor thy feet put into
fetters
;
as a man falleth before wicked men, so falleth
thou, and all the people wept again over him.'
Csar, ride forward, I say, and obtain the book as
directed; thy master is groaning in spirit even now
for the want of it.
An excellent text, cried the dragoons. Go
ongo onlet the snow-ball stay; he wants to
be edified as well as another.
What are you at there, you scoundrels, cried
Lieutenant Mason, as he came in sight from a
walk he had taken to sneer at the evening parade
of the regiment of militia; away with every man
of you to your quarters, and let me find that each
horse is cleaned and littered when I come round.
The sound of the officer's voice operated like a
charm, and no priest could desire a more silent
congregation
,
although he might possibly have wished
for one that was more numerous. Mason had not
done speaking, when it was reduced to the image
of Csar only. The pedlar took that opportunity
to mount, but he had to preserve the gravity of
his movements, for the remark of the troopers upon
the condition of their beasts, was but too just, and
a dozen of dragoon horses stood saddled and
bridled
at hand, ready to receive their riders at a
moment's warning.
Well, have you bitted the poor devil within,
said Mason, that he can take his last ride under
the curb of divinity, old gentleman.
There is evil in thy conversation, profane
man, cried the priest, raising his hands, and
casting
his eyes upwards in holy horror; so I will
depart from thee unhurt, even as Daniel was
liberated
from the lion's den.
Off with you, for a hypocritical, psalm
singing
,
canting rogue in disguise, said Mason
scornfully
;
by the life of Washington! it worries an
honest follow, to see such voracious beasts of
prey ravaging a country for which he shed his
blood. If I had you on a Virginia plantation for
VOL. II. 17
a quarter of an hour, I'd teach you to worm the
tobacco with the turkeys.
I leave you, and shake the dust off my shoes,
that no remnant of this wicked hole may tarnish
the vestments of the godly.
Start, or I will shake the dust from your
jacket
,
you designing knave. A fellow to be
preaching
to my men! There's Hollister put the devil
in them by his exhortingthe rascals were
getting
too conscientious to strike a blow that would
rase the skin. But hold, whither do you travel,
master blackey, in such godly company?
He goes, said the minister, hastily speaking
for his companion, to return with a book of
much condolence and virtue to the sinful youth
above, whose soul will speedily become white,
even as his outwards are black and unseemly.
Would you deprive a dying man of the
consolation
of religion?
Nonopoor fellow, his fate is bad enough,
a famous good breakfast that prim body of an
aunt of his gave us. But harkee, Mr.
Revelations
,
if the youth must die secundum artem, let
it be by a gentleman's directions; and my advice
is, that you never trust that skeleton of yours
among us again, or I will take the skin off and
leave you naked.
Out upon thee for a reviler and scoffer of
goodness! said Birch, moving slowly, and with
a due observance of clerical dignity, down the
road, followed by the imaginary Csar; but I
leave thee, and that behind me that will prove
thy condemnation, and take from thee a hearty
and joyful deliverance.
Damn him, muttered the trooper, pursing
his lip with a scornful smile, the fellow rides
like a stake, and his legs stick out like the cocks
of his hat. I wish I had him below these hills
where the law is not over particular, I'd
Corporal of the guard!corporal of the
guard!shouted the sentinel in the passage to
the chamberscorporal of the guard!
corporal
of the guard!
The subaltern flew up the narrow stair-way
that led to the room of the prisoner, and
demanded
of the man the meaning of his outcry.
The soldier was standing at the open door of
the apartment, looking in with a suspicious eye,
upon the supposed British officer. On observing
his lieutenant he fell back with habitual respect,
and replied with an air of puzzled thought
I dont know, sir; but just now the prisoner
looked queer. Ever since the preacher has left
him he don't look as he used to dobutgazing
intently over the shoulder of his officer, it must
be him, too. There is the same powdered head,
and the darn in the coat, where he was hit the
day we had the last brush with the enemy.
And then all this noise is occasioned, by your
doubting whether that poor gentleman is your
prisoner or not, is it sirrah? Who the devil do
you think it can be else?
I don't know who else it can be, returned
the fellow sullenly; but he's grown thicker and
shorter, if it is him; and see for yourself, sir, he
shakes all over like a man in an ague.
This was but too true. Csar was an alarmed
auditor of this short conversation, and from
congratulating
himself upon the dexterous escape of
his young master, his thoughts were very
naturally
beginning to dwell upon the probable
consequences
to his own person. The pause that
succeeded to the last remark of the sentinel, in
no degree contributed to the restoration of his
faculties. Lieutenant Mason was busied in
examining
with his own eyes the suspected person
of the black, and Csar was aware of the fact,
by stealing a look through a passage under one of
his arms, that he had left for the purpose of
reconnoitring
.
Captain Lawton would have
discovered
the fraud immediately, but Mason was by
no means so quick-sighted as his commander. He
therefore turned rather contemptuously to the
soldier, and speaking in an under tone, observed
That anabaptist, methodistical, quaker,
psalm-singing
rascal, has frightened the boy, with his
farrago about flames and brimstone. I'll step in
and cheer him with a little rational conversation.
I have heard of fear making a man white,
said the soldier drawing back, and staring as if
his eyes would start from their sockets; but it
has changed the royal captain to a black.
The truth was, that Csar, unable to hear what
Mason uttered in a low voice, and having every
fear aroused in him by what had already passed,
incautiously removed the wig a little from one of
his ears in order to hear the better, without in
the least remembering that its colour might prove
fatal to his disguise. The sentinel had kept his
eyes fastened on his prisoner and noticed the
action
.
The attention of Mason was instantly
drawn to the same object, and forgetting all
delicacy
for a brother officer in distress, or, in short,
forgetting every thing but the censure that might
alight on his corps, the Lieutenant sprang
forward
and seized the terrified African by the throat.
For no sooner had Csar heard his colour named,
than he knew his discovery was certain; and at
the first sound of Mason's heavy boot on the floor,
he arose from his seat and retreated precipitately
to a corner of the room.
Who are you? cried Mason, dashing the head
of the old man against the angle of the wall at
each interrogatory, who the devil are you, and
where is the Englishman? Speak! you
thunder-cloud
.
Answer me, you jack-daw, or I'll hang
you on the gallows of the spy.
But Csar continued firm. Neither the threats
nor the blows could extract any reply, until the
Lieutenant, by a very natural transition in the
attack
,
sent his heavy boot forward in a direction
that brought it in exact contact with the most
sensitive part of the negrohis shin. The most
obdurate heart could not have exacted further
patience, and Csar instantly gave in. The first
words he spoke were
Golly! Massa! You tink I got no feelin?
By Heavens! shouted the Lieutenant; it
is the negro himself. Scoundrel! where is your
master, and who was the priest? While speaking
he made a movement as if about to renew the
attack
;
but Csar cried aloud for mercy, promising
to tell all that he knew.
Who was the priest? repeated the dragoon,
drawing back his formidable leg, and holding it in
threatening suspense.
Harvey, Harvey! cried Csar, dancing from
one leg to the other, as he thought each member
in its turn assailed.
Harvey who? you black villain, cried the
impatient
Lieutenant, as he executed a full measure
of vengeance by letting his leg fly.
Birch! shrieked Csar, falling on his knees,
the tears rolling in large drops over his shining
face.
Harvey Birch! echoed the trooper, hurling
the black from him and rushing from the room;
To arms! to arms! Fifty guineas for the life of
the Pedlar spygive no quarters to either. Mount,
mount! to arms! to horse!
During the uproar occasioned by the assembling
of the dragoons, who all rushed tumultuously to
their horses, Csar rose from the floor, where he
had been thrown by Mason, and began to examine
into his injuries.Happily for himself, he had
alighted on his head, and sustained no material
damage.
CHAPTER XIII.
Away went Gilpin, neck or nought,
Away went hat and wig!
He little dreamt, when he set out,
Of running such a rig!
Cowper
.
The
road which it was necessary for the
pedlar
and the English captain to travel, in order to
reach the shelter of the hills, lay for a half-mile
in full view from the door of the building that had
so recently been the prison of the latter; running
for the whole distance over the rich plain that
spreads to the very foot of the mountains, which
here rise in a nearly perpendicular ascent from
their bases; it then turned short to the right, and
was obliged to follow the windings of nature as it
won its way into the bosom of the highlands.
To preserve the supposed difference in their
stations, Harvey rode a short distance ahead of his
companion, and maintained the sober, dignified
pace that was suited to his assumed character.
On their right, the regiment of foot that we have
already mentioned lay in tents; and the sentinels
who guarded their encampment, were to be seen
moving with measured tread, under the skirts of
the hills themselves.
The first impulse of Henry was, certainly, to
urge the beast he rode to his greatest speed at
once, and by a coup-de-main, not only accomplish
his escape, but relieve himself from the torturing
suspense of his situation. But the forward
movement
that the youth made for this purpose was
instantly checked by the pedlar.
Hold up! he cried, dexterously reining his
own horse across the path of the other; would
you ruin us both? Fall into the place of a
black, following his master. Did you not see
their blooded chargers, all saddled and bridled,
standing in the sun before the house? How long
do you think that miserable Dutch horse you are
on would hold his speed, if pursued by the
Virginians
?
Every foot that we can gain, without
giving the alarm, counts us a day in our lives.
Ride steadily after me, and on no account look
back. They are as subtle as foxes, aye, and as
ravenous for blood as wolves!
Henry reluctantly restrained his impatience,
and followed the directions of the pedlar. His
imagination, however, continually alarmed him
with the sounds of a fancied pursuit; though Birch
who occasionally looked back under the pretence
of addressing his companion, assured him that all
continued quiet and peaceful.
But, said Henry, it will not be possible for
Csar to remain undiscovered longhad we not
better put our horses to the gallop, and by the
time that they can reflect on the cause of our
flight, we can reach the corner of the woods?
Ah! you little know them, Captain Wharton,
returned the pedlar' there is a sergeant at this
moment looking after us, as if he thought all was
not rightthe keen-eyed fellow watches me like
a tiger laying in wait for his leap; when I stood
on the horse-block he half suspected then that
something was wrong; nay, check your beast
we must let the animals walk a little, for he is
laying his hand on the pommel of his saddleif
he mounts now we are gone. The foot-soldiers
could reach us with their muskets.
What does he do? asked Henry, reining his
horse to a walk, but at the same time pressing his
heels into his sides, to be in readiness for a
spring.
He turns from his charger, and looks the other
way; now trot on gentlynot so fastnot so
fastobserve the sentinel in the field, a little
ahead of ushe eyes us keenly.
Never mind the footman, said Henry
impatiently
;
he can do nothing but shoot us
whereas
,
these dragoons may make me a captive again.
Surely, Harvey, there are horse moving down the
road behind us. Do you see nothing
particular
?
Humph! ejaculated the pedlar; there is
something particular indeed, to be seen behind
the thicket on our leftturn your head a little,
and you may see and profit by it too.
Henry eagerly seized this permission to look
aside, and the blood curdled to his heart as he
observed
that they were passing a gallows that
unquestionably
had been erected for his own
execution
:he
turned his face from the sight in
undisguised
horror.
There is a warning to be prudent in that bit
of wood, said the pedlar, in the sententious
manner
that he often adopted.
It is a terrific sight, indeed! cried Henry, for
a moment veiling his eyes with his hand, as if to
drive a vision from before him.
The pedlar moved his body partly around, and
spoke with energetic but gloomy bitternessand
yet, Captain Wharton, you see it where the setting
sun shines full upon you; the air you breathe is
clear, and fresh from the hills before you. Every
step that you take, leaves that hated gallows
behind
,
and every dark hollow, and every
shapeless
rock in the mountains, offers you a hiding place
from the vengeance of your enemies. But I have
seen the gibbet raised, when no place of refuge
offered. Twice have I been buried in dungeons,
where, fettered and in chains, I have passed nights
in torture, looking forward to the morning's dawn
that was to light me to a death of infamy. The
sweat has started from limbs that seemed already
drained of their moisture, and if I ventured to the
hole that admitted air through grates of iron, to
look out upon the smiles of nature, which God
has bestowed for the meanest of his creatures, the
gibbet has glared before my eyes like an evil
conscience
,
harrowing the soul of a dying man. Four
times have I been in their power, besides this last;
buttwicetwicedid I think that my hour had
come. It is hard to die at the best, Captain
Wharton
;
but to spend your last moments alone and
unpitied, to know that none near you so much as
think of the fate that is to you the closing of all
that is earthly; to think, that in a few hours, you
are to be led from the gloom, which as you dwell on
what follows, becomes dear to you, to the face of
day, and there to meet all eyes upon you, as if you
were a wild beast; and to lose sight of every thing
amidst the jeers and scoffs of your
fellow-creatures
.
That, Captain Wharton, that indeed is to
die.
Henry listened in amazement, as his companion
uttered this speech with a vehemence altogether
new to him; both seemed to have forgotten their
danger and their disguises, as he cried
What! were you ever so near death as that?
Have I not been the hunted beast of these
hills for three years past? resumed Harvey; and
once they even led me to the foot of the gallows
itself, and I escaped only by an alarm from the
royal troops. Had they been a quarter of an hour
later, I must have died. There was I placed in the
midst of unfeeling men, and gaping women and
children, as a monster to be cursed. When I
would pray to God, my ears were insulted with
the history of my crimes; and when in all that
multitude I looked around for a single face that
showed me any pity, I could find noneno, not
even oneall cursed me as a wretch who would
sell his country for gold. The sun was brighter
to my eyes than commonbut then it was the last
time I should see it. The fields were gay and
pleasant
,
and every thing seemed as if this world was
a kind of heaven. Oh! how sweet life was to me
at that moment! 'Twas a dreadful hour, Captain
Wharton, and such as you have never known.
You have friends to feel for you, but I had none
but a father to mourn my loss, when he might
hear of it; but there was no pity, no consolation
near to sooth my anguish. Every thing seemed
to have deserted me.I even thought that
he
had
forgotten that I lived.
What! did you feel that God had forsaken
you, Harvey? cried the youth, with strong
sympathy
.
God never forsakes his servants, returned
Birch with reverence, and betraying naturally a
devotion that hitherto he had only assumed.
And who did you mean by
he
?
The pedlar raised himself in his saddle to the
stiff and upright posture that was suited to his
outward
appearance. The look of fire that for a
short time glowed upon his countenance
disappeared
in the solemn lines of unbending
self-abasement
,
and speaking as if addressing a negro,
he replied
In heaven there is no distinction of colour,
my brother, therefore you have a precious charge
within you, that you must hereafter render an
account
of,dropping his voice, This is the last
sentinel near the road; look not back, as you
value
your life.
Henry remembered his situation, and instantly
assumed the humble demeanour of his adopted
character. The unaccountable energy of the
pedlar's manner was soon forgotten in the sense
of his own immediate danger; and with the
recollection of his critical situation, returned all
the uneasiness that he had momentarily
forgotten
.
What see you, Harvey? he cried, observing
the pedlar to gaze towards the building they had
left, with ominous interest; what see you at
the house?
That which bodes no good to us, returned
the pretended priest. Throw aside the mask
and wigyou will need all your senses without
much delaythrow them in the road: there are
none before us that I dread, but there are those
behind
who will give us a fearful race.
Nay, then, cried the Captain, casting the
implements
of his disguise into the highway, let
us improve our time to the utmost---we want a
full quarter to the turn; why not push for it at
once?
Be cool---they are in alarm, but they will not
mount without an officer, unless they see us fly---
now he comes---he moves to the stables---trot
briskly---a dozen are in their saddles, but the
officer
stops to tighten his girths---they hope to steal
a march upon us---he is mounted---now ride,
Captain Wharton, for your life, and keep at my
heels. If you quit me you will be lost.
A second request was unnecessary. The instant
that Harvey put his horse to his speed, Captain
Wharton was at his heels, urging the miserable
animal that he rode to the utmost. Birch had
selected
the beast on which he rode, and although
vastly inferior to the high fed and blooded chargers
of the dragoons, still he was much superior to the
little pony that had been thought good enough
to carry Csar Thompson on an errand. A very
few jumps convinced the Captain that his
companion
was fast leaving him, and a fearful glance that
he threw behind, informed the fugitive that
his enemies were as speedily approaching. With
that abandonment that makes misery doubly
grievous
,
when it is to be supported alone, Henry
cried aloud to the pedlar not to desert him.
Harvey
instantly drew up and suffered his companion
to run along side of the horse he rode. The cocked
hat and wig of the pedlar fell from his head, the
moment that his steed began to move briskly, and
this development of their disguise, as it might be
termed, was witnessed by the dragoons, who
announced
their observation by a boisterous shout,
that seemed to be uttered in the very ears of the
fugitivesso loud was the cry, and so short the
distance between them.
Had we not better leave our horses? said
Henry, and make for the hills across the fields
on our leftthe fence will stop our pursuers.
That way lies the gallows, returned the
pedlar
these
fellows go three feet to our two, and
would mind them fences no more than we do these
ruts; but it is a short quarter to the turn, and there
are two roads behind the wood. They may stand
to choose until they can take the track, and we
shall gain a little upon them there.
But this miserable horse is blown already,
cried Henry, urging his beast with the end of his
bridle, at the same time that Harvey aided his
efforts
by applying the lash of a heavy riding whip
Vol. II. 18
that he carried; he will never stand it for half a
mile further.
A quarter will do--a quarter will do, said the
pedlar; a single quarter will save us, if you
follow
my directions.
Somewhat cheered by the cool and confident
manner of his companion, Henry continued
silently
urging his horse forward. A few moments
brought them to the desired turn, and as they
doubled round a point of low under-brush, the
fugitives caught a glimpse of their pursuers
scattered
along the highway.Mason and the
sergeant
being better mounted, were much nearer to
their heels than even the pedlar thought could be
possible.
At the foot of the hills, and for some distance
up the dark valley that wound among the
mountains
,
a thick underwood of saplings had been
suffered to shoot up, where the heavier growth
was felled for the sake of the fuel. At the sight of
this cover Henry again urged the pedlar to
dismount
and secrete themselves, but his request was
promptly refused. The two roads before
mentioned
met at a very sharp angle, at a short distance
from the turn, and both were circuitous, so that
but little of either could be seen at a time.
The pedlar took the one which led to the left,
but held it only a moment; for on reaching a
partial opening in the ticket, he darted across
into the right-hand path, and led the way up a
steep ascent which lay directly before them.
This manuvre saved them.On reaching the
fork the dragoons followed the track, and passed
the spot where the fugitives had crossed to the
other road, before they missed the marks of the
footsteps. Their loud cries were heard, by Henry
and the pedlar as their wearied and breathless
animals toiled up the hill, ordering their comrades
in the rear to ride in the right direction. The
Captain again proposed to leave their horses and
plunge into the thicket.
Not yet---not yet, said Birch in a low voice;
the road falls from the top of this hill as steep
as it risesfirst let us gain the top. While
speaking
,
they reached the desired summit, and both
threw themselves from their horses, Henry
plunging
into the thick underwood, which covered the
side of the mountain for some distance above
them. Harvey stopped to give each of their
beasts a few severe blows of his whip, that drove
them headlong down the path on the other side
of the eminence, and then followed his example.
The pedlar entered the thicket with a little
caution, and avoided, as much as possible,
rustling
or breaking the branches in his way.
There was but time only to shelter his person
from view, when a dragoon led up the ascent and
on reaching the height, he cried aloud
I saw one of their horses turning the hill this
minute.
Drive onspur forward, my lads, shouted
Mason, give the Englishman quarters, but cut
down the pedlar, and make an end of him.
Henry felt his companion gripe his arm hard, as
he listened in an universal tremor to this cry,
which was followed by the passage of a dozen
horsemen, with a vigor and speed, that showed
too plainly how little security their over-tired
steeds could have afforded them.
Now, said the pedlar, rising from their cover
to reconnoitre, and standing for a moment in
suspense
,
all that we gain is clear gain, for as we
go up they go down. Let us be stirring.
But will they not follow us, and surround this
mountain, said Henry, rising, and imitating the
laboured but rapid progress of his companion;
remember they have foot as well as horse, and
at any rate we shall starve in the hills.
Fear nothing, Captain Wharton, returned the
pedlar, with confidence; this is not the
mountain
that I would be on, but necessity has made me
a dexterous pilot among these hills. I will lead
you where no man will dare to follow. See, the
sun is already setting behind the top of the
western
mountains, and it will be two hours to the
rising of the moon. Who, think you, will follow
us far on a November night through these rocks and
precipices.
But listen! exclaimed Henry; the dragoons
are shouting to each otherthey miss us already.
Come to the point of this rock, and you may
see them, said Harvey, composedly setting
himself
down to rest. Nay, they can see usnotice,
they are pointing up with their fingers. There!
one has fired his pistol, but the distance is too
great for even a musket to carry upwards.
They will pursue us, cried the impatient
Henry; let us be moving.
They will not think of such a thing,
returned
the pedlar, picking the chicker-berries that
grew on the thin soil where he sat, and very
deliberately
chewing them, leaves and all, to refresh
his mouth. What progress could they make here,
in their heavy boots and spurs, with their long
swords or even pistols. No, nothey may go
back and turn out the foot, but the horse pass
through these defiles, where they can keep the
saddle
,
with fear and trembling. Come, follow me,
Captain
Wharton; we have a troublesome march
before
us, but I will bring you where none will think
of venturing this night.
So saying, they both arose, and were soon hid
from view amongst the rocks and caverns of the
mountain.
The conjecture of the pedlar was true. Mason
and his men dashed down the hill in pursuit, as
they supposed, of their victims, but on reaching
the bottom lands, they found only the deserted
hourses of the fugitives. Some little time was spent
in examining the woods near them, and in
endeavouring
to take the trail on such ground as might
enable the horse to pursue, when one of the party
descried the pedlar and Henry seated on the rock
already mentioned.
He's off, muttered Mason, eyeing Harvey
with savage fury, he's off, and we are
disgraced
.
By heavens, Washington will not trust
us with the keeping of a suspected tory, if we let
this rascal trifle in this manner with the corps;
and there sits the Englishman too, looking down
upon us with a mighty smile of benevolence. I
fancy that I can see it. Well, well, my lad, you
are comfortably seated, I will confess, and
something
better than dancing upon nothing; but you
are not to the west of the Harlaem river yet, and
I'll try your wind before you tell Sir Henry what
you have seen, or I'm no soldier.
Shall I fire, and frighten the pedlar? asked
one of the men, drawing his pistol from the holster.
Aye, startle the birds from their perchlet us
see how they can use the wing. The man fired
the pistol, and Mason continued'Fore George,
I believe the scoundrels laugh at us. But
homeward
,
or we shall have them rolling stones upon
our heads, and the Royal Gazettes teeming with
an account of a rebel regiment routed by two
loyalists
.
They have told bigger lies than that
before
now.
The dragoons moved sullenly after their officer
who rode towards their former quarters, musing
on the course it behoved him to pursue in the
present
dilemma. It was twilight when Mason's
party
reached the dwelling, before the door of which
were collected a great number of the officers and
men, busily employed in giving and listening to
the most exaggerated accounts of the escape of
the spy. The mortified dragoons gave their
ungrateful tidings with the sullen air of
disappointed
men; and most of the officers gathered round
Mason, in consultation as to the steps that ought
to be taken. Miss Peyton and Frances were
breathless and unobserved listeners to all that
passed
between them, from the window of the
chamber
immediately above their heads.
Something must be done, and that speedily,
observed the commanding officer of the regiment
which lay encamped before the house; this
English officer is doubtless an instrument in the
great blow aimed at us by the enemy lately;
besides
,
our honor is involved in his escape.
Let us beat the woods! cried several at
once; by morning we shall have them both
again.
Softlysoftlygentlemen, returned the
colonel
;
no man can travel these hills after dark,
unless used to the passes. Nothing but horse
can do service in this business, and I presume
Lieutenant Mason hesitates to move without the
orders of his major?
I certainly dare not, replied the subaltern,
gravely shaking his head, unless you will take
the responsibility of an order; but Major
Dunwoodie
will be back again in two hours, and we
can carry the tidings through the hills before
daylight
;
so that by spreading patroles across from
one river to the other, and offering a reward to
the country people, their escape will yet be
impossible
;
unless they join the party that is said
to be out on the Hudson.
A very plausible plan, cried the colonel,
and one that must succeed; but let a messenger
be despatched to Dunwoodie, or he may continue
at the ferry until it proves too late; though
doubtless
the runaways will lie in the mountains
tonight
.
To this suggestion Mason acquiesced, and a
courier was sent to the major, with the important
intelligence of the escape of Henry, and an
intimation
of the necessity of his presence to conduct
the pursuit. With this arrangement the officers
separated.
When Miss Peyton and her niece first learnt
the escape of Captain Wharton, it was with
difficulty
they could credit their senses. They both
relied so implicitly on the success of
Dunwoodie's
exertions, that they thought the act, on the
part of their relative, extremely imprudent; but
it was now too late to mend it. In listening to the
conversations of the officers, both were struck
with the increased danger of Henry's situation, if
re-captured, and they trembled to think upon the
great exertions that would be made to accomplish
this object. Miss Peyton consoled herself, and
endeavoured to cheer her niece, with the
probability
,
that the fugitives would pursue their course
with unremitting diligence, so that they might
reach the Neutral Ground, before the horse would
carry down the tidings of their flight. The
absense
of Dunwoodie seemed to her all important,
and the artless spinster was anxiously devising
some project that might detain her kinsman, and
thus give her nephew the longest possible time.
But very different were the reflections of Frances.
She could no longer doubt, that the figure she
had seen on the hill was Birch, and she felt
certain
that instead of flying to the friendly forces
below, her brother would be taken to the
mysterious
hut to pass the night.
Frances and her aunt held a long and animated
discussion by themselves, when the good spinster
reluctantly yielded to the representation of her
niece, and folding her in her arms, she kissed her
cold cheek, and fervently blessing the maid,
allowed
her to depart on her errand of fraternal
love.
CHAPTER XIV.
And here, forlorn and lost I tread,
With fainting steps, and slow;
Where wilds immeasurably spread,
Seem length'ning as I go.
Goldsmith
.
The
night had set in dark and chilling, as
Frances
Wharton, with a beating heart but light steps,
moved through the little garden that laid behind
the farm-house which had been her brother's
prison
,
and took her way to the foot of the mountain,
where she had seen the figure of him that she
supposed to be the pedlar. It was still early, but
the darkness and dreary nature of a November
evening would at any other moment, or with less
inducement to exertion, have driven her back in
terror to the circle that she had left. Without
pausing to reflect, however, she flew over the
ground with a rapidity that seemed to bid defiance
to all impediments, nor stopped even to breathe,
until she had gone half the distance to the rock,
that she had marked as the spot, where Birch made
his appearance on that very morning.
The good treatment of their women, is the surest
evidence that a people can give of their
civilization
,
and there is no nation which has more to
boast of in this respect than the Americans.
Frances
felt but little apprehension from the orderly
and quiet troops, who were taking their evening's
repast on the side of the highway opposite to the
field through which she was flying. They were
her countrymen, and she knew her sex would be
respected by the eastern militia, who composed
this body; but in the volatile and reckless
character
of the southern horse, she had less
confidence
.
Outrages of any description were seldom
committed by the really American soldiery, but
the maid recoiled with exquisite delicacy from
even the appearance of humiliation. When,
therefore
,
she heard the footsteps of a horse moving
slowly up the road, she shrunk, timidly, into a
little
thicket of wood, which grew neglected around
the spring that bubbled from the side of a hillock
near her. The vidette, for such it proved to be,
passed her without noticing her form, which was
so enveloped as to be as little conspicuous as
possible
,
humming a low air to himself, and probably
thinking of some other fair that he had left, in the
pride of her beauty, on the banks of the Potomac.
Frances listened anxiously to his retreating
footsteps
,
and as they died upon her ear, she ventured
from her place of secrecy, and advanced a short
distance into the field; where, startled at the
gloom, and appalled with the dreariness of the
prospect, the maid paused to reflect on what she
had undertaken. Throwing back the hood of her
cardinal, she sought the support of a tree, and
gazed towards the summit of the mountain that
was to be the goal of her enterprize. It rose
from the plain, like a huge pyramid, giving
nothing
to the eye but its outlines. The pinnacle
could be faintly discerned in front of a lighter back
ground of clouds, between which a few
glimmering
stars occasionally twinkled in momentary
brightness, and then gradually became obscured
by the passing vapour, that was moving before the
wind, at a vast distance below the clouds
themselves
.
Should she return, Henry and the pedlar
would most probably pass the night in fancied
security
,
upon that very hill, towards which she was
straining her eyes in the vain hope of observing
some light that might encourage her to proceed.
The deliberate, and what to her seemed
coldblooded
,
project of the officers, for the re-capture
of the fugitives, still rung in her ears, and
stimulated
her to go on; but the solitude into which
she must venturethe timethe actual danger
of the ascent, and the uncertainty of her finding
the hut, or what was still more disheartening, the
chance that it might be occupied by unknown
tenants
.
and those of the worst descriptionall urged
her to retreat.
The increasing darkness was each moment
rendering
objects less and less distinct, and the clouds
were gathering more gloomily in the rear of
the hill, until its form could no longer be
discerned
.
Frances threw back the profusion of her
rich curls with both hands on her temples, in
order
to possess her senses in their utmost keenness;
but the towering hill was entirely lost to the eye.
At length she discovered a faint and twinkling
blaze in the direction in which she thought the
building stood, that by its reviving and receding
lustre, might be taken for the glimmering of a
fire. But the delusion vanished as the horizon
again cleared, and the star of the evening shone
forth from a cloud, after struggling hard as if for
existence, in all its unrivalled brilliancy. The
maid now saw the mountain to the left of where
the planet was shining through an opening in the
hills, and suddenly a streak of mellow light burst
upon the fantastic oaks that were thinly scattered
over its summit, and gradually moved down its
side, until the whole pile stood proudly erect
under
the rays of the rising moon. Although it
would have been physically impossible for our
heroine
to advance without the aid of the friendly
light, which now gleamed in softened brightness
on the long line of level land before her; yet she
was not encouraged to proceed. If she could see
the goal of her wishes, she could also perceive the
difficulties that must attend her reaching it.
While deliberating in distressing incertitude,
now shrinking with the timidity of her sex and
years from the enterprise, and now resolving to
rescue her brother at every hazard, the maid
turned
her looks towards the east, in earnest gaze at
the clouds which constantly threatened to involve
her again in comparative darkness. Had an
adder
stung her, Frances could not have sprung with
greater celerity, than she recoiled from the object
against which she was leaning, and which she
for the first time, noticed. The two upright posts,
with a cross beam on their tops, and a rude
platform
beneath, told but too plainly the nature of
the structureeven the cord was suspended from
an iron staple, and swinging to and fro in the night
air. Frances hesitated no longer, but rather
flew than ran across the meadow, and was soon at
the base of the rock, where she hoped to find
something like a path to the summit of the
mountain
.
Here she was compelled to pause for breath,
and she improved the leisure by surveying the
ground around. The ascent was quite abrupt,
but she soon found a sheep path that wound among
the shelving rocks and through the trees, so as to
render her labour much less tiresome than it
otherwise
would have been. Throwing a fearful glance
behind, the maid commenced her journey upwards.
Young, active, and impelled by the generous wish
of saving her brother, she moved up the hill with
elastic steps, and very soon emerged from the
cover
of the woods into an open space of more level
ground, that had evidently been cleared of its
timber for the purpose of cultivation. But either
the war, or the sterility of the soil, had compelled
the adventurer to abandon the advantages that he
had obtained over the wilderness, and already the
bushes and briars were springing up afresh, as if
the plough had never traced its furrow through
the mould which nourished them.
Frances felt her spirits invigorated by even these
faint vestiges of the labour of man, and walked
up the gentle acclivity with renewed hopes of
success
.
The path now diverged into so many
different
directions, that she soon saw it would be useless
to follow their windings, and abandoning it, at the
first turn, she laboured forward towards what she
thought was the nearest point to the summit: the
cleared ground was soon past, and woods and rocks,
clinging to the precipitous sides of the mountain,
again presented themselves to her progress.
Occasionally
,
the path was to be seen running along
the verge of the clearing, and then striking off
into
the scattering patches of grass and herbage,
but in no instance could she trace it upward.
Tufts of wool, hanging to the briars, sufficiently
denoted the origin of these tracks, and Frances
rightly conjectured, that, whoever descended the
mountain, would avail himself of their existence,
to lighten the labour. Seating herself on a stone,
the maid again paused to rest and to reflect;the
clouds were rising before the moon, as if repelled
by her brightness, and the whole scene at her feet
lay pictured in the softest colours.
The white tents of the militia were stretched
in regular lines immediately beneath her. The
light was shining in the window of her aunt, whom
Frances easily fancied was standing watching the
mountain, racked with all the anxiety she might
be supposed to feel for her niece. Lanterns were
playing about in the stable-yard, where she knew
VOL. II. 19
the horses of the dragoons were kept, and
believing
them to be preparing for their night march,
she again sprang upon her feet, and renewed her
toil.
It was more than a quarter of a mile farther
that our heroine had to ascend, although she had
already conquered two-thirds of the height of the
mountain. But she was now without a path, or
any guide to direct her in her course: fortunately
the hill was conical, like most of the mountains
in that range, and by advancing upwards, she was
certain of at length reaching the desired hut,
which hung, as it were, on the very pinnacle.
Nearly an hour did the maid struggle with the
numerous
difficulties that she was obliged to
overcome
,
when, having been repeatedly exhausted
with her efforts, and in several instances, in great
danger from falls, she succeeded in gaining the
small piece of table-land on the summit.
Faint with her exertions, which had been
unusually
severe for her slender frame, she sunk on a
rock, to recover her strength and fortitude for the
approaching interview with her brother. A few
moments sufficed for this purpose, when she
proceeded
in quest of the hut. All of the
neighbouring
hills were distinctly visible by the aid of the
moon, and Frances was able, where she stood, to
trace the route of the highway from the plains
into the mountains. By following this line with
her eyes, she soon discovered the point whence
she had seen the mysterious dwelling, and directly
opposite to that point she well knew the hut must
stand.
The chilling air sighed through the leafless
branches of the gnarled and crooked oaks, as with
a step so light as hardly to rustle the dry leaves
over which she trod, Frances moved forward to
that part of the hill where she expected to find
this secluded habitation; but nothing could she
discern that in the least resembled a dwelling of
any sort. In vain she examined into every recess
of the rocks, or inquisitively explored every part
of the summit that she thought could hold the
tenement of the pedlar. No hut, nor any vestige
of a human being, could she trace. The idea of
her solitude struck on the terrified mind of the
maid, and approaching to the edge of a shelving
rock, she bent forward to gaze on the signs of life
in the vale, when a ray of keen light dazzled her
eyes, and a warm air diffused itself over her whole
frame. Recovering from her surprise, Frances
looked on the ledge beneath her, and at once
perceived
that she stood directly over the object of
her search. A hole through its roof, afforded a
passage to the smoke, which, as it blew aside,
showed her a clear and cheerful fire crackling and
snapping on a rude hearth of stone. The approach
to the front of the hut, was by a winding path
around the point of the rock on which she stood,
and by this she advanced to its door.
Three sides of this singular edifice, if such it
could be called, were composed of logs laid
alternately
on each other, to a little more than the
height of a man; and the fourth was formed by the
rock against which it leaned. The roof was made
of the bark of trees, laid in long strips from the
rock to its eaves;the fissures between the logs
had been stuffed with clay, which in many places
had fallen out, and dried leaves were made use of
as a substitute to keep out the wind: a single
window
of four panes of glass was in front, but a
board carefully closed it in such a manner, as to
emit no light from the fire within. After pausing
sometime to view this singularly constructed
hiding-place, for such Frances knew it must be,
she applied her eye to a crevice to explore the
scene within. There was no lamp nor candle, but
the blazing fire of dry wood made the interior of
the hut light enough to read by. In one corner
lay a bed of straw, with a pair of blankets thrown
carelessly over it, as if left where they had last
been used by the occupant. Against the walls
and rock were suspended, from pegs forced into
the crevices, various garments, and such as were
apparently fitted for all ages and conditions, and
for either sex. British and American uniforms
hung peaceably by the side of each other; and on
the peg that supported a gown of striped calico,
such as was the usual country wear, was also
depending
a well powdered wigin short, the attire
was numerous, and as various as if a whole parish
were to be equipped from this one wardrobe.
In the angle against the rock, and opposite to the
fire which was burning in the other corner, was an
open cup-board, that held a plate or two, a mug. and
the remains of some broken meat. Before the fire
was a table, with one of its legs fractured, and
made of rough boards; these, with a single stool,
composed the furniture, if we except a few
articles
for cooking. A book that by its shape and
size appeared to be a bible, was lying on the
table
,
unopened. But it was the occupant of the
hut in whom Frances was chiefly interested.
This was a man, sitting on the stool, with his
head leaning on his hand, in such a manner as
to conceal his features, and deeply occupied in
examining some open papers before him. On the
table lay a pair of curiously and richly mounted
horseman's pistols, and the handle of a sheathed
rapier of exquisite workmanship, protruded from
between the legs of the gentleman, one of whose
hands carelessly rested on its guard. The tall
stature
of this unexpected tenant of the hut, and his
form, much more athletic than that of either Harvey
or her brother, told Frances, without the aid of his
dress, that it was neither of those whom she sought.
A close surtout was buttoned high in the throat of
the stranger, and parting at his knees, showed
breeches of buff, with military boots and spurs.
His hair was dressed so as to expose the whole
face, and, after the fashion of that day, was
profusely
powdered. A round hat was laid on the
stones that formed a paved floor to the hut, as if
to make room for a large map, which, among other
papers, occupied the table.
This was an unexpected event to the maid.
She had been so confident that the figure she had
twice seen was the pedlar, that on learning his
agency in her brother's escape, she did not in the
least doubt of finding them both in the place, which,
she now discovered, was occupied by another
and a stranger's form. She stood earnestly
looking
through the crevice, hesitating whether to
retire
,
or to wait under the expectation of yet
meeting
with Henry, as the stranger moved his hand
from before his eyes, and raised his face
apparently
in deep musing, when Frances instantly
recognized
the benevolent and strongly marked, but
composed features of Harper.
All that Dunwoodie had said of his power and
dispositionall that he had himself promised her
brother, and all the confidence that had been
created
by his dignified and paternal manner, rushed
across the mind of Frances, who threw open the
door of the hut, and falling at his feet, clasped his
knees with her arms, as she cried
Save himsave himsave my brother
remember
your promise, and save him!
Harper had risen as the door opened, and there
was a slight movement of one hand towards his
pistols, but it was cool, and instantly checked, as
Frances entered. He raised the hood of the
cardinal
19*
which had fallen over her features, and
exclaimed
,
with some uneasiness
Miss Wharton! But you cannot be alone!
There is none here but my God and you; and
by his sacred name, I conjure you to remember
your promise, and save my brother.
Harper gently raised her from her knees, and
placed her on the stool he resigned, begging her
at the same time to be composed, and to acquaint
him with all that she knew. This Frances
instantly
did, with a hurried voice, ingenuously
admitting
him to a knowledge of her own views in
wisiting that lone spot at that hour, and by herself.
It was at all times difficult to probe the thoughts
of one who held his passions in such disciplined
subjection as Harper, but still there was a lighting
of his thoughtful eye, and a slight unbending of
his muscles, as the maid proceeded in her
narrative
.
His interest, as she dwelt upon the manner
of Henry's escape and the flight to the woods, was
deep and manifest, and he listened to the
remainder
of her tale with a marked expression of
benevolent
indulgence. Her apprehensions that her
brother might still be too late through the
mountains
,
seemed to have much weight with him. for,
as she concluded, he walked a turn or two across
the hut, in silent musing.
Frances hesitated, and unconsciously played
with the handle of one of the pistols, and the
paleness
that her fears had spread over her fine
features, began to give place to a rich tint, as
after
a short pause she added
We can depend much on the friendship of
Major Dunwoodie, but his sense of honour is so
pure, thatthatnotwithstanding hishis
feelings
he
will conceive it to be his duty to
apprehend
my brother again. Besides, he thinks there
will be no danger in so doing, as he relies greatly
on your interference.
On mine! said Harper, raising his eyes in
surprise.
Yes, on yours. When we told him of your
kind language, he at once assured us all that you
had the power, and if you had promised, would
have the inclination, to procure Henry's pardon.
Said he more? asked Harper, glancing a
quick and searching eye towards the maiden.
Nothing but reiterated assurances of Henry's
safetyeven now he is in quest of you.
Miss Wharton, said Harper, advancing with
calm but impressive dignity, that I bear no mean
part in the unhappy struggle between England and
America, it might be now useless to deny. You
owe your brother's escape this night to my
knowledge
of his innocence, and the remembrance of
my word. Major Dunwoodie is mistaken, when he
says that I might openly have procured his
pardon
.
I now can controul his fate, and I pledge
to you a word which has some influence with
Washington
,
that means shall be taken to prevent his
recapture. But from you also, I exact a promise,
that this interview, and all that has passed
between
us, remains confined to your own bosom,
until you have my permission to speak upon the
subject.
Frances gave the desired assurance, and he
continued
The pedlar and your brother will soon be here,
but I must not be seen by the royal officer, or the
life of Birch might be the forfeiture.
Never! cried Frances, ardently; Henry
could never be so base as to betray the man who
saved him.
It is no childish game that we are now
playing
,
Miss Wharton. Men's lives and fortunes
hang upon slender threads, and nothing must be
left to accident that can be guarded against. Did
Sir Heary Clinton know that the pedlar held
communien
with me, and under such circumstances,
the life of the miserable man would be taken
instantly
therefore,
as you value human blood, or
remember the rescue of your brother, be prudent,
and be silent.Communicate what you know to
them both, and urge them to instant departure
if they can reach the last picquets of our army
before morning's dawn, it shall be my care that
there are none to intercept them.There is
better
work for Major Dunwoodie, than to be
exposing
the life of his friend.
While Harper was speaking, he carefully rolled
up the map he had been studying, and placed it,
together
with sundry papers that were also open,
into
his pocket. He was still occupied in this
manner
,
when the voice of the pedlar, talking in
unusually
loud tones, was heard directly over their
heads.
Stand further this way, Captain Wharton, and
you can see the tents in the moonshinebut let
them mount, and ride; I have a nest here that
will hold us both, and we will go in at our
leisure
.
And where is this nest? cried Henry, with a
voice of exultation; I confess that I have eaten
but little the last two days, and I crave some of
the cheer that you mentioned.
Hemsaid the pedlar, exerting his voice
still more; hemthis fog has given me a cold;
but move slowand be careful not to slip, or you
may land on the baggonet of the sentinel on the
flats'tis a steep hill to rise, but one can go
down it with all ease.
Harper pressed his finger on his lip, to remind
Frances of her promised silence, and taking his
pistols and hat, so that no vestige of his visit
remained
,
retired deliberately to a far corner of the
hut, where, lifting several articles of dress, he
entered
a recess in the rock, and letting them fall
again, was hid from view. Frances noticed, by the
strong fire-light, as he entered, that it was a
natural
cavity, and contained nothing but a few more
articles for domestic use.
The surprise of Henry and the pedlar, on
entering
and finding Frances in possession of the hut,
may be easily imagined. Without waiting for
explanations
or questions, the warm-hearted girl
flew into the arms of her brother, and gave a vent
to her emotions in tears. But the pedlar seemed
struck with very different feelings. His first look
was at the fire, which had been recently supplied
with fuel; he then drew open a small drawer of
the table, and looked a little alarmed at finding it
empty
Are you alone, Miss Fanny? he asked in a
quick voice; You did not come here alone?
As you see me, Mr. Birch, said Frances,
raising herself from her brother's arms, and
turning
an expressive glance towards the secret
cavern
,
that the quick eye of the pedlar instantly
understood
.
But why, and wherefore are you here?
exclaimed
her astonished brother; and how knew
you of this place at all?
Frances entered at once into a brief detail of
what had occurred at the house since their
departure
,
and the motives which induced her to seek
them.
But, said Birch, why follow us here, when
we were left on the opposite hill?
The maid related the glimpse that she had caught
of the hut and the pedlar, in her passage through
the highlands, as well as her view of him on that
day; and her immediate conjecture that the
fugitives
would seek the shelter of this habitation for
the night. Birch examined her features, as with
open ingenuousness she related the simple
incidents
that had made her mistress of his secret,
and as she ended, he sprang upon his feet, and
striking the window with the stick in his hand,
demolished
it at a blow.
'Tis but little of luxury or comfort that I
know, he said, but even that little cannot be
enjoyed in safety.Miss Wharton, he added,
advancing
before Fanny, and speaking with that
bitter
melancholy that was common to him; I am
hunted through these hills like a beast of the
forest
;
but whenever, tired with my toils, I can reach
this spot, poor and dreary as it is, I can spend my
solitary nights in safety.WIll you aid to make
the life of a wretch still more miserable?
Never! cried Frances, with fervour; your
secret is safe with me.
Major Dunwoodie said the pedlar slowly,
turning an eye upon her that red her soul.
Frances sunk her head upon her bosom for a
moment in shame, then elevating her face glowing
with fire, added with enthusiasm
Never, neverHarvey, as God may hear my
prayers.
The pedlar seemed satisfied; for he drew back,
and watching his opportunity, unseen by Henry,
slipped behind the skreen, and entered the cavern.
Frances, and her brother, who thought his
companion
had passed through the door, continued
conversing on the latter's situation for several
minutes, when the maid repeatedly urged the
necessity
of expedition on his part, in order to
precede
Dunwoodie, from whose sense of duty they
knew they had no escape. The Captain took out
his pocket book and wrote a few lines with his
pencil, then folding the paper, he handed it to his
sister
Frances, he said, you have this night
proved
yourself to be an incomparable woman. As
you love me, give that unopened to Dunwoodie,
and remember, that two hours of time may save
my life.
I willI willbut why delay? why not fly,
and improve these precious moments?
Your sister says well, Captain Wharton,
exclaimed
Harvey, who had re-entered unseen; we
must go at once. Here is food to eat as we
travel
.
But who is to see this fair creature in safety?
cried the captain. I can never desert my sister
in such a place as this.
Leave me! leave me said Frances; I
can descend as I came up. Do not doubt me
you know not my courage nor my strength.
I have not known you, dear girl, it is true;
but now, as I learn your value, can I quit you
here?nonevernever.
Captain Wharton! said Birch, throwing
open the door, You can trifle with your own
lives, if you have many to spare: I have but one,
and must nurse it.Do I go alone or not?
Gogodear Henry, said Frances,
embracing
him; goremember our father
remember
Sarah She waited not for his answer,
but gently forced him through the door, and
closed it with her own hands.
For a short time there was a warm debate
between
Henry and the pedlar; but the latter finally
prevailed, and the maid heard the successive
plunges, as they went down the side of the
mountain
at a rapid rate, and they were soon out of
hearing.
Soon after the noise of their departure had
ceased Harper re-appeared. He took the arm
of Frances in silence, and led her from the hut.
The way seemed familiar to him as, ascending to
the ledge above them, he led the maid across the
table land, tenderly pointing out the little
difficulties
in their route, and cautioning her against
injury
.
Frances felt as she walked by the side of his
majestic
person, that she was supported by a man of
no common stamp. The firmness of his step and
the composure of his manner, seemed to indicate
a mind that was settled and resolved. By taking
a route over the back of the hill, they descended
with great expedition and but little danger. The
distance it had taken Frances an hour to conquer,
was passed by Harper and his companion in ten
minutes, and they entered the open space, already
mentioned. He struck into one of the sheep paths,
and crossing the clearing with rapid strides, they
came suddenly upon a horse, caparisoned for a
rider of no mean rank. The noble beast snorted
and pawed the earth as his master approached
and replaced the pistols in the holsters.
Harper then turned, and taking the hand of
Frances, spoke as follows:
You have this night saved your brother, Miss
Wharton. It would not be proper for me to
explain
why there are limits to my ability to serve
him, but if you can detain the horse for two hours,
he is safe. After what you have already done, I
can believe you equal to any duty. God has
denied
to me children, young lady, but if it had been
his blessed will that my marriage should not have
been childless, such a treasure as yourself would I
have asked from his mercy. But you are my child.
All who dwell in this broad land are my children
and my care, and take the blessing of one who
hopes yet to meet you in happier days.
As he spoke, with a solemnity that touched
Frances to the heart, he laid his hand
impressively
upon her head. The maid turned her face
towards
him, and the hood again falling back,
exposed
her lovely features to the fulness of the
moon-beams. A tear was glistening on either
cheek, and her mild blue eyes were gazing upon
him in reverence. Harper bent and pressed a
paternal kiss upon her forehead, and continued
Any of these sheep-paths will take you to the
plain; but here we must partI have much to do
and far to rideforget me in all but your
prayers
.
He then threw himself into his saddle, and
lifting
his hat with studied politeness, rode towards
the back of the mountain, descending at the same
time, and was soon hid by the trees. Frances
sprang forward with a lightened heart, and taking
the first path that led downwards, in a few
minutes
reached the plain in safety. While busied in
stealing privately through the meadows towards
the house, the noise of horse approaching,
startled
her, and she felt how much more was to be
apprehended
from man, in some situations, than from
solitude.Hiding her form in the angle of a fence
near the road, she remained quiet for a moment,
and watched their passage. A small party of
dragoons
,
whose dress was different from the
Virginians
,
passed at a brisk trot, and were followed by
a gentleman, enveloped in a large cloak, who
she at once knew to be Harper. Behind him
rode a black in livery, and two youths in uniforms
brought up the rear.Instead of taking the road
that led by the encampment, they turned short to
the left, and entered the hills.
Wondering who this unknown but powerful
friend of her brother could be, the maid glided
across the fields, and using due precautions in
approaching
the dwelling, regained her residence
undiscovered and in safety.
Vol. II. 20
CHAPTER XV.
Hence bashful cunning!
And prompt me, plain and holy innocence!
I am your wife, if you will marry me
Tempest
.
On
joining Miss Peyton, Frances learnt that
Dunwoodie was not yet returned; although, with
a view to relieve Henry from the importunities of
the supposed fanatic, he had desired a very
respectable
divine of their own church, to ride up
from the river and offer his services. This
gentleman
was already arrived, and spent the
half-hour
he had been there, in a sensible and well bred
conversation with the spinster, that in no degree
touched upon their domestic affairs.
To the eager inquiries of Miss Peyton, relative
to her success in her romantic excursion, Frances
could say no more, than that she was bound to
be silent, and to recommend the same
precaution
to the good maiden also. There was a smile
that played around the beautiful mouth of
Frances
,
while she uttered this injunction, chasing
away the momentary gleam of distrust that
clouded
her features, which satisfied her aunt that all
was as it should be. She was urging her niece to
take some refreshment after her fatiguing
expedition
,
with the kind-hearted consideration of her
habits, when the noise of a horseman riding to
the door, announced the return of the major.
He had been found by the courier, who was
despatched
by Mason, impatiently waiting the return
of Harper to the ferry, and immediately flew to
the place where his friend had been confined,
harassed by many different reflections. The
heart of Frances bounded with violence, as she
listened to his approaching footsteps. It wanted
yet an hour to the termination of the shortest
period
that the pedlar had fixed as the time
necessary
,
in which to effect his escape. Even Harper,
powerful and well disposed as he acknowledged
himself to be, had laid great stress upon the
importance
of detaining the Virginians from pursuit
during that hour. The maid, however, had not
time to rally her thoughts, before Dunwoodie
entered one door, as Miss Peyton, with the
readiness
of female instinct, retired through another.
The countenance of Peyton was flushed, and
there was an air of vexation and disappointment
that pervaded his whole manner
'Twas imprudent, Frances; nay, it was
unkind
,
he cried, throwing himself into a chair,
to fly at the very moment that I had assured
him of his safety. I can almost persuade myself
that you delight in creating points of difference in
our feelings and duties.
In our duties there may very possibly be a
difference, returned the maid, approaching
near to where he sat, and leaning her slender
form slightly against the wall; but not in our
feelings
,
PeytonYou must certainly rejoice in the
escape of Henry from death!
There was no death impending. He had the
promise of Harper; and it is a word never to be
doubted.Oh! Frances! Frances! had you
known this man, you would never have distrusted
his assurance; nor would you have again reduced
me to this distressing alternative.
What alternative? asked Frances, pitying
his emotions deeply, but eagerly seizing upon
every circumstance to prolong the interview.
What alternative! am I not compelled to spend
this night in the saddle, to re-capture your
brother
,
when I had thought to have laid it on my
pillow, with the happy consciousness of
contributing
to his release. You make me seem your
enemy; me, who would cheerfully shed the last
drop of my blood in your service. I repeat,
Frances
it was rashit was unkindit was a sad, sad
mistake.
The maid bent towards him, and timidly took
one of his hands, while with the other she gently
removed the raven curls from his burning brow,
as she said
But why go at all, dear Peyton?you have
done much for our country, and she cannot exact
such a sacrifice as this at your hands.
Frances! Miss Wharton! exclaimed the
youth, springing on his feet, and pacing the floor
with a cheek that burnt with fire through its brown
covering, and an eye that sparkled with conscious
integrity; it is not my country, but my honor,
that requires the sacrifice. Has he not fled from
a guard of my own corps? But for this I might
have been spared the blow!But if the eyes of
the Virginians are blinded to deception and
artifice
,
their horses are swift of foot, and their
sabres
keen. We will see before to-morrow's sun
who it is will presume to hint, that the beauty of
the sister furnished a mask to skreen the brother.
YesyesI should like even now, he
continued
,
laughing bitterly, to hear the villain, who
would dare to surmise that such a treachery
existed
!
Peytondear Peyton, said Frances,
recoiling
in terror from his angry eye, you curdle my
bloodwould you kill my brother?
Would I not die for him! exclaimed
Dunwoodie
with a softened voice, as he turned to her
more mildly; you know I would; but I am
distracted with the cruel surmise to which this
step of Henry's subjects me. What will
Washington
think of me, should he learn that I ever
became your husband?
If that alone impels you to act so harshly
towards my brother, returned Frances, with a
slight tremor in her voice, let it never happen
for him to learn.
And this is consoling me, Frances! cried
her lover; what a commentary on my
sufferings
!
Nay, dear Dunwoodie, I meant nothing harsh
nor unkind; but are you not making us both of
more consequence to Washington, than the truth
will justify?
I trust that my name is not entirely unknown
to the commander in chief, said the major a
little
proudly; nor are you as obscure as your
modesty would make you. I believe you,
Frances
,
when you say that you pity me, and it must
be my task to continue worthy of such feelings
But I waste the precious moments; we must go
through the hills to-night, that we may be
refreshed
in time for the duty of to-morrow. Mason is
already waiting for my orders to mount; and
Frances I leave you, with a heavy heartpity
me, but feel no concern for your brotherhe
must again become a prisoner, but every hair of
his head is sacred.
Stop! Dunwoodie, I conjure you, cried
Frances
,
gasping for breath, as she noticed that the
hand of the clock still wanted many minutes to the
desired hour; before you go on your errand of
20*
fastidious duty, read this note that Henry has left
for you, and which, doubtless, he thought he was
writing to the friend of his youth.
Frances, I excuse your feelings, but the time
will come, when you will do me justice.
That time is now, said the maid, extending
her hand, unable any longer to feign a displeasure
that she did not feel.
Where got you this note! exclaimed the
youth, glancing his eyes over its contents. Poor
Henry, you are indeed my friend! If any one
wishes me happiness, it is you.
He does, he does, cried Frances, eagerly;
he wishes you every happiness; believe what he
tells youevery word is true.
I do believe him, lovely girl, and he refers me
to you for its confirmation. Would that I could
trust equally to your affections!
You may, Peyton, said Frances, looking up
with innocent confidence towards her lover.
Then read for yourself, and verify your words,
interrupted Dunwoodie, holding the note towards
her with eyes that sparkled with every passion but
anger.
Frances received it in astonishment and read the
following:
Life is too precious to be trusted to
uncertainties
.
I leave you, Peyton, unknown to all but
Csar, and I recommend him to your mercy. But
there is a care that weighs me to the earth. Look
at my aged and infirm parent. He will be
stigmatised
for the supposed crime of his son. Look
at those helpless sisters that I leave behind me
without a protector. Prove to me that you love
us all. Let the clergyman that you will bring
with you, unite you this night to Frances, and
become
at once, brother, son, and husband.
The paper fell from the hands of Frances, and
she endeavoured to raise her eyes to the face of
Dunwoodie, but they sunk abashed before his
eager
gaze.
What say you! said Peyton, with an
insinuating
voice; am I worthy of this confidence?
will you send me out against your brother this
night, to meet my own brother? or will it be the
officer of Congress in quest of the officer of
Britain
?
And would you do less of your duty, because
I am your wife, Major Dunwoodie? in what
degree
would it better the condition of Henry?
Henry, I repeat, is safe. The word of
Harper
is his guarantee; but I will show the world a
bridegroom, continued the youth, perhaps
deceiving
himself a little, Who is equal to the
duty
of arresting the brother of his bride.
And will the world comprehend it all? said
Frances, with a musing air that lighted a
thousand
hopes in the bosom of her lover. In fact,
the temptation was mightyindeed, there seemed
no other way to detain Dunwoodie until the
fatal
hour had elapsed. The words of Harper
himself
,
who had so lately told her that openly he
could do but little for Henry, and that every thing
depended upon the gaining of time, were deeply
engraved upon her memory. Perhaps there was
also a fleeting thought of the possibility of an
eternal
separation from her lover, should he proceed
and bring back her brother to punishment. It is
difficult at all times to analyze human emotions,
and they pass through the sensitive heart of a
woman with the rapidity and nearly with the
vividness
of lightning.
Why do I tarry, dear Frances, cried
Dunwoodie
,
who was studying her varying
countenance
with rapture; a few minutes might give
me a husband's claim to protect you.
The brain of Frances whirled. She turned an
anxious eye to the clock, and the hand seemed to
linger over its face, as if with intent to torture her.
Speak, my Frances, murmured Dunwoodie;
may I summon my good kinswomandetermine,
for time presses.
Frances endeavoured to reply, but could only
whisper something that was inaudible, but which
her lover, with the privilege of immemorial
custom
,
construed into assent. He turned and flew
to the door, when the maid recovered her voice
Stop, Peyton; I cannot enter into such a
solemn engagement with a fraud upon my
conscience
.
I have seen Henry since his escape, and
time is all important to him. Here is my hand;
it is now freely yours, if you will not reject it.
Reject it! cried the delighted youth; I
take it as the richest gift of heaven. There is
time enough for us all. Two hours will take me
through the hills, and by noon to-morrow, I will
return with Washington's pardon for your brother,
and Henry will help to enliven our nuptials.
Then, meet me here in ten minutes, said
Frances, greatly relieved by unburthening her
mind, and filled with the hope of securing Henry's
safety, and I will return and take those vows
which will bind me to you forever.
Dunwoodie paused only to press her once to
his bosom, and flew to communicate his wishes to
the priest.
Miss Peyton received the avowal of her niece,
with infinite astonishment and a little displeasure.
It was violating all the order and decorum of a
wedding to get it up so hastily, and with so little
ceremony. But Frances, with modest firmness,
declared that her resolution was takenshe had
long possessed the consent of her friends, and their
nuptials for months had only waited her pleasure.
She had now promised Dunwoodie, and it was her
wish to complymore she dare not say without
committing herself, by entering into explanations
that might endanger Birch, or Harper, or both.
Unused
to contention, and really much attached to
her kinsman, the feeble objections of Miss Peyton
gave way to the firmness of her niece. Mr.
Wharton
was too completely a convert to the doctrine
of passive obedience and non-resistance, to
withstand
any solicitation from an officer of
Dunwoodie's
influence in the rebel armies, and the
maid returned to the apartment, accompanied by
her father and aunt, at the expiration of the time
that she had fixed. Dunwoodie and the
clergyman
were already there. Frances silently, and
without the affectation of reserve, placed in his
hand the wedding ring of her own mother, and
after
some little time spent in arranging Mr.
Wharton
and herself, Miss Peyton suffered the
ceremony
to proceed.
The clock stood directly before the wandering
eyes of Frances, and she turned many an anxious
glance at the dialbut soon the solemn language
of the priest caught her attention, and her mind
became intent upon the vows she was uttering.
It was quickly over, and as the clergyman closed
the words of benediction, the clock told the hour
of nine. This was the time that Harper had
deemed so important, and Frances felt as if a
mighty load was at once removed from her
heart.
Dunwoodie folded her in his arms; saluted the
spinster again and again, and shook Mr. Wharton
and the divine repeatedly by the hands. In the
midst of this excess of rapture a tap was heard at
the door.It was opened, and Mason appeared
We are in the saddle, said the Lieutenant,
and with your permission will lead on; as you
are so well mounted, you can overtake us at your
leisure.
Yes, yesmy good fellowmarch, cried
Dunwoodie, gladly seizing an excuse to linger; I
will reach you at the first halt.
The subaltern retired to execute these orders,
and was followed by Mr. Wharton and the divine.
Now, Peyton, said Frances, it is indeed a
brother that you seek; I am sure I need not
caution you in his behalf, should you
unfortunately
find him.
Say fortunately, cried the youth; for I am
determined he shall yet dance at my wedding.
Would that I could win him to our causeit is the
cause of his country, and I could fight with more
pleasure, Frances, with your brother by my side.
Oh! mention it not! you awaken terrible
reflections
.
I will not mention it, returned her husband;
but I must now leave you. Tom Mason moved
off at a famous rate, and the fellow has no
orders
.---But
the sooner I go, Frances, the sooner I
will return.
The noise of a horseman was heard approaching
the house, with great speed, and Dunwoodie was
yet taking leave of his bride and her aunt, when an
officer was shown into the room by his own man.
The gentleman wore the dress of an
aid-de-camp
,
and the Major at once knew him to form
part of the family of Washington.
Major Dunwoodie, he said, after bowing
courteously to the ladies; the
Commander-in-Chief
has directed me to give you these orders.
He executed his mission, and pleading duty took
his leave immediately.
Here, indeed! cried the Major is an
unexpected
turn in the whole affair; but I understand it---
Harper has got my letter, and already we feel his
influence.
Have you news affecting Henry, cried
Frances
,
springing to his side.
Listenand you shall judge.
Sir
Upon receipt of this, you will
concentrate
your squadron, so as to be in front of the
enemy's
covering party to their foragers, by ten
o'clock to-morrow, on the heights of Croton;
where you will find a body of foot to support you.
The escape of the English spy has been reported
to me, but his arrest is unimportant, compared
with the duty I now give you. You will,
therefore
,
recal your men, if any are in pursuit, and
endeavour to defeat the enemy forthwith.
Your's Respectfully,
George Washington
.
There, thank God, cried Dunwoodie, my
hands are washed of Henry's re-capture; I can
now move to my duty with honour.
And with prudence too, dear Peyton, said
Frances, with a face as pale as death;
remember
,
Dunwoodie, you leave behind you new
claims upon your caution and care.
The youth dwelt on her lovely but pallid
features
with rapture, and as he pressed her hand to
his heart, exclaimed
But why this haste? I can reach Peekskill
before the troops have breakfasted, if I start some
hours hence. I am too old a soldier to be
hastened
or disconcerted.
Nay! go at once, said Frances, in a hurried
voice, with a face whose bright tints would have
shamed a ruddy mornneglect not the orders
of Washington.And oh! be prudentbe
careful
.
For your sake I will, lovely innocent, cried
her husband, folding her to his heart for the last
time. Frances sobbed a moment on his bosom,
and he tore himself from her presence.
Miss Peyton retired with her niece, to whom
she conceived it necessary, before they separated
for the night, to give an abundance of good advice
on the subject of matrimonial duty. Her lecture
was modestly received if not properly digested.
We regret that history has not handed down to us
this precious dissertation; but the result of all our
investigation has been to learn that it partook
largely of those peculiarities, which are said to
tincture the rules prescribed to govern bachelor's
children. We will leave them, and return to
Captain
Wharton and Harvey Birch.
CHAPTER XVI.
Allow him not a parting word;
Short be the shrift, and sure the cord!
Rokeby
.
The
pedlar and his companion soon reached the
valley, and after pausing to listen, and hearing no
sounds which announced that pursuers were
abroad, they entered the highway. Acquainted
with every step that led through the mountains,
and possessed of sinews inured to toil, Birch led
the way in silent activity, with the lengthened
strides that were peculiar to the man and his
profession
his
pack was alone wanting to finish the
appearance of his ordinary business air. At times
when they approached one of those little posts,
held by the American troops, with which the
highlands
abounded, he would take a circuit to avoid
the sentinels, and plunge at once fearlessly into a
thicket, or ascend a rugged hill, that to the eye
seemed impassable. But the pedlar was familiar
with every turn in their difficult route, knew where
the ravines might be penetrated, or where the
streams were fordable. In one or two instances,
Henry thought that their further progress was
absolutely
at an end, but the ingenuity or knowledge
of his guide conquered every difficulty. After
walking at an incredible rate for three hours, they
suddenly diverged from the road which inclined
to the east, and held their course directly across
VOL. II. 21
the hills in a due south direction. This movement
was made, the pedlar informed his companion, in
order to avoid the parties who constantly patroled
in the southern entrance of the highlands, as well
as to shorten the distance, by travelling in a
straight line. After reaching the summit of a very
considerable hill, Harvey seated himself by the
side of a little run, and opening the wallet, that
he had slung where his pack was commonly
suspended
,
invited his comrade to partake of the
coarse fare that it contained. Henry had kept pace
with the pedlar, more by the excitement natural
to his situation, than by the equality of his
physical
powers. The idea of any halt was unpleasant,
so long as there existed a possibility of the horse
getting below him in time to intercept their
retreat
through the neutral ground.He, therefore,
stated his apprehensions to his companion, and
urged
his wish to proceed.
Follow my example, Captain Wharton, said
the pedlar, commencing his frugal meal; if the
horse have started, it will be more than man can
do to head them; and if they have not, other work
is cut out for them, that will drive all thoughts of
you and me from their brains.
You said yourself, that two hours detention
was all important to us, and if we loiter here, of
what use will be the advantage that we may have
already obtained?
Them two hours are passed, and Major
Dunwoodie
thinks little of following two men, when
hundreds are waiting for him on the banks of the
river.
Listen! interrupted Henry; there are horse
at this moment passing at the foot of the hill. I
hear them even laughing and talking to each other.
By heavens! there is the voice of Dunwoodie
himself
,
and he calls to his comrade in a manner that
shows but little uneasiness. One would think that
the situation of his friend would lower his spirits:
surely, Frances could not have given him the
letter.
On hearing the first exclamation of the Captain,
Birch arose from his seat, and approached
cautiously
to the brow of the hill, taking care to keep
his body in the shade of the rocks, so as to be
unseen
at any distance, and earnestly reconnoitred the
passing group of horsemen. He continued
listening
,
until their quick footsteps were no longer
audible
,
and then quietly returned to his seat, and
with incomparable coolness resumed his meal.
You have a long walk, and a tiresome one
before
you, Captain Wharton; you had better do as
I doyou was eager for food at the hut above
Fishkill, but travelling seems to have worn down
your appetite.
I thought myself safe then, but the
information
of my sister fills me with uneasiness, and I
cannot eat.
You have less reason to be troubled now,
than at any time since the night before you was
taken, when you refused my advice and offer to
see you in safety, returned the pedlar. Major
Dunwoodie is not a man to laugh and be gay, when
his friend is in difficulty. Come, then, and eat, for
no horse will be in our way, if we can hold our
legs for four hours longer, and the sun keeps
behind
the hills as long as common.
There was a composure in the pedlar's manner
that inspirited the youth, and having once
determined
to submit to Harvey's government, he
suffered
himself to be persuaded into a tolerable
supper
,
if the quantity be considered without any
reference
to the quality. After completing their
repast
,
the pedlar again resumed his journey.
Henry followed in blind submission to his will.
For two hours more they struggled with the
difficult
and dangerous passes of the highlands,
without
road or any other guide than the moon, which
was travelling the heavens, now wading through
the flying clouds, and now shining upon objects
with a brilliancy, second only to her great source
of light. At length they arrived where the
mountains
sunk into rough and unequal hillocks, and
passed at once from the barren sterility of the
precipices, to the imperfect culture of the neutral
ground.
The pedlar now became more guarded in the
manner in which they proceeded, and took divers
precautions to prevent meeting any moving
parties
of the Americans. With their stationary posts
he was too familiar to endanger his falling upon
them unawares. He wound among the hills and
vales, now keeping the highways and now
avoiding
them, with a precision that seemed instinctive.
There was nothing elastic in his tread, but he
glided
over the ground with enormous strides, and a
body bent forward, without appearing to use
exertion
,
or know weariness.
The moon had set, and a faint streak of light
was beginning to show itself in the east. Captain
Wharton ventured to express a sense of fatigue,
and to inquire if they were not yet arrived at a part
of the country where it might be safe to apply at
some of the farm-houses for admission.
See here, said the pedlar, pointing to a hill
at a short distance in their rear; do you not see
a man walking on the point of that rock? Turn
more, so as to bring the daylight in the range
notice, now he moves, and seems to be looking
earnestly at something to the eastward. That is
a royal sentinel, and two hundred of the rig'lar
troops lay on that hill, no doubt sleeping on their
arms.
Then, cried Henry, let us join them, and
our danger is at once ended.
Softly, softlyCaptain Wharton, said the
pedlar, drily; you've once been in the midst of
three hundred of them, but there was a man who
could take you out; see you not yon dark body on the
side of the opposite hill, just above the corn-stalks?
These are thethe rebelswaiting only for day,
to see who will be the master of the ground.
Nay, then, exclaimed the fiery youth, I
will join the troops of my prince, and share their
fortunes, be it good or be it bad.
You forget that you fight with a halter around
your neckno, noI have promised one whom I
must not disappoint, to carry you safe in; and
unless
you forget what I have already done, and
what I have risked for you, Captain Wharton, you
will turn and follow me to Harlaem.
To this appeal, the youth felt unwillingly
obliged
to submit; and they continued their course
towards the city. It was not long before they
gained the banks of the Hudson. After
searching
for a short time under the shore, the pedlar
discovered a skiff, that, from his movements,
appeared to be an old acquaintance; and
entering
it with his companion, he landed him on
the south side of the Croton. Here Birch
declared
they were in safety; for the royal troops held
the continentals at bay, and the former were out
in too great strength for the light parties of the
latter to trust themselves below that river, on
the immediate banks of the Hudson, from a dread
of having their retreat cut off.
Throughout the whole of this arduous flight,
the pedlar had manifested a coolness and presence
of mind that nothing appeared to disturb. All
his faculties seemed to be of more than usual
perfection
,
and the infirmities of nature to have no
21*
dominion over him. Henry had followed him
like a child in leading-strings, and he now reaped
his reward, as he felt the bound of pleasure at
his heart, on hearing that he was relieved from
apprehension
,
and permitted to banish every doubt
of his security.
A steep and laborious ascent brought them from
the level of the tide-waters to the high lands, that
form, in this part of the river, the eastern banks of
the Hudson. Retiring a little from the highway,
under the shelter of a thicket of cedars, the
pedlar
threw his form on a flat rock, and announced
to his companion, that the hour for rest and
refreshment
was at length arrived. The day was
now opened, and objects could be seen in the
distance
with distinctness. Beneath them lay the
Hudson, stretching to the south in a straight line
as far as the eye could reach. To the north, the
broken fragments of the highlands threw upwards
their lofty heads, above the masses of fog that
hung over the water, and by which the course of
the river could be traced into the bosom of the
hills, whose conical summits were grouping
together
,
one behind another, in that disorder which
might be supposed to succeed their mighty but
fruitless efforts to stop the progress of the flood.
Emerging from these confused piles, the river, as if
rejoicing at its release from the struggle, expanded
into a wide bay, which was ornamented by a few
fertile and low points that jutted humbly into
its broad basin. On the opposite, or western shore,
the rocks of Jersey were gathered in an array
that has obtained for them the name of the
palisadoes
,
elevating themselves for many hundred
feet, as if to protect the rich country in their rear
from the inroads of the conqueror; but,
disdaining
such an enemy, the river swept proudly by
their feet, and held its undeviating way to the
ocean. A ray of the rising sun darted upon the
slight cloud that hung over the placid river, and
at once the whole scene was in motion, changing
and assuming new forms, and exhibiting fresh
objects
to the view in each successive moment. At
the daily rising of this great curtain of nature, at
the present time, scores of white sails and
sluggish
vessels are seen thickening on the water,
with that air of life which denotes the
neighbourhood
to the metropolis of a great and flourishing
empire; but to Henry and the pedlar it displayed
only the square yards and lofty masts of a vessel
of war, riding a few miles below them. Before the
fog had begun to move, the tall spars were seen
above it and from one of them a long
pendant
was feebly borne abroad in the current of
night air, that still quivered along the river;
but as the smoke arose, the black hull, the
crowded
and complicated mass of rigging, and the heavy
yards and booms, spreading their arms afar, were
successively brought into view.
There, Captain Wharton, said the pedlar,
there is a safe resting-place for youAmerica has
no arm that can reach you if once you gain the
deck of that ship. She is sent up to cover the
foragers, and support the troops; the rig'lar
officers
are over fond of the sound of cannon from
their shipping.
Without condescending to reply to the sarcasm
conveyed in this speech, or perhaps not noticing
it, Henry joyfully acquiesced in the proposal, and
it was accordingly arranged between them, that so
soon as they were refreshed he should endeavour
to get on board of the vessel.
While busily occupied in the very indispensable
operation of breaking their fast, our adventurers
were startled with the sound of distant fire arms.
At first a few scattering shots were fired, which
were succeeded by a long and animated roll of
musketry
,
and then quick and heavy volleys followed
each other.
Your prophecy is made good, cried the
English
officer, springing upon his feet. Our troops
and the rebels are at itI would give six months'
pay to see the charge.
Umph! returned his companion, without
ceasing his meal; they do very well to look at
from a distance; but I can't say but the company
of this bacon, cold as it is, is more to my taste just
now than a hot fire from the continentals.
The discharges are heavy for so small a force;
but the fire seems irregular.
The scattering guns are from the Connecticut
militia, said Harvey, raising his head to listen;
they rattle it off finely, and are no fools at a
mark. The volleys are the rig'lars, who, you
know, fire by wordas long as they can.
I like not the warmth of what you call a
scattering
fire, exclaimed the captain, moving about
from uneasiness; it is more like the roll of a drum
than the pop-gun shooting of skirmishers.
NonoI said not skrimmagers, returned
the other, raising himself upon his knees, and
ceasing to eat; so long as they'll stand, they are
too good for the best troops in the royal army.
Each man does his work as if fighting by the job;
and then they think, while they fight; and don't
send bullets among the clouds, that were meant to
kill men upon earth.
You talk and look, sir, as if you wished them
success, cried Henry sternly.
I wish success to the good cause only, Captain
Wharton, returned the pedlar, suddenly
changing
his air of exultation to an abstracted manner.
I thought you knew me too well, to be
uncertain
which party I favoured.
Oh! you are reputed loyal, Mr. Birch, said
the youth, with a little contempt;but, by
Heavens
!
the volleys have ceased!
They now both listened intently, for a little
while, during which the irregular reports became
less brisk, and suddenly heavy and repeated
volleys
followed.
They've been at the baggonet, said the
pedlar
;
the rig'lars have tried the baggonet, and
have drove the rebels.
Ay! Mr. Birch, the bayonet is the thing for
the British soldier, after all! shouted Henry
with exultation. They delight in the bayonet!
Well, to my notion, said the pedlar, there's
but little delight to be taken in any such pokerish
thing. But I dare say the militia are of my mind,
for half of them don't carry the ugly things.
Lord!lord!Captain, I wish you'd go with me
once into the rebel camp, and hear what lies the
men tell about Bunker Hill and Burg'yne; you'd
think they loved the baggonet as much as they
do their dinner.
There was an inward chuckle, and singular air
of affected innocency about his companion while
speaking, that rather annoyed Henry, and he
deigned no reply to his remarks.
The firing now became desultory, occasionally
intermingled with heavy volleys. Both of the
fugitives were standing, listening with much
anxiety
,
when a man, armed with a musket, was
seen stealing towards them under the shelter of
the cedar bushes that partially covered the hill.
Henry first noticed this suspiciously looking
stranger
,
and instantly pointed him out to his
companion
.
Birch started, and certainly made an
indication
of sudden flight; but recollecting himself,
he stood in sullen silence until the stranger was
within a few yards of them
'Tis friends, said the fellow, clubbing his gun,
but yet apparently afraid to venture nearer.
You had better be off, cried Birch, in a loud
voice, here's rig'lars enough at hand to take
care of you; we are not near Dunwoodie's horse
now, and you will not easily get me again.
Damn Major Dunwoodie and his horse, cried
the leader of the skinners, (for it was him) God
bless king George! and a speedy end to the
rebellion
,
say I. If you would just show me the safe
way in to the refugees, Mr. Birch, I'll pay you
well, and ever after stand your friend in the
bargain
.
The road is as open to you as to me,said Birch,
turning from him in ill-concealed disgust; if you
want to find the refugees, you know well where
they lay.
Ay, but I'm a little afeard of going in upon
them by myself; now you are well known to them
all, and it will be no detriment to you just to let
me go in with you.
Henry interfered, and after holding a short
dialogue
with the fellow, entered into a compact with
him, that on condition of surrendering his arms,
he might join their party. The man complied
instantly, and Birch received his gun with
eagerness
,
nor did he lay it upon his shoulder to renew
their march, before he had carefully examined
the priming, and ascertained to his satisfaction,
that it contained a good dry ball-cartridge.
As soon as this engagement was completed, they
commenced their journey anew. By following
the bank of the river, Birch led the way free from
observation, until they reached the point
opposite
to the frigate, when, by making a signal, a boat
was induced to approach. Some time was spent,
and much precaution used, before the seamen
would trust themselves ashore; but Henry having
finally succeeded in making the officer, who
commanded
the party, credit his assertions, he was
able to rejoin his companions in arms in safety.
Before taking leave of Birch, the Captain handed
him his purse, which was tolerably well supplied
for the times; the pedlar received it, and
watching
an opportunity, he conveyed it unnoticed by
the skinner, to a part of his dress that was
ingeniously
contrived to hold such treasures.
The boat pulled from the shore, and Birch
turned
on his heel, drawing a sigh of vast relief, and
shot up the hill with the enormous strides for
which he was famous. The skinner followed, and
each party pursued their common course, casting
frequent and suspicious glances at the other, but
both maintaining a most impenetrable silence.
Wagons were moving along the river road, and
occasional parties of horse were seen escorting
the fruits of their excursion towards the city.
As the pedlar had views of his own, he rather
avoided falling in with any of these patroles, than
sought their protection. But, after travelling for
a few miles on the immediate banks of the river,
during which, notwithstanding the repeated efforts
of the skinner to establish something like
sociability
,
he maintained a most determined silence,
keeping a firm hold of the gun, and a side glance
upon his associate, the pedlar suddenly struck into
the highway, with an intention of crossing the hills
towards Harlaem. At the moment that he gained
the path, a body of horse came over a little
eminence
,
and was upon him before he perceived them.
It was too late to retreat, and after taking a view
of the materials that composed this scouting party,
Birch rejoiced in the rencontre as a probable
means of relieving him from his unwelcome
companion
.
They were some eighteen or twenty
men, who were mounted and equipped as dragoons,
though neither their appearance nor manner
denoted
much of discipline. At their head rode a
heavy
middle aged man, whose features expressed as
much of animal passion and as little of reason as
could well be imagined. He wore the dress of an
officer, but there was none of that neatness in his
attire, nor grace in his movements, that was usually
found about the gentlemen who bore the royal
commission. His limbs were firm, but not pliable,
and he sat his horse with strength and confidence,
but his bridle hand would have been ridiculed by
the meanest rider in the Virginia regiment. As he
expected, this leader instantly hailed the pedlar, in
a voice by no means more conciliating than his
appearance
.
Hoy! my gentlemnwhich way so fast?
he cried. Has Washington sent you down as
spies?
I am an innocent pedlar, returned Harvey,
meekly, and am going below to lay in a fresh
stock.
And how do you expect to get below, my
innocent
pedlar? Do you think we hold the forts at
Kingsbridge to cover such peddling rascals as you,
in your goings in and comings out?
I believe I hold a pass that will carry me
through, said the pedlar, handing him a paper,
with an air of consummate indifference.
The officer, for such he was, read it, and gave a
look of extraordinary intelligence for the man, at
Harvey, when he had done.
Then turning fiercely to one or two of his men
who had officiously passed on and stopped the
way, he cried
Why do you stop the mangive way and let
him pass in peace; but who have we here? your
name is not on the paper.
No, sir, said the skinner, lifting his hat with
humility; I have been a poor deluded man who
has been serving in the rebel army, but thank God,
I've lived to see the error of my ways, and am
now come to make reparation by enlisting under
the Lord's anointed.
Umph! a desertera skinner, I'll swear,
wanting to turn cow-boy. In the last brush I had
with the scoundrels, I could hardly tell my own
men from the enemy. We are not over well
supplied
with coats, and as for the faces, the rascals
change sides so often, that you may as well count
their faces for nothing; but trudge on, we will
contrive
to expend you before long.
Ungracious as was this reception, if one could
judge of the skinner's feelings from his manner,
it nevertheless delighted him hugely. He moved
with alacrity towards the city, and really was so
happy to escape the brutal looks and frightful
manner
of his interrogator, as to lose sight of all other
considerations. But the man who performed the
functions of orderly in the irregular troop, rode up
to the side of his commander, and entered into a
close and apparently confidential discourse with
his principal. They spoke in whispers, and cast
frequent and searching glances at the skinner, until
the fellow began to think himself an object of more
than common attention. His satisfaction at this
distinction was somewhat heightened, at observing
a smile on the face of the Captain, which, although
it might be thought grim, certainly denoted much
inward delight. This pantomime occupied the
time they were passing a hollow, and concluded
as they rose another hill. Here the captain and
his sergeant both dismounted, and ordered the
party to halt. The warriors each took a pistol
from their holsters, a movement that excited no
suspicion
or alarm, as it was a precaution always
observed
,
Vol. II. 22
and beckoned to the pedlar and the
skinner
to follow. A short walk brought them to
where the hill overhung the river, the ground
falling nearly perpendicularly to the shore. On
the brow of the eminence stood a deserted and
dilapidated
building, that had been a barn. Many
of the boards that had formed its covering were
torn from their places, and its wide doors were
lying the one in front of the building and the other
half way down the precipice, whither the wind had
cast it. Entering this desolate spot, the refugee
officer very coolly took from his pocket a short
pipe, whose colour might once have been white,
but which now, from long use, had acquired not
only the hue but the gloss of ebony, a tobacco
box, and a small roll of leather that contained
steel, flint and tinder. With this apparatus, he
soon furnished his mouth with a companion that
habit had long rendered necessary to
extraordinary
reflection in its owner. So soon as a large
column
of smoke arose from this arrangement, the
Captain significantly held forth his hand towards
his assistant. A small cord was produced from
the pocket of the sergeant, and handed to the
other. Now, indeed, appeared a moment of deep
care in the refugee, who threw out vast puffs of
smoke until nearly all of his head was obscured, and
looked around the building with an anxious and
inquisitive
eye. At length he removed the pipe,
and inhaled a draught of pure air, returned it to
its domicile, and proceeded to business at once.
There was a heavy piece of timber laid across the
girths of the barn, but a little way from the
southern
door, which opened directly upon a full view
of the river as it stretched far away towards the
bay of New-York. Over this timber, the refugee
threw one end of the rope, and regaining it, joined
the two parts in his hand. A small and weak
barrel
that wanted a head, the staves of which
were loose and at one end standing apart, was left
on the floor probably as useless to the owner.
This was brought by the sergeant in obedience to
a look from his officer, and placed beneath the
beam. All of these arrangements were made with
immoveable composure, and now seemed
completed
to the officer's perfect satisfaction.
Come, he said coolly to the skinner, who,
amazed with the preparations, had stood both
a close and silent spectator of their progress. He
obeyedand it was not until he found his
neck-cloth
removed, and hat thrown aside, that he took
the alarm. But he had so often resorted to a
similar
expedient to extract information or plunder,
that he by no means felt the terror an unpractised
man would have suffered, at these ominous
movements
.
The rope was adjusted to his neck with
the same coolness that formed the characteristic
of the whole movement, and a fragment of board
being laid upon the barrel, he was ordered to
mount it.
But it may fall, said the skinner, for the first
time beginning to tremble. I will tell you any
thing,even how to surprise our party at the
Pond, without this trouble; and that is commanded
by my own brother.
I want no information, returned his
executioner
,
(for such he now seemed really to be,) as
he threw the rope repeatedly over the beam, first
drawing it tight, so as to annoy the skinner a
little
,
and then casting the end from him, far beyond
the reach of any one.
This is joking too far, cried the skinner, in
a tone of remonstrance, and raising himself on his
toes, with the vain hope of releasing himself from
the cord by slipping his head through the noose
But the caution and experience of the refugee
had guarded against this escape.
What did you with the horse you stole from
me, rascal? he cried, throwing out extraordinary
columns of smoke, as he waited for a reply.
He broke down in the chase, replied the
skinner quickly; but I can tell you where one is
to be found, that is worth him and his sire.
Liar! I will help myself when I want one
but you had better call upon God for aid, as your
hour is short. On concluding this consoling
advice
,
he struck the barrel a violent blow with his
heavy foot, and the slender staves flew in every
direction, leaving the skinner whirling in the air.
As his hands were unconfined, he threw them
upwards
,
and held himself suspended by main
strength.
Come, captain, he said coaxingly, a little
huskiness creeping into his voice, and his knees
beginning to shake with a slight tremor, just
end the joke'tis enough to make a laugh, and
my arms begin to tireindeed I can't hold on
much longer.
Harkee, Mr. Pedlar, said the refugee, in a
voice that would not be denied, I want not your
company. Through that door lies your road
march!offer to touch that dog, and you'll swing
in his place, if twenty Sir Henrys wanted your
services. So saying, he retired to the road with
the sergeant, as the pedlar precipitately retreated
down the bank.
Birch went no farther than a bush that
opportunely
offered itself as a skreen to conceal his
person, while he yielded to an unconquerable
desire
,
to witness what would be the termination of
this extraordinary scene.
Left thus alone, the skinner began to throw
fearful glances around, to espy the hiding places
of his tormentors. For the first time, the horrid
idea seemed to shoot through his brain, that
something serious was intended by the Cow-Boy.
He called entreatingly to be released, and made
rapid and incoherent promises of important
information
,
mingled with affected pleasantry at their
conceit, which he could hardly admit to himself
could mean any thing so dreadful as it seemed.
But as he heard the tread of the horses moving on
their course, and in vain looked around for human
aid, violent tremblings seized his limbs, and his
eyes began to start from his head with terror.
He made a desperate effort to reach the beam,
but too much exhausted with his previous
exertions
he caught the rope in his teeth, in a vain
effort to sever the cord, and fell to the whole
length of his arms.Here his cries were turned
into shrieks
Helpcut the ropeCaptain!Birch!good
pedlardown with the Congress!sergeant!for
God's sake helpHurrah for the King!Oh God!
Oh God!mercymercymercy
As his voice became suppressed, one of his
hands endeavoured to make its way between the
rope and his neck, and partially succeeded, but
the other fell quivering by his side. A convulsive
shuddering passed over his whole frame, and he
hung a hideous livid corse.
Birch continued gazing on this scene with a
kind of infatuation, and at its close he placed his
hands to his ears, rushing towards the highway;
but still the cries for mercy rung through his brain,
and it was many weeks before his memory ceased
to dwell on the horrid event. The Cow-boys
rode steadily on their route, as if nothing had
occurred
,
and the body was left swinging in the
wind, until chance directed the footsteps of some
straggler to the place.
22*
CHAPTER XVII.
Green be the turf above thee,
Friend of my better days
None knew thee but to love thee,
Nor nam'd thee but to praise.
Halleck
.
While
the scenes and events that we have
recorded
,
were occurring, Captain Lawton led his
small party, by slow and wary marches, from the
four-corners to the front of a body of the enemy,
where he so successfully manuvred for a short
time as completely to elude all their efforts to
entrap
him, and yet so to disguise his own force, as to
excite the constant apprehension of an attack from
the Americans. This forbearing policy on the
side of the partisan, was owing to orders that he
had received from his commander. When
Dunwoodie
left his detachment, the enemy were known
to be slowly advancing, and he directed Lawton
to hover around them until his own return, and the
arrival of a body of foot, which might aid in
intercepting
their retreat.
The trooper discharged his duty to the letter,
but with no little of the impatience that made part
of his character, when restrained from the attack.
During these movements, Betty Flanagan guided
her little cart with indefatigable zeal among the
rocks of West-Chester, now discussing with the
sergeant the nature of evil spirits and the quality
of her own, and now combatting with the surgeon
sundry points of practice that were hourly arising
under their opposite opinions upon the subject of
stimulus. But the moment at length arrived that
was to terminate their controversies, and decide
the mastery of the field. A detachment of the
eastern militia moved out from their fastnesses,
and approached the enemy.
The junction between Lawton and his
auxiliaries
,
was made at midnight, and an immediate
consultation
was held between him and the leader of
the foot soldiers. After listening to the statements
of the partisan, who rather despised the prowess
of his enemy, the commandant of the party
determined
to attack the British, the moment that
daylight
enabled him to reconnoitre their position,
without waiting for the aid of Dunwoodie and his
horse. So soon as this decision was made,
Lawton
retired from the building where the
consultation
was held, and rejoined his own small
command
.
The few troopers who were with the Captain,
had fastened their horses in a spot adjacent to a
hay-stack, and laid their own frames under its
shelter to catch a few hours sleep. But Dr.
Sitgreaves
,
Sergeant Hollister, and Betty Flanagan,
were congregated at a short distance by
themselves
,
having spread a few blankets upon the dry
surface of a rock. Lawton threw his huge frame
by the side of the surgeon, and folding his cloak
around him, leaned his head upon one hand, and
appeared deeply engaged in contemplating the
moon as it waded majestically through the heavens.
The sergeant was sitting upright in respectful
deference
to the conversation that the operator was
kindly dispensing, and the washerwoman was now
raising her head in order to vindicate some of her
favourite maxims, and now composing it on one of
her gin casks, in a vain effort to sleep.
So, sergeant, continued the operator, after
pausing a moment while Lawton took the position
which we have described, if you cut upwards,
the blow, by losing the additional momentum of
your weight, will be less destructive, and at the
same time effect the true purposes of war, that
of disabling your enemy.
Pooh! pooh! sargeant, dear, said the
washerwoman
,
raising her head from her blanket;
where's the harm of taking a life jist in the way
of battle? Is it the rig'lars who'll show favour,
and they fighting? Ask Captain Jack, there, if
the country could get the liberty, and the boys
no strike their mightPooh! I wouldn't have
them disparage the whiskey so much.
It is not to be expected, that an ignorant
female
like yourself, Mrs. Flannagan, returned
the operator, with ineffable disdain, can
comprehend
the distinctions of surgical science;
neither
are you accomplished in the sword exercise;
so that dissertations upon the judicious use of that
weapon could avail you nothing, either in theory
or practice.
It's but little I care, any way, for sich
botherments
,
said Betty, sinking her head under her
blanket again; but fighting is no play, and a
body should'nt be partic'lar how they strike, or
who they hit, so it's the inimy.
Are we likely to have a warm day, Captain
Lawton? said the surgeon, turning from the
washerwoman with vast contempt.
'Tis more than probable, replied the trooper
in a voice that startled his companion; these
militia seldom fail of making a bloody field, either
by their cowardice or their ignorance. And the
real soldier is made to suffer for their bad
conduct
.
Are you ill, John? said the surgeon, passing
his hand along the arm of the captain, until it
instinctively
settled on his pulse; but the steady,
even beat announced neither bodily nor mental
malady.
Sick at heart, Archibald, at the folly of our
rulers, in believing that battles are to be fought,
and victories won, by fellows, who handle a
musket
as they would a flaillads who wink when
they pull a trigger, and form a line like a hoop
pole. It is the dependance we place on these
men that spills the best blood of the country.
The surgeon listened to his philippic with
amazement. It was not the matter but the
manner
that surprised him. The trooper had
uniformly
exhibited on the eve of battle, an animation
and eagerness to engage, that was directly at
variance
with the admirable coolness of his manner
at other times. But now there was a despondency
in the tones of his voice, and a listlessness in his
air, that was entirely different. The operator
hesitated
a moment to reflect in what manner he
could render this change of service, in furthering
his favorite system, and then continued
It would be wise, John, to advise the Colonel
to keep at long shota spent ball will disable
No! exclaimed the trooper impatiently; let
the rascals singe their whiskers at the muzzles of
the British musketsif they can be driven there;
but enough of them. Archibald, do you deem
that moon to be a world like this, and containing
creatures like ourselves?
Nothing more probable, dear Johnwe know
its size, and reasoning from analogy, may easily
conjecture its use. Whether or not its inhabitants
have attained that perfection in the sciences which
we have acquired, must depend greatly on the
state of its society, and in some measure, upon its
physical influences.
I care nothing about their learning, Archibald;
but, 'tis a wonderful power that can create such
worlds, and controul them in their wanderings. I
know not why, but there is a feeling of
melancholy
excited within me, as I gaze on that body of
light, shaded as it is by your fancied sea and land.
It seems to be the resting-place of departed
spirits
!
Take a drop, darling, said Betty, raising her
head once more, and proffering her own bottle;
'tis the night damps that chills the bloodand
then the talk with the cursed militia is no good for
a fiery temper; take a drop darling, and yee'll
sleep 'till the morning. I fed Roanoke myself,
for I thought yee might need hard riding the
morrow
.
'Tis a glorious heaven to look upon,
continued
the trooper, in the same tone, and utterly
disregarding the offer of Betty; and 'tis a
thousand
pities, that such worms as men, should let
their vile passions deface such goodly work.
You speak the truth, dear John; there is room
for all to live and enjoy themselves in peace, if
each could be satisfied with his own. Still war has
its advantagesit particularly promotes the
knowledge
of surgeryand
There is a star, continued Lawton, still bent
on his own ideas, struggling to glitter through a
few driving clouds; perhaps that too is a world,
and contains creatures endowed with reason like
ourselves; think you, that they know of war and
bloodshed?
If I might be so bold, said sergeant
Hollister
,
mechanically raising his hand to his cap, 'tis
mentioned in the good book, that the Lord made
the sun to stand still, while Joshua was charging
the enemy, in order do you see, sir, as I suppose,
that they might have day-light to turn their flank,
or perhaps make a feint in the rear, or some such
matter. Now, if the Lord would lend them a hand,
fighting cannot be sinful. I have often been
non-plushed
though, to find that they used them
chariots
instead of heavy dragoons, who are in all
comparison
,
better to break a line of infantry, and
who, for the matter of that, could turn such wheel
carriages, and getting in the rear, play the very
devil with them, horses, and all.
It is because you do not understand the
construction
of those vehicles for war, sergeant
Hollister
,
that you judge of them so erroneously,
said the surgeon. They were armed with sharp
weapons that protruded from their wheels, and
which broke the columns of foot like the
dismembered
particles of matter. I doubt not, if similar
instruments were affixed to the cart of Mrs.
Flanagan
,
that great confusion might be carried into
the ranks of the enemy thereby, this very day.
It's but little that the mare would go, and the
rig'lars firing at her, grumbled Betty from under
her blanket; when we got the plunder, the time
we drove them through the Jarseys, it was I had
to back the baste up to the dead, for divil the foot
would she move, forenent the firing, wid her eyes
open. Roanoke and Captain Jack are good enough
for the red coats, letting alone myself and the
mare.
A long roll of the drums, from the hill occupied
by the British, announced that they were on the
alert, and a corresponding signal was immediately
heard from the Americans. The bugle of the
Virginians struck up its martial tones, and in a few
moments, both the hills, the one held by the royal
troops, and the other by their enemies, were alive
with armed men. Day had begun to dawn, and
preparations were making by either party, to give
and to receive the attack. In numbers the
Americans
had greatly the advantage, but in discipline
and equipments, the superiority was entirely with
their enemies. The arrangements for the battle
were brief, and by the time that the sun had risen,
the militia moved forward to the attack.
The ground did not admit of the movements of
the horse, and the only duty that could be
assigned
to the dragoons, was to watch the moment of
victory, and endeavour to improve the success to
the utmost. Lawton soon got his warriors into
the saddle, and leaving them to the charge of
Hollister
,
he rode himself along the line of foot, who in
varied dresses and imperfectly armed, were formed
in a shape that in some degree resembled a martial
array. A scornful smile lowered around the lip
of the trooper, as he guided Roanoke with a
skilful
hand through the windings of their ranks, and
as the word was given to march, he turned the
flank of the regiment, and followed close in the
rear. The Americans had to descend into a little
hollow, and rise a hill on its opposite side to
approach
the enemy. The descent was made with
tolerable steadiness, until near the foot of the hill,
when the royal troops advanced in a beautiful line,
with their flanks protected by the formation of the
ground. The appearance of the British drew a
fire from the militia, which was given with good
effect, and for a moment staggered the regulars.
But they were rallied by their officers, and threw
in volley after volley, with great steadiness. For
a short time the firing was warm and destructive,
until the English advanced with the bayonet. This
assault the militia had not sufficient discipline to
withstand. Their line wavered, then paused, and
finally broke into companies, and fragments of
companies, keeping up at the same time a
scattering
and desultory fire.
Lawton witnessed these operations in silence,
nor opened his mouth to speak, until the field was
covered with parties of the flying Americans.
Then, indeed, he seemed stung with the disgrace
that was thus heaped upon the arms of his country.
Spurring Roanoke along the side of the hill, he
called to the fugitives in all the strength of his
powerful voice. He pointed to the enemy, and
assured his countrymen that they had mistaken the
way. There was such a mixture of indifference
and irony in his exhortations, that a few paused
in surprisemore joined them, until roused by
the example of the trooper, and stimulated by
their own spirits, they demanded to be led against
their foe once more.
Come on then, my brave friends! shouted
the trooper, turning his horse's head towards the
British line, one flank of which was very near him;
come on, and hold your fire until it will scorch
their eye-brows.
The men sprang forward, and followed his
example
,
neither giving nor receiving a fire, until
they had reached to within a very short distance
of the enemy. An English sergeant, who had been
concealed by a rock, enraged with the audacity of
the officer who thus dared their arms, stept from
behind his cover, and advancing within a few yards
of the trooper levelled his musket
Fire, and you die, cried Lawton, spurring
his charger, who sprung forward at the instant.
The action and the tone of his voice shook the
nerves of the Englishman, who drew his trigger
with an uncertain aim. Roanoke sprang with all
his feet from the earth, and, plunging, fell headlong
and lifeless at the feet of his destroyer. Lawton
kept his feet, and stood face to face with his
enemy
,
who presented his bayonet, and made a
desperate
thrust at the trooper's heart. The steel of
VOL. II. 23
their weapons emitted sparks of fire, and the
bayonet
flew fifty feet in the air. At the next
moment
its owner lay a quivering corpse.
Come on, shouted the trooper, as a body of
English appeared on the rock and threw in a steady
fire; come on, he repeated, and brandished
his sabre fiercely. His gigantic form fell
backward
like a majestic pine that was yielding to the
axe, but still, as he slowly fell, he continued to wield
his sabre, and once more the deep tones of his
voice uttered, come on.
The advancing Americans paused aghast, as they
witnessed the fate of their new leader, and then
turning, they left to the royal troops the victory.
It was neither the intention nor the policy of
the English commander to pursue his success, as
he well knew that strong parties of the Americans
would soon arrive; accordingly, he only tarried to
collect his wounded, and forming into a square, he
commenced his retreat towards their shipping.
Within twenty minutes of the fall of Lawton, the
ground was deserted by both English and
Americans
.
When the inhabitants of the country were
called
upon to enter the field, they were necessarily
attended by such surgical advisers, as were
furnished
by the low state of the profession in the
interior
,
at that day. Dr. Sitgreaves entertained quite
as profound a contempt for the medical attendants
of the militia, as the Captain did of the troops
themselves. He wandered therefore, around the
field, casting many an expressive glance of
disapprobation
at the slight operations that came under
his eye; but, when among the flying troops, he
found that his comrade and friend was no where
to be seen, he hastened back to the spot at which
Hollister was posted, to inquire if the trooper was
returned. Of course, the answer he received was
in the negative. Filled with a thousand uneasy
conjectures, the surgeon, without regarding, or
indeed
without at all reflecting, upon any dangers
that might lie in his way, strode over the ground
at an enormous rate, to the point where he knew
had been the final struggle. Once before, the
surgeon
had rescued his friend from death, in a
similar
situation, as he supposed, and he felt a secret
joy in his own conscious skill, as he perceived
Betty Flanagan seated on the ground, holding in
her lap the head of a man, whose size and dress
he knew belonged only to the trooper. As he
approached
the spot, the surgeon became alarmed
at the aspect of the washerwoman. Her little
black bonnet was thrown aside, and her hair,
which was already streaked with gray, hung around
her face in disorder.
John! dear John, said the Doctor tenderly,
as he bent and laid his hand upon the senseless
wrist of the trooper, from which it recoiled with
an intuitive knowledge of his fate, John! dear
John, where are you hurt?can I help you?
Yee talk to the senseless clay, said Betty,
rocking her body, and unconsciously playing with
the raven ringlets of the trooper's hair; it's no
more will he hear, and it's but little will he mind
yee'r probes and yee'r med'cines. Och! hone
och! honeand where will be the liberty now? or
who will there be to fight the battles, or gain the
day?
John! repeated the surgeon, still unwilling
to believe the evidence of his unerring senses;
dear John, speak to mesay what you will, that
you do but speak. Oh! God! exclaimed the
surgeon, giving way to his emotions, he is dead;
would that I had died with him!
There is but little use in living and fighting
now, said Betty; both him and the baste!
see, there is the poor animal, and here is his
master
.
I fed the horse with my own hands the day;
and the last male that he ate, was of my own
cooking. Och! honeoch! honethat Captain
Jack should live to be killed by the rig'lars!
John!my dear John! said the surgeon,
with convulsive sobs, thy hour has come, and
many a more prudent man survives theebut
none better, nor braver. Oh! John, thou wert
to me a kind friend, and very dear; it is
unphilosophical
to grievebut for thee, John, I must
weep, even in bitterness of heart!
The Doctor buried his face in his hands, and
for several minutes sat yielding to an ungovernable
burst of sorrow; while the washerwoman gave vent
to her grief in wordsmoving her body in a kind
of writhing, and playing with different parts of her
favorite's dress with her fingers.
And who'll there be to incourage the boys
now? she said; oh! Captain Jack!Captain
Jack! yee was the sowl of the troop, and it
was but little we know'd of the danger, and yee
fighting. Och! he was no maly mouth'd, that
quarrelled wid a widowed woman for the matter
of a burn in the mate, or the want of a breakfast.
Taste a drop, darling, and it may be, 'twill revive
yee. Och! and he'll nivir taste aginhere's
the Doctor, honey, him yee used to blarney wid,
wapeing as if the poor sowl would die for yee.
Och! he's gonehe's gone, and the liberty is
gone wid him.
A heavy and thundering sound of horses' feet
came rolling along the road which led near the
place where Lawton lay, and directly the whole
body of Virginians appeared, with Dunwoodie at
their head. The news of his Captain's fate had
reached him; for the instant that he noticed the
body, he halted the squadron, and dismounting,
approached the spot. The countenance of
Lawton
was not in the least distorted, but the angry
frown which had lowered over his brow, during
the battle, was fixed even in death. His frame
was composed, and stretched as if in sleep.
Dunwoodie
took hold of his hand, and gazed a
moment
in silence;his own dark eye began to flash,
and the paleness which had overspread his
features
,
was succeeded by a spot of deep red in
either
cheek.
With his own sword will I avenge him! he
cried, endeavouring to take the weapon from the
hand of Lawtonbut the grasp resisted his utmost
strength. It shall be buried with him:
Sitgreaves
,
take care of our friend, while I revenge
his death.
The Major hastened back to his charger, and
led the way in pursuit of the enemy.
While Dunwoodie had been thus engaged, the
body of Lawton lay in open view to the whole
squadron. He was an universal favourite, and the
sight inflamed the men to the utmost: neither
officers
nor soldiers possessed that coolness which
is necessary to ensure success to military
operations
,
but they spurred ardently after their
enemies
,
burning with a single wish for vengeance.
The English were formed in a hollow square,
which contained their wounded, who were far from
numerous, and were marching steadily across a
very uneven country, as the dragoons approached.
The horse charged in column, and were led by
Dunwoodie, who, burning with revenge, thought
to ride through their ranks, and scatter them at a
blow; but the enemy knew their own safety too
well, and standing firm, received the charge on
the points of their bayonets. The horse of the
Virginians recoiled, and the rear rank of the foot
throwing in a close fire, the Major, with a few of
23*
his men fell. The English continued their retreat
the moment they were extricated from their
assailants
;
and Dunwoodie, who was severely, but
not dangerously wounded, recalled his men from
further attempts, which in that stony country must
necessarily be fruitless.
A sad duty remained to be fulfilled:the
dragoons
retired slowly through the hills, conveying
their wounded commander, and the body of
Lawton
.
The latter they interred under the ramparts
of one of the highland forts, and the former they
consigned to the tender care of his afflicted bride.
Many weeks were gone, before the Major was
restored to sufficient strength to be removed;
during
those weeks, how often did he bless the
moment
that gave him a right to the services of his
beautiful nurse! She hung around his couch with
fond attention; administered with her own hands
every prescription of the indefatigable Sitgreaves;
and grew each hour in the affections and esteem
of her husband. An order from Washington soon
sent the troops into winter quarters, and
permission
was given to Dunwoodie to repair to his own
plantation, with the rank of Lieut. Col. in order
to complete the restoration of his health. Captain
Singleton made one of the party; and the whole
family retired from the active scenes of the war,
to the ease and plenty of the Major's own estate.
Before leaving Fishkill, however, letters were
conveyed
to them through an unknown hand,
acquainting
them with Henry's safety and good
health; and also that Colonel Wellmere had left
the continent for his native island, lowered in the
estimation of every honest man in the royal army.
It was a happy winter for Dunwoodie, and smiles
once more began to play around the lovely mouth
of Frances.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Midst furs, and silks, and jewels sheen,
He stood, in simple Lincoln green,
The centre of the glittering ring;
And Snowdown's knight is Scotland's King!
Lady of the Lake
.
The commencement of the following year was
passed on the part of the Americans in making
great preparations, in conjunction with their
allies
,
to bring the war to a close. In the south,
Greene and Rawdon made a bloody campaign,
that was highly honorable to the troops of the
latter
,
and which, by terminating entirely to the
advantage
of the former, proved him to be the
better
General of the two.
New York was the point that was threatened
by the allied armies, and Washington, by exciting
a constant apprehension for the safety of that city,
prevented such reinforcements from being sent
to Cornwallis, as would have enabled him to
improve
his success.
At length as autumn approached, every
indication
was given that the final moment had arrived.
The French forces drew near to the Royal lines,
passing through the Neutral Ground, and
threatened
an attack in the direction of Kings-bridge,
while large bodies of the Americans were acting
in concert, by hovering round the British posts,
and also drawing nigh in the Jerseys, seemed to
threaten the royal forces from that quarter also.
The preparations partook both of the nature of a
siege and a storm. But Sir Henry Clinton, in the
possession of intercepted letters from Washington,
rested securely within his lines, and cautiously
disregarded the solicitations of Cornwallis for
succour
.
It was at the close of a fine day in the month of
September, that a large assemblage of officers
were collected near the door of a building, that
was situated in the heart of the American troops,
who held the Jerseys. The age, the dress, and
the dignity of deportment, of most of these
warriors
,
indicated them to be of high rank; but to
one in particular was paid a deference and
obedience
,
that announced him to be of the highest.
His dress was plain, but bore the usual military
distinctions of command. He was mounted on a
noble animal of a deep bay, and a groupe of young
men, in gayer attire, evidently awaited his
pleasure
,
and did his bidding. Many a hat was lifted,
as its owner addressed this officer, and when he
spoke, a profound attention, exceeding the
respect
of mere professional etiquette, was exhibited
on every countenance. At length the General
raised his own hat, and bowed gravely to all around
him. The salute was returned, and the party
dispersed
,
leaving the officer without a single
attendant
,
except his body servants and one
aid-de-camp
.
Dismounting, he stepped back a few paces,
and for a moment, viewed the condition of his
horse with the eye of one who well understood the
animal, and then casting a brief but expressive
glance at his aid, he retired into the building,
followed
by that gentleman.
On entering an apartment that was apparently
fitted for his reception, he took a seat, and
continued
for a long time in a thoughtful attitude, as
one who was in the habit of communing much
with himself. During this silence, the
aid-de-camp
sat in respectful expectation of his orders.
At length the General raised his eyes, and spoke in
the low placid tones that seemed natural to him.
Has the man whom I wished to see arrived,
sir?
He waits the pleasure of your excellency.
I will receive him here, and alone, if you
please.
The aid bowed and withdrew. In a few minutes
the door again opened, and a figure glided into the
apartment, and stood modestly at a distance from
the General, without speaking. His entrance
was unheard by the officer, who sat gazing in the
fire, deeply absorbed in his own meditations.
Several minutes passed, when he spoke to himself
in an under tone
To-morrow we must raise the curtain, and
expose our plans. May heaven prosper them.
A slight movement made by the stranger at the
sound of his voice, caught his ear, and he turned
his head and saw that he was not alone. He
pointed silently to the fire, towards which the
figure advanced, although the multitude of his
garments, which seemed more calculated for
disguise
than comfort, rendered its warmth
unnecessary
a
second mild and courteous gesture
motioned
to a vacant chair, but the stranger refused
it with a modest acknowledgmentanother pause
followed, and continued for some time; at length
the officer arose and opening a desk that was laid
upon the table near which he sat, took from it a
small and apparently heavy bag.
Harvey Birch, he said, turning to the
stranger
,
the time has arrived when our connexion
must cease; henceforth and forever we must be
strangers.
The pedlar dropped the folds of the great coat
that concealed his features, and gazed for a
moment
wildly at the face of the speaker, and then
dropping his head upon his bosom, said meekly
If it is your excellency's pleasure.
It is necessarysince I have filled the station
which I now hold, it has become my duty to know
many men, who, like yourself, have been my
instruments
in procuring intelligenceyou have I
trusted more than all; I early saw in you a
regard
to truth and principle that, I am pleased to
say, has never deceived meyou alone know my
secret agents in the city, and on your fidelity
depends
,
not only their fortunes, but their lives.
He paused, as if to reflect, in order that full
justice might be done to the pedlar, and then
continued
I believe you are one of the very few that I
have employed, who have acted faithfully to our
cause; and while you have passed as a spy of the
enemy's, have never given intelligence that you
were not permitted to divulge; to me, and to me
only of all the world, you seem to have acted
with a strong
attachment
to the liberties of
America
.
During this address, Harvey had gradually
raised
his head from his bosom, until it reached the
highest point of elevation; a faint tinge gathered
in his cheeks, and as the officer concluded, it was
diffused over his whole countenance in a deep
glow, and he stood proudly swelling with his
emotions
,
but with eyes that humbly sought the feet
of the speaker.
It is now my duty to pay you for your
services
hitherto
you have postponed receiving
your reward, and the debt has become a heavy
oneI wish not to undervalue your dangers;
here are an hundred joesyou will remember the
poverty of our country, and attribute to it the
smallness of your pay.
The pedlar raised his eyes to the countenance
of the speaker with amazement, and as the other
held forth the money, he moved back as if from
contagion.
It is not much for your services and risks, I
acknowledge, said the general, but it is all that
I have to offer; at the end of the campaign, it may
be in my power to increase it.
Never! said Birch, speaking out; was it
for money that I did all this?
If not for money, what then?
What has brought your excellency into the
field? For what do you daily and hourly expose
your precious life to battle and the halter? What
is there about me to mourn, when such men as
your excellency risk their all for our country? No
nononot a dollar of your gold will I touch;
poor America has need of if all!
The bag dropped from the hand of the officer,
and fell at the feet of the pedlar, where it lay
neglected
during the remainder of their interview.
The officer looked steadily at the face of his
companion
,
and continued
There are many motives which might govern
me, that to you are unknown. Our situations are
different; I am known as the leader of armies
but you must descend into the grave with the
reputation
of a foe to your native land.
Remember
,
that the veil which conceals your true
character
cannot be raised in yearsperhaps never.
Birch again lowered his face, but there was no
yielding of the soul betrayed in the movement.
You will soon be old; the prime of your days
is already past; what have you to subsist on?
These! said the pedlar, stretching forth his
hands, that were already embrowned with toil.
But those may fail you; take enough to
secure
a support to your age. Remember your
risks and cares. I have told you, that the
characters
of men, who are much esteemed in life,
depend
upon your secrecy; what pledge can I give
them of your fidelity?
Tell them, said Birch, advancing, and
unconsciously
resting one foot on the bag, tell them
that I would not take the gold.
The composed features of the officer relaxed
into a fine smile of benevolence, and he grasped
the hand of the pedlar firmly.
Now, indeed, I know you; and although the
same reasons which have hitherto compelled me
to expose your valuable life, will still exist, and
prevent my openly asserting your character, in
private I can always be your friendfail not to
apply to me when in want or suffering, and so
long as God giveth to me, so long will I freely
share with a man who feels so nobly, and acts so
well. If sickness or want should ever assail you,
and peace once more smiles upon our efforts, seek
the gate of him whom you have often met as
Harper
,
and he will not blush to acknowledge you in
his true character.
It is little that I need in this life, said
Harvey
,
the glow still mantling over his features.
So long as God gives me health and honest
industry
,
I can never want in this happy country
but to know that your Excellency is my friend, is
a blessing that I prize more than all the gold of
England's treasury.
The officer stood for a few moments in the
attitude
of intense thought. He then drew to him
the desk, and wrote a few lines on a piece of
paper, and gave it to the pedlar as he addressed
him
That Providence destines this country to some
great and glorious fate I must believe, while I
witness the patriotism that pervades the bosoms
of her lowest citizens. It must be dreadful to a
mind like yours to descend into the grave, branded
as a foe to liberty; but you already know the
lives that would be sacrificed should your real
character be revealed. It is impossible to do you
justice now, but I fearlessly entrust you with this
certificateshould we never meet again, it may
be serviceable to your children.
Children! exclaimed the pedlar. Can I
give to a family the infamy of my name.
The officer gazed at the strong emotion he
exhibited
with painful amazement, and made a
slight movement towards the gold; but it was
arrested by the proud expression of his
companion's
face. Harvey saw the intention, and shook
his head, as he continued more mildly, and with
an air of deep respect
It is, indeed, a treasure that your Excellency
gives meit is safe too.There are those living
who could say, that my life was nothing to me,
compared to your secrets. The paper that I told
you was lost, I swallowed when taken last by the
Virginians. It was the only time I ever deceived
your Excellency, and it shall be the lastyes,
this is, indeed a treasure to meperhaps, he
continued with a melancholy smile, It may be
known after my death who was my friend, and if
it should not, there are none to grieve for me.
Remember, said the officer, with strong
emotion
,
that in me you will always have a secret
friend; but openly I cannot know you.
I know itI know it, said Birch; I knew
it when I took the service. 'Tis probably the last
time that I shall ever see your excellency. May
God pour down his choicest blessings on your
head. He paused, and moved towards the door.
Vol. II. 24
The officer followed him with eyes that expressed
powerful interest. Once more the pedlar turned,
and seemed to gaze on the placid, but commanding
features of the General, with regret and reverence,
and then, bowing low, he withdrew.
The armies of America and France were led by
their common leader, against the enemy under
Cornwallis, and terminated a campaign in
triumph
,
that had commenced in difficulties. Great
Britain soon after became disgusted with the war,
and the independence of the States was
acknowledged
.
As years rolled by, it became a subject of pride
to the different actors in the war, and their
descendants
,
to boast of their efforts in the cause
which had confessedly heaped so many blessings
upon their country; but the name of Harvey Birch
died away among the multitude of agents who were
thought to have laboured in secret against the rights
of their countrymen. His image, however, was often
present to the mind of the powerful chief, who alone
knew his true character, and several times did he
cause secret inquiries to be made into his fate
one of which only resulted in any success. By
this, he learnt that a pedlar of a different name,
but similar appearance, was toiling through the
new settlements that were springing up in every
direction, and that he was struggling with the
advance
of years, and apparent poverty. Death
prevented further inquiries on the part of the
officer
,
and a long period passed before the pedlar
was again heard of.
CHAPTER XIX.
Some village Hampden, that with dauntless breast,
The little tyrant of his fields withstood
Some mute, inglorious Milton here may rest;
Some Cromwell, guiltless of his Country's blood.
Gray
It
was thirty-three years after the interview,
which we have just related, that an
American
army was once more arrayed against the
country of their ancestors; but the scene was
transferred from the banks of the Hudson to those
of the Niagara.
The body of Washington had long lain
mouldering
in the tomb; but as time was fast obliterating
the slight impressions of political enmity or
personal
envy, his name was hourly receiving new
lustre, and his worth and integrity each moment
became more visible, not only to his countrymen,
but to the world. He was already the
acknowledged
hero of an age of reason and truth; and
many a young heart, amongst those who formed
the pride of our army in 1814, was glowing with
the recollection of the one great name of
America
,
and inwardly beating with the sanguine
expectation
of emulating, in some degree, its
renown
.
In no one were these virtuous hopes more
vivid, than in the bosom of a young officer, who
stood on the table-rock, contemplating the great
cataract, on the evening of the 25th of July, of
that bloody year. The person of this youth was
tall and finely moulded, indicating a just
proportion
between strength and activity; his eyes of a
deep black, were of a searching and dazzling
brightness. At times, as they gazed upon the
flood of waters that rushed tumultuously at his
feet, there was a stern and daring look that
flashed
from them, which denoted the ardor of an
enthusiast. But this proud expression was
softened
by the lines of a mouth, around which there
played a suppressed archness, that partook of
feminine
beauty. His hair shone in the setting sun
like ringlets of gold, as the air from the falls
gently moved the rich curls from a forehead, whose
whiteness showed that exposure and heat alone
had given their darker hue, to a face glowing with
health. There was another officer standing by
the side of this favoured youth, and both seemed,
by the interest that they betrayed, to be gazing
for the first time at this wonder of the western
world. A profound silence was observed by each
of the soldiers, until the companion of the officer
that we have described, suddenly started, and
pointing eagerly with his sword into the abyss
beneath
,
exclaimed
See! Wharton: there is a man crossing in
the very eddies of the cataract, and in a skiff no
bigger than an egg-shell.
He has a knapsack, and is probably a
soldier
,
returned the other. Let us meet him at
the ladder, Mason, and learn his tidings.
Some time was expended in reaching the spot
where the adventurer was intercepted. Contrary
to the expectations of the young soldiers, he
proved
to be a man far advanced in life, and evidently
no follower of the camp. His years might be
seventy
,
and were indicated more by the thin hairs
of silver that lay scattered over his wrinkled brow,
than by any apparent failure of his system. His
frame was meagre and bent; but it was the
attitude
of habit, for his sinews were strung with the
toil of half a century. His dress was mean, and
manifested the economy of its owner, by the
number
and nature of its repairs. On his back was a
scantily furnished pack, that had led to the
mistake
in his profession. A few words of salutation,
and on the part of the young men of surprise,
that one so aged should venture so near the
whirlpools
of the cataract, were exchanged; when the
old man inquired, with a voice that began to
manifest the tremor of age, the news from the
contending armies.
We whipt the red-coats here, the other day,
among the grass on the Chippewa plains, said
the one who was called Mason; since when, old
daddy, we have been playing hide-and-go-peep
with the shipsbut we are now marching back
from where we started, shaking our heads, and as
surly as the devil.
Perhaps you have a son among the soldiers,
said his companion with a more polished
demeanor
,
and an air of kindness; if so, tell me his
name and regiment, and I will take you to him.
The old man shook his head. and, passing his
hand over his silver locks, with an air of meek
resignation cast his eyes for a moment to heaven
and answered
NoI am alone in the world!
You should have added, Captain Dunwoodie,
cried his careless comrade, if you could find
either; for nearly half of our army have marched
down the road, and may be, by this time, under the
walls of fort George, for any thing that we know
to the contrary.
The old man stopped suddenly, and looked
earnestly from one of his companions to the other;
the action being noticed by the soldiers, they
paused also.
Did I hear right, at length the stranger
uttered
,
raising his hand to skreen his eyes from the
rays of the setting sun; what did he call you?
My name is Wharton Dunwoodie, replied the
youth, smiling.
The stranger motioned silently for him to
remove
his hat, which the youth did accordingly,
and his fair hair blew aside like curls of silk, and
opened the whole of his ingenuous countenance to
the inspection of the other.
'Tis like our native land, exclaimed the old
man, with a vehemence that astonished his
companions
,
improving with timeGod has blessed
both.
Why do you stare thus, Lieutenant Mason,
cried Captain Dunwoodie, laughing and blushing
a little; you show more astonishment than when
you saw the falls.
Oh! the fallsthey are a thing to be looked
at on a moonshiny night, by your aunt Sarah and
that gay old bachelor, Colonel Singleton; but a
fellow like myself never shows surprise, unless it
may be at such a touch as this.
The extraordinary vehemence of the stranger's
manner had passed away, as suddenly as it was
exhibited
,
but he listened to this speech apparently
with deep interest, while Dunwoodie replied a
little gravely
Come, come, Tomno jokes about my good
aunt, I begshe is kind and attentive to me, and
I have heard it whispered that her youth was not
altogether happy.
Why as to rumour, said Mason, there goes
one in Accomac, that Colonel Singleton offers
himself to her regularly every Valentine's day;
and there are some who add, that your old
great-aunt
helps his suit.
Aunt Jeanette! said Dunwoodie, laughing,
dear good soul, she thinks but little of marriage
in any shape, I believe, since the death of Dr.
Sitgreaves. There was some whispers of a
courtship
between them formerly, but it ended in nothing
but civilities, and I suspect that the whole story
arises from the intimacy of Colonel Singleton and
my father. You know they were comrades in the
horse, as was your own father.
I know all that, of course; but you must not
tell me that the particular, prim, bachelor goes so
often to General Dunwoodie's plantation, merely
for the sake of talking old soldier with your father.
The last time I was there, that yellow, sharp nosed,
kind of a housekeeper of your mother's, took me
into the pantry, and said that the Colonel was no
dispiseable match, as she called it, and how the
sale of his plantation in Georgia had brought him
Oh! Lord, I don't know how much.
Quite likely, returned the Captain; Katy
Haynes is a famous calculator.
They had stopped during this conversation in a
kind of uncertainty, whether their new companion
was to be left or not.
The old man listened to each word as it was
uttered
,
with the most intense interest, but towards
the conclusion of the dialogue, the earnest
attention
of his countenance changed to a kind of
inward
smile. He shook his head, and passing his
hand over his forehead, seemed to be thinking of
other times. Mason paid but little attention to
the expression of his features, and continued
Yesshe is all that; for herself too, I believe,
sometimes.
Her selfishness does but little harm, returned
Dunwoodie, smiling, as if in recollection of past
scenes. One of her greatest difficulties is her
aversion to the blacks. She says that she never
saw but one that she liked.
And who was he?
His name was Csar; he was a house servant
of my late grand father, Wharton. You don't
remember
him, I believe; he died the same year
with his master, while we were children. Katy
yearly sings his requiem, and upon my word,
I believe he deserved it. I have heard something
of his helping my English uncle, as we call
General
Wharton, in some difficulty that occurred in the
old war. My mother always speaks of him with
great affection. Both Csar and Katy came to
Virginia with my mother when she married.
My mother was
An angel! interrupted the old man, in a
voice that startled the young soldiers by its
abruptness
and energy.
Did you know her? cried the son, with a
bright glow of pleasure on his cheek.
The reply of the stranger was interrupted by
sudden and heavy explosions of artillery, which
were immediately followed by continued volleys
of small arms, and in a few minutes the air was
filled
with the tumult of a warm and well contested
battle.
The two soldiers hastened with precipitation
towards their camp, accompanied by their new
acquaintance. The excitement and anxiety
created
by the approaching fight, prevented a
continuance
of the conversation, and the three held
their way to the army, making occasional
conjectures
on the cause of the fire and the probability of
a general engagement. During their short and
hurried walk, Captain Dunwoodie, however, threw
several friendly glances at the old man, who
moved over the ground with astonishing energy
for his years, for the heart of the youth was
warmed
by the eulogium on a mother that he adored.
In a short time, they joined the regiment to which
the youth belonged, when the Captain
squeezing
the stranger's hand, earnestly begged that he
would make inquiries after him on the following
morning, and that he might see him in his own
tent. Here they separated.
Every thing in the American camp gave
indications
of an approaching struggle. At a distance
of a few miles the sound of cannon and musketry,
was heard above even the roar of the cataract.
The troops were soon in motion, and a movement
made to support that division of the army that was
already engaged. Night had set in before the
reserve
and irregulars reached the foot of Lundy's
lane, a road that diverged from the river and
crossed
a conical eminence, at no great distance from
the Niagara highway. The summit of this hill
was crowned with the cannon of the British, and
in the flat beneath were the remnant of Scott's
gallant brigade, which had for a long time held an
unequal contest, with distinguished bravery. A
new line was interposed, and one column of the
Americans directed to charge up the hill, parallel
to the road. This column took the English in
flank, and, bayonetting their artillerists, gained
possession of the cannon. They were immediately
joined by their comrades and the enemy was
swept from the hill. But large reinforcements
were joining the English general momentarily,
and their troops were too brave to rest easy
under
the defeat. Repeated and bloody charges
were made to recover the guns, but in all they
were repulsed with slaughter. During the last
of these struggles, the ardor of the youthful
captain
whom we have mentioned, urged him to lead
his men some distance in advance, to scatter a
daring
party of the enemyhe succeeded, but in
returning to the line missed his lieutenant from
the station that he ought to have occupied. Soon
after this repulse, which was the last, orders were
given to the shattered troops to return to the
camp. The British were no where to be seen,
and preparations were made to take in such of
the wounded as could be moved. At this moment
Wharton Dunwoodie, impelled by affection for
his friend, seized a lighted fuse, and taking two
of his men, went himself in quest of his body,
where he was supposed to have fallen. Mason
was found on the side of the hill, seated with
great composure, but unable to walk from a
fractured
leg. Dunwoodie saw and flew to the side
of his comrade, exclaiming
Ah! dear Tom, I knew I should find you the
nearest man to the enemy.
Softlysoftlyhandle me tenderly, replied
the Lieutenant; no, there is a brave fellow
still nearer than myself, and who he can be I
know not. He rushed out of our smoke near my
platoon, to make a prisoner or some such thing,
but, poor fellow, he never came back; there he
lies just over the hillock. I have spoken to him
several times, but I fancy he is past answering.
Dunwoodie went to the spot, and to his
astonishment
beheld the aged stranger.
It is the old man who knew my mother! cried
the youth; for her sake he shall have
honourable
buriallife him, and let him be be carried in;
his bones shall rest on native soil.
The men approached to obey. He was lying
on his back, with his face exposed to the glaring
light of the fuse; his eyes were closed, as if in
slumber;his lips, sunken with years, were
slightly
moved from their natural position, but it
seemed
more like a smile than a convulsion, which
caused the change. A soldier's musket lay near
him, where it had fallen from his grasp; his hands
were both pressed upon his breast, and one of
them contained a substance that glittered like
silver
.
Dunwoodie stooped, and removing the limbs,
perceived the place where the bullet had found a
passage to his heart. The subject of his last care
was a tin box, through which the fatal lead had
gone; and the dying moments of the old man must
have passed in drawing it from his bosom.
Dunwoodie
opened it, and found a paper, in which, to
his astonishment, he read the following:
Circumstances of political importance, which
involve the lives and fortunes of many, have
hitherto
kept secret what this paper now reveals.
Harvey Birch has for years been a faithful and
unrequited
servant of his country. Though man does
not, may God reward him for his conduct.
George Washington
.
It was the SPY OF THE NEUTRAL GROUND, who
had died as he lived, devoted to his country, and
a martyr to her liberties.
THE END.